Utah, session 2025S1, SB1007.
Section 1. Section 10-7-87 is enacted to read:10-7-87Effective 11/06/25. Cities authorized to appoint, contract with constables.(1)A city may appoint or contract with a constable to provide services described in Title 17, Chapter 78, Part 6, Constables, the same as if the city were a county.(2)A constable that is appointed or contracted with a city shall comply with the provisions of Title 17, Chapter 78, Part 6, Constables, in regard to the city the same as if the city were a county.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 10-7-88 is enacted to read:10-7-88Effective 11/06/25. Municipalities to approve, protect certain protection areas.A municipality shall comply with the following provisions of Title 17, Chapter 81,  Agriculture, Industrial, and Critical Infrastructure Materials, the same as if the municipality were a county:(1)Section 17-81-101, Definitions;(2)Part 2, Proposal and Approval of Protection Area;(3)Part 3, Protection of Land in a Protection Area;(4)Part 4, Vested Mining Use; and(5)Part 5, Open Land and Working Agricultural Land Use.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 17-75-101, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-2 is renumbered and amended to read:75. General County Personnel Management1. General Provisions17-33-217-75-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)(a)"Appointed officer" means an individual appointed to:(i)a statutory office or position; or(ii)a position of employment with a county, except a special employee.(b)"Appointed officer" includes an individual serving on a special, regular or full-time committee, agency, or board, regardless of whether the individual is compensated for the individual's services.(c)"Appointed officer" does not include an elected officer.(2)"Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act:(a)to help, represent, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide assistance to an individual or business entity;(b)believing that the action is of help, aid, advice, or assistance to the individual or business entity; and(c)with the intent to assist the individual or business entity.(3)"Authorized legislative day" means:(a)a day on which the Legislature convenes for:(i)the annual general session;(ii)a special session;(iii)a veto override session; or(iv)an interim day, designated by the Legislative Management Committee described in Section 36-12-6;(b)an authorized legislative training day; or(c)any other day on which a meeting of a committee, subcommittee, commission, task force, or other entity is held, if:(i)the committee, subcommittee, commission, task force, or other entity is created by statute or joint resolution;(ii)the legislator's attendance at the meeting is approved by the Legislative Management Committee described in Section 36-12-6; and(iii)service and payment for service by the legislator is not in violation of the Utah Constitution, including Article V and Article VI, Sections 6 and 7.(4)"Authorized legislative training day" means a day that a Legislative Expenses Oversight Committee, described in Legislative Joint Rule 5-1-102 or any successor provision, designates as an authorized legislative day for training or informational purposes, including:(a)chair training;(b)an issue briefing;(c)legislative leadership instruction;(d)legislative process training;(e)legislative rules training;(f)new legislator orientation; or(g)another meeting to brief, instruct, orient, or train a legislator in relation to the legislator's official duties.(5)"Business entity" means to conduct business as a:(a)sole proprietorship;(b)partnership;(c)association;(d)joint venture;(e)corporation;(f)firm;(g)trust;(h)foundation;(i)organization; or(j)entity.(6)"Career service position" means any position in the county service except those exempted under Section 17-33-817-75-502.(7)"Compensation" means anything of economic value, however designated, which is paid, loaned, granted, given, donated or transferred to any person or business entity for or in consideration of personal services, materials, property, or any other thing whatsoever.(2)(8)"Council" means the career service council, a bipartisan, three-member appeals and personnel advisory board.(3)(9)"Director" means the director of personnel management.(10)"Elected officer" means an individual elected or appointed to an office in the county.(4)(11)"Eligible applicant" means any applicant for employment that meets the job related minimum requirements established for a position in the career service.(5)(12)"Eligible list" means a list of eligible applicants for employment ranked in order of relative knowledge, skill, ability and merit.(6)(13)"Exempt positions" means those positions which are not in the career service as specified in Section 17-33-817-75-502.(14)"Governmental action" means an action on the part of a county including:(a)a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order;(b)a grant, payment, award, license, contract, subcontract, transaction, decision, sanction, or approval; or(c)the denial of, or failure to act upon, a matter described in Subsection (14)(a) or (b).(15)"Legislator" means:(a)a member of the Utah Senate;(b)a member of the Utah House of Representatives; or(c)an individual who has been elected as a member described in Subsection (15)(a) or (b), but has not yet been sworn in or begun the individual's term of office.(7)(16)"Merit system" means a system of personnel administration based on the principles set forth in Section 17-33-317-75-402.(17)"Miscarriage" means the spontaneous or accidental loss of a fetus, regardless of gestational age or the duration of the pregnancy.(18)"Officer" means an appointed officer or an elected officer.(8)(19)"Personnel rules" means the rules the county adopts in accordance with Section 17-75-602.(20)"Position classification" means a grouping of positions under the same title which are sufficiently similar to be compensated at the same salary range and to which the same tests of ability can be applied.(9)(21)"Provisional appointment" means an appointment to fill a position pending the establishment of a register for such position.(22)"Retaliatory action" means to:(a)dismiss the employee;(b)reduce the employee's compensation;(c)fail to increase the employee's compensation by an amount that the employee is otherwise entitled to or was promised;(d)fail to promote the employee if the employee would have otherwise been promoted; or(e)threaten to take an action described in Subsections (22)(a) through (d).(23)"Special employee" means an individual hired on the basis of a contract to perform a special service for the county in accordance with an award of a contract following a public bid.(24)"Substantial interest" means the ownership, either legally or equitably, by an individual, the individual's spouse, and the individual's minor children, of at least 10% of the outstanding shares of a corporation or 10% interest in any other business entity.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 17-75-102, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-11.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-11.517-75-102Effective 11/06/25Contingently Superseded 11/28/26. Compliance with Labor Code requirements.Each county shall comply with the requirements of Section 34-32-1.1.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 17-75-102, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-11.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-11.517-75-102Contingently Effective 11/28/26. Compliance with Labor Code requirements.Each county shall comply with the requirements of Section 34-32-102.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 17-75-103, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-108 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-10817-75-103Effective 11/06/25. Training requirements.A county shall ensure that any training that the county requires of a county officer or employee complies with Title 63G, Chapter 22, State Training and Certification Requirements.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 17-75-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-16-7 is renumbered and amended to read:2. County Officer Deputies17-16-717-75-201Effective 11/06/25. Deputies and employees -- Appointments -- County legislative body consent power -- Liability of principal -- Deputy may serve despite vacancy in office of appointing officer.(1)(a)A county or precinct officer, including an elected county executive, except a county commissioner or county council member, may, with the consent of the county legislative body, appoint deputies and employees as necessary for the discharge of the duties of the county officer's office.(b)The county legislative body's consent power under Subsection (1)(a) shall be defined in county ordinance and may include consent by:(i)the budget approval process;(ii)approval of an allocation of a certain number of positions; or(iii)approval or disapproval of the hiring of individual applicants for employment.(c)A county legislative body may by ordinance delegate to the county executive the authority to consent to the appointment of deputies and employees under this Subsection (1).(2)If thea county clerk performs district court clerk functions, the legislative body of thatthe county shall provide the county clerk with deputies and employees for the business of the district courtscourt: (a)as considered necessary and advisable by the district court judge or judges of the district court, consider necessary and advisable; and(b)consistent with the level of funding for clerk services from the court administrator's office.(3)(a)Each county officer appointing a deputy shall, for each deputy appointed, file a signed writing with the county clerk that memorializes the appointment.:(i)sign a document that states that the county officer appointed the deputy; and(ii)file the signed document with the county clerk.(b)The county officer appointing the deputy is liable for all the deputy's official acts of the deputy.(c)If the office of the county officer who appointed the deputy becomes vacant, the deputy may continue to serve despite the vacancy.(4)A sheriff in a county employing more than 100 full-time uniformed peace officers may, with the consent of the council and the county legislative body, appoint more than one chief deputy or undersheriff.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 17-75-202 is enacted to read:17-75-202Effective 11/06/25. Compensation for deputies.If a county officer has a deputy or other assistant, the salary of the deputy or assistant shall be:(1)fixed by the county legislative body; and(2)a county charge.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 17-75-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-325 is renumbered and amended to read:3. Specific Employee Benefits and Protections17-50-32517-75-301Effective 11/06/25. Counties authorized to make benefits generally available to employees, employee dependents, or an employee's adult designee -- Registry authorized -- Limitations.(1)A county may, by ordinance enacted by the county legislative body, make benefits generally available to: (a)all county employees,; (b)theirthe dependents, of county employees; and (c)an unmarried employee's financially dependent or interdependent adult designee.(2)(a)Subject to Subsection (2)(b), a county may, by ordinance enacted by the county legislative body, create a registry for adult relationships of financial dependence or interdependence.(b)A county may not create or maintain a registry or other means that defines, identifies, or recognizes and gives legal status or effect to a domestic partnership, civil union, or domestic cohabitation relationship other than marriage.(3)The county'sfollowing county actions are not and may not be treated the same as or substantially equivalent to marriage: (a)the county's recognition of an adult designee,; (b)the county's creation and maintenance of a registry under Subsection (2)(a),; and (c)any certificate issued to or other designation of a person on the county's registry are not and may not be treated the same as or substantially equivalent to marriageunder Subsection (2)(a).(4)Neither an ordinance under Subsection (1) or (2)(a) nor a registry created under Subsection (2)(a) making an employee benefit available to an adult designee may create, modify, or affect a spousal, marital, or parental status, duty, or right.(5)An ordinance, executive order, rule, or regulation adopted or other action taken before, on, or after May 5, 2008, that is inconsistent with this section is void.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 17-75-302 is enacted to read:17-75-302Effective 11/06/25. Bereavement leave following miscarriage or stillbirth.Personnel rules shall provide for at least three work days of paid bereavement leave for a county employee:(1)following the end of the county employee's pregnancy by way of miscarriage or stillbirth; or(2)following the end of another individual's pregnancy by way of a miscarriage or stillbirth, if:(a)the county employee is the individual's spouse or partner;(b)(i)the county employee is the individual's former spouse or partner; and(ii)the county employee would have been a biological parent of a child born as a result of the pregnancy;(c)the county employee provides documentation to show that the individual intended for the employee to be an adoptive parent, as that term is defined in Section 81-13-101, of a child born as a result of the pregnancy; or(d)under a valid gestational agreement in accordance with Title 81, Chapter 5, Part 8, Gestational Agreement, the county employee would have been a parent of a child born as a result of the pregnancy.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 17-75-303, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-11 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-1117-75-303Effective 11/06/25. Political activities of employees.Except as otherwise provided by law or by personnel rules and regulations promulgatedmade under this chapter for federally aided programs, county employees may voluntarily participate in political activity subject to the following provisions:(1)No person shall be denied A county may not deny an individual the opportunity to become an applicant for a position under the merit system in any covered county department by virtuebecause of the individual's political opinionopinions or affiliation.(2)No person employed by the A county may not dismiss a county employee that is employed under the merit system may be dismissed from service as a resultbecause of the county employee's political opinionopinions or affiliation.(3)A county career service employee may: (a)voluntarily contribute funds to political groups; and (b)become a candidate for public office.(4)NoA county officer or employee, whether elected or appointed, may not directly or indirectly coerce, command, or advise any officer or employee covered under the merit system to pay, lend, or contribute part of his or her salary or compensation or anything else of value to any party, committee, organization, agency, or person for political purposes. (5)NoA county officer or employee, whether elected or appointed, may not attempt to make any county officer's or employee's personnel status dependent upon the county officer's or employee's support or lack of support for any political party, committee, organization, agency, or person engaged in a political activity.(5)(6)No A county officer or employee may not engage in any political activity during the hours of employment.(7) nor shall anyA person may not solicit political contributions from county employees during hours of employment for political purposes,. (8)but nothingNothing in this section shall precludeprohibits a county officer or employee from voluntary contribution by a county employee to thea political party or candidate of the employee's choice.(6)(9)Nothing contained in this chapter shallmay be construed to permit partisan political activity of any county employee who is prevented or restricted from engaging in suchpartisan political activity by the provision of the federal Hatch Act, 5 U.S.C. Sec. 1501 et seq.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 17-75-304, which is renumbered from Section 17-15-33 is renumbered and amended to read:17-15-3317-75-304Effective 11/06/25. County required to provide leave to a legislator on an authorized legislative day.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Authorized legislative day" means:(i)the day on which the Legislature convenes in annual general session, and each day after that day, until midnight of the 45th day of the annual general session;(ii)a special session day;(iii)a veto override session day;(iv)an interim day designated by the Legislative Management Committee;(v)an authorized legislative training day; or(vi)any other day on which a meeting of a committee, subcommittee, commission, task force, or other entity is held, if:(A)the committee, subcommittee, commission, task force, or other entity is created by statute or joint resolution;(B)the legislator's attendance at the meeting is approved by the Legislative Management Committee; and(C)service and payment for service by the legislator is not in violation of the Utah Constitution, including Article V and Article VI, Sections 6 and 7.(b)"Authorized legislative training day" means a day that a Legislative Expenses Oversight Committee designates as an authorized legislative day for training or informational purposes, including:(i)chair training;(ii)an issue briefing;(iii)legislative leadership instruction;(iv)legislative process training;(v)legislative rules training;(vi)new legislator orientation; or(vii)another meeting to brief, instruct, orient, or train a legislator in relation to the legislator's official duties.(c)"Legislator" means:(i)a member of the Utah Senate;(ii)a member of the Utah House of Representatives; or(iii)an individual who has been elected as a member described in Subsection (1)(c)(i) or (ii), but has not yet been sworn in or begun the individual's term of office.(d)"Retaliatory action" means to:(i)dismiss the employee;(ii)reduce the employee's compensation;(iii)fail to increase the employee's compensation by an amount that the employee is otherwise entitled to or was promised;(iv)fail to promote the employee if the employee would have otherwise been promoted; or(v)threaten to take an action described in Subsections (1)(d)(i) through (iv).(2)(1)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(3), a county that employs an individual who is a legislator:(a)shall grant leave to the individual on an authorized legislative day for the number of hours requested by the individual requests;(b)may not interfere with, or otherwise restrain the individual from, using the leave described in Subsection (2)(a)(1)(a); and(c)may not take retaliatory action against the individual for using the leave described in Subsection (2)(a)(1)(a).(3)(2)The leave described in Subsection (2)(1) is leave without pay unless the county and the individual described in Subsection (2)(1) agree to terms that are more favorable to the individual.(4)(3)A county is not required to comply with Subsection (2)(1) if the legislative body of the county determines that complying with the requirement would cause the county significant difficulty or expense when considered in relation to the size, financial resources, nature, or structure of the county's operations.

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 17-75-305, which is renumbered from Section 17-15-26 is renumbered and amended to read:17-15-2617-75-305Effective 11/06/25. Leave of absence for county employee seeking election to county office.(1)A county employee who has filed a declaration of candidacy under Section 20A-9-202 for a county office may, at the county employee's discretion, take an unpaid leave of absence, subject to applicable employee policies on giving notice before taking leave, for some or all of the period from the filing of the declaration of candidacy until the earliest of:(a)the county employee's defeat at a primary election;(b)the county employee's withdrawal as a candidate for the county office; or(c)the day after the regular general election for which the county employee is a candidate.(2)Neither the filing of a declaration of candidacy under Section 20A-9-202 nor a leave of absence under Subsection (1) may be used as the basis for any adverse employment action against the employee, including discipline or termination.

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 17-75-401, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-1 is renumbered and amended to read:4. Personnel Management - General17-33-117-75-401Effective 11/06/25. Establishment of merit system -- Separate systems for peace officers and firemen recognized -- Options of small counties.(1)This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "County Personnel Management Act."(2)(1)A merit system of personnel administration for the counties of the state of Utah, theircounty departments, county offices, and county agencies, except as otherwise specifically provided, is established.(3)(2)(a)This chapterpart recognizes the existence of the merit systems for peace officers of the several counties as provided for in Chapter 30, Deputy Sheriffs - Merit System, and Chapter 30a, Peace Officer Merit System in Counties of the First Class Act, and for firemen of the several counties as provided for in Chapter 28, Firemen's Civil Service Commission, and :(i)county law enforcement officers as provided in Chapter 76, Part 2, Deputy Sheriff Merit System, and Chapter 76, Part 3, Peace Officer Merit System in Counties of the First Class; and(ii)county firefighters, as provided in Chapter 76, Part 5, Firefighters' Civil Service Commission.(b)The intent of this part, Part 5, Career Service, and Part 6, Office of Personnel Management, is intended to give county commissionscounties the option of using the provisions of this chapter asto use: (i)a single merit system for all county employees; or (ii)a merit system in combination with thesethe existing systems for firemen and peace officersdescribed in Subsection (2)(a).(4)(3)On or after May 6, 2002, anyA county that has fewer than 200 employees not covered by other merit systems or not exempt under Subsections 17-33-8(1)(b)(i) through (vii)Section 17-75-502 may, at its option, comply with the merit system provisions of this chapter.(5)(4)Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (4)(3), any county which was in compliancethat complied with the merit system provisions of this chapter prior to May 6, 2002, shall continue to comply with the merit system provisions of this chapter even though the county may not thereafter meet or exceed the threshold requirements of Subsection (4)(3).

Section 15:
Section 15. Section 17-75-402, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-317-75-402Effective 11/06/25. Merit principles.It is the policy of this state that each county may establish a personnel system administered in a manner that will provide for the effective implementation of the following merit principles:(1)recruiting, selecting, and advancing county employees on the basis of their relative ability, knowledge, and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for employment for initial appointment;(2)provision of equitableproviding equitable and adequate compensation to county employees;(3)training of county employees as needed to assure high-quality performance;(4)retention ofretaining county employees on the basis of the adequacy of theirthe county employee's performance, and; (5)separation ofseparating from county employees whose inadequate performance cannot be corrected;(5)(6)fair treatment oftreating applicants for employment and county employees fairly in all aspects of personnel administration without regard to: (a)race,; (b)color,; (c)religion,; (d)sex,; (e)national origin,; (f)political affiliation,; (g)age,; or (h)disability, and; (7)withhaving proper regard for theireach county employee's privacy and constitutional rights as citizens;(6)(8)provision of information toproviding county employees information regarding theira county employee's political rights and prohibited practices under the Hatch Act; and(7)(9)provision ofproviding a formal procedure for processing thea county employee's appeals and grievances of employees without: (a)discrimination,; (b)coercion,; (c)restraint,; or (d)reprisalretaliation.

Section 16:
Section 16. Section 17-75-403, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-10 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-1017-75-403Effective 11/06/25. Grievance and appeals procedure -- Employees' complaints of discriminatory employment practice.(1)(a)Any county to which the provisions of this act Part 5, Career Service, and Part 6, Office of Personnel Management, apply shall establish in itsthe county's personnel rules and regulations a grievance and appeals procedure.  (b)TheA grievance and appeals procedure shall be used to resolve disputes arising from grievances as defined in the personnel rules and regulations, including acts of discrimination.  (c)TheCounty employees may use the grievance and appeals procedure may also be used by employees in the event ofif the county employee is: (i)dismissal,dismissed; (ii)demotion,demoted; (iii)suspension,suspended; or (iv)transfertransferred.(2)(a)Any charge by aA county career service employee that accuses a county of discriminatory or prohibited employment practice as prohibited by Section 34A-5-106, can be filedmay file a complaint with the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor within the Labor Commissioncreated in Section 34A-1-202.  (b)Complaints A county employee that files a complaint with the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor shall be filedfile the complaint within 30 days of the issuance of a written decision ofafter the day on which the county career service council issues a written decision on the county employee's grievance or appeal.

Section 17:
Section 17. Section 17-75-501, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-4 is renumbered and amended to read:5. Career Service17-33-417-75-501Effective 11/06/25. Career service council -- Members and alternate members -- Powers and duties -- Appeals -- Time limit -- Qualifications, appointment, terms, and compensation of council members -- Career service council authorized to refer an appeal to an administrative law judge.(1)(a)(i)There shall be in each county establishing a system a three-member bipartisan career service council appointed by the county executive.  (ii)The members of the council shall be persons in sympathy with the application ofindividuals willing to apply merit principles to public employment.(ii)(iii)(A)The county executive may appoint alternate members of the career service council to hear appeals that one or more regular career service council members are unable to hear.(B)The term of an alternate member of the career service council may not exceed one year.(b)The council shall hear appeals not resolved at lower levels in the cases of: (i)career service employees who the county has: (A)suspended,; (B)transferred,; (C)demoted,; or (D)dismissed as well in; and(ii) the cases of other grievances not resolved by the grievance procedure at the county division or departmental level.(c)The career service council:(i)may make an initial determination in each appeal whether the appeal is one of the types of matters under Subsection (1)(b) over which the council has jurisdiction;(ii)shall, subject to Section 17-33-4.5Subsections (9) through (11), review written appeals in cases of applicants rejected for examination and report final binding appeals decisions, in writing, to the county legislative body;(iii)may not hear any other personnel matter; and(iv)may affirm, modify, vacate, or set aside an order for disciplinary action.(d)(i)A personAn individual adversely affected by a decision of the career service council may appeal the decision to the district court.(ii)An appeal to the district court under this Subsection (1)(d) is barred unless it is filed within 30 days after the day on which the career service council issues itsthe council's decision.(iii)If there is a record of the career service council proceedings, the district court review shall be limited to the record provided by the career service council.(iv)In reviewing a decision of the career service council, the district court shall presume that the decision is valid and may determine only whether the decision is arbitrary or capricious.(2)(a)EachA council member shall serve a term of three years to expirethat expires on June 30, three years after the date of his or her appointment,county executive appointed the council member. (b)except thatNotwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the term for original appointees to a council shall be chosen as follows:  one member for a term expiring June 30, 1982; one member for a term expiring June 30, 1983; and one member for a term expiring June 30, 1984.  Successors of original council members shall be chosen for three-year termsstaggered so that the term of only one council member expires each year.  (c)AnA county executive's appointment to fill a vacancy on the council shall be for only the unexpired term of the appointee's successor.  (d)Each council member of the board shall hold office until histhe council member's successor is appointed and confirmed.  (e)AThe county executive may remove the council member of the council may be removed by the county executive for cause, after: (i)having been givenreceiving a copy of the charges against him or herthe council member; and (ii)the council member has had an opportunity to be heard publicly on the charges before the county legislative body.  (f)Adequate annual appropriations shall be made availableThe county shall annually appropriate adequate funds to enable the council to effectively to carry out itsthe council duties under this lawchapter.(3)MembersEach county council member and alternates of thealternate county council member shall be: (a)a citizen of the United States citizens; and (b)befor a period of at least one year before the day on which the council member is appointed, an actual and bona fide residents ofresident of: (i)the state of Utah; and (ii)the county from which appointed for a period of not less than one year preceding the date of appointment and. (4)aA council member may not hold another government office or be employed by the county.(4)(5)The council shall elect one of its membersa member of the council as chairperson,. (6)and twoTwo or more council members of the council shall constituteconstitutes a quorum necessary for carrying on the council's business and activity of the council.(5)(7)The council shall have subpoena power to: (a)compel attendance of witnesses,; and (b)to authorize witness fees where itwhen the council deems appropriate, to be paid at the same rate as in justice courts.(6)(8)(a)Council membersA council member shall receive compensation for attending each day or partial day they arethe council is in session at a per diem rate established in accordance with Section 11-55-103.(b)An alternate council member shall receive compensation for each day or partial day that the alternate council member is required to replace a regular council member, at a per diem rate established in accordance with Section 11-55-103.(9)(a)A county legislative body may appoint one or more administrative law judges to hear appeals referred by a council under this section.(b)Each administrative law judge shall be trained and experienced in personnel matters.(10)(a)A council may refer an appeal to an administrative law judge appointed under Subsection (9) if the council determines that the referral is in each party's best interest.(b)After holding a hearing on an appeal described in Subsection (10)(a), the administrative law judge shall make:(i)findings of fact; and (ii)a recommendation to the council.(c)After receiving the administrative law judge's recommendation, the council may request the administrative law judge to hold a further factual hearing before the council issues a decision.(d)The council may adopt or reject the administrative law judge's recommendation, whether before or after a further hearing under Subsection (10)(c).(11)(a)A council shall refer an appeal to an administrative law judge appointed under Subsection (9) if the county employee or county official assigned by the county executive or county legislative body to manage personnel functions requests that the appeal be referred.(b)In an appeal described in Subsection (11)(a), the administrative law judge, not the council, issues a final decision.

Section 18:
Section 18. Section 17-75-502, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-8 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-817-75-502Effective 11/06/25. Career service -- Exempt positions.(1)The career service:(a)is a permanent service to which this chapterpart applies; and(b)comprises all tenured county positions in the public service, except:(i)subject to Subsection (2):(A)the county executive, members of the county legislative body, and other elected officials; and(B)each major county department head charged directly by the county legislative body, or by a board appointed by the county legislative body, with the responsibility of assisting to formulate and carry out policy matters;(ii)one confidential secretary for each elected county officer and major county department head, if a confidential secretary is assigned;(iii)an administrative assistant to the county executive, each member of the county legislative body, and each elected official, if an administrative assistant is assigned;(iv)each duly appointed chief deputy of any elected county officer who takes over and discharges the duties of the elected county officer in the absence or disability of the elected county officer;(v)subject to Subsection (3), a personan individual who is:(A)appointed by an elected county officer to be a division director, to administer division functions in furtherance of the performance of the elected officer's professional duties;(B)in a confidential relationship with the elected county officer; and(C)not in a law enforcement rank position of captain or below;(vi)each person employed to make or conduct a temporary and special inquiry, investigation, or examination on behalf of the county legislative body or one of its committees;(vii)each noncareer employee:(A)compensated for the employee's services on a seasonal or contractual basis; and(B)hired on emergency or seasonal appointment basis, as approved by the council; and(viii)each provisional employee, as defined by the county's policies and procedures or its personnel rules and regulations;(ix)each part-time county employee, as defined by the county's policies and procedures or its personnel rules and regulations;(x)each county employee appointed to perform:(A)work that does not exceed three years in duration; or(B)work with limited funding; and(xi)each county position that, by itsthe position's confidential or key policy-determining nature, cannot or should not be appropriately included in the career service. (2)Before a position under Subsection (1)(b)(i) may be changed from its current status to exempt or tenured, the career service council shall, after giving due notice, hold a public hearing on the proposed change of status.(3)(a)Subsection (1)(b)(v) may not be construed to cause a personan individual serving as a nonexempt county employee on May 5, 2008, in a position described in that subsection to lose the nonexempt status.(b)The elected county officer in a supervisory position over ana county employee described in Subsection (3)(a) shall work with the county's office of personnel management to develop financial and other incentives to encourage a nonexempt employee to convert voluntarily to exempt status.(4)(a)Rules and regulations promulgated under this chapterCounty policies made in conformity with this part shall list by job title and county department, office or agency, each position designated as exempt under Subsection (1)(b)(xi).(b)A change in exempt status of a position designated as being exempt under Subsection (1)(b)(xi) constitutes an amendment to the personnel rules and regulations promulgatedmade under this chapter.

Section 19:
Section 19. Section 17-75-503, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-9 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-917-75-503Effective 11/06/25. Acceptance of exempt position by career service employee -- Reappointment register.(1)Any career service employee accepting an appointment to an exempt position who is not retained by the appointing officer, unless discharged for cause as provided by this actpart or by regulationcounty policies made in conformity with this part, shall:(a)be appointed to any career service position for which the employee qualifies in a pay grade comparable to the employee's last position in the career service provided an opening exists; or(b)be appointed to any lesser career service position for which the employee qualifies pending the opening of a position described in Subsection (1) of this section.(2)The director described in Section 17-75-601 shall maintain a reappointment register to facilitate the operation of this section, which shall have precedence over other registers.

Section 20:
Section 20. Section 17-75-601 is enacted to read:6. Office of Personnel Management17-75-601Effective 11/06/25. County executive creates office of personnel management and appoints the director.(1)(a)A county executive shall:(i)create an office of personnel management, administered by a director of personnel management; and(ii)ensure that the director is an individual with proven experience in personnel management.(b)Except as provided in Subsection (2), the director position shall be:(i)a merit position; and(ii)filled as provided in Subsection (1)(c).(c)Except as provided in Subsection (2), the council shall:(i)advertise and recruit for the director position in the same manner as for other merit positions;(ii)select three names from an eligible list; and(iii)submit those names as recommendations to the county legislative body.(d)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the county legislative body shall select an individual to serve as director from the names submitted to it by the council.(2)(a)As an alternative to the procedure under Subsections (1)(b), (c), and (d), and at the county executive's discretion, the county executive may appoint a director with the advice and consent of the county legislative body.(b)The position of a director appointed under this Subsection (2) shall be a merit exempt position.(c)A director appointed under this Subsection (2) may be terminated by the county executive with the consent of the county legislative body.

Section 21:
Section 21. Section 17-75-602, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-517-75-602Effective 11/06/25. Director of personnel management responsibilities -- Personnel policies.(1)As used in this section, "miscarriage" means the spontaneous or accidental loss of a fetus, regardless of gestational age or the duration of the pregnancy.(2)(a)(i)Each county executive shall:(A)create an office of personnel management, administered by a director of personnel management; and(B)ensure that the director is a person with proven experience in personnel management.(ii)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the position of director of personnel management shall be:(A)a merit position; and(B)filled as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(iii).(iii)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the career service council shall:(A)advertise and recruit for the director position in the same manner as for merit positions;(B)select three names from a register; and(C)submit those names as recommendations to the county legislative body.(iv)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the county legislative body shall select a person to serve as director of the office of personnel management from the names submitted to it by the career service council.(b)(i)Effective for appointments made after May 1, 2006, and as an alternative to the procedure under Subsections (2)(a)(ii), (iii), and (iv) and at the county executive's discretion, the county executive may appoint a director of personnel management with the advice and consent of the county legislative body.(ii)The position of each director of personnel management appointed under this Subsection (2)(b) shall be a merit exempt position.(iii)A director of personnel management appointed under this Subsection (2)(b) may be terminated by the county executive with the consent of the county legislative body.(3)(1)The director of personnel management shall:(a)encourage and exercise leadership in the development of expertise in personnel administration within the severalcounty departments, offices, and agencies in the county service; and (b)make available the facilities of the office of personnel management to this endcounty departments, offices, and agencies for the development of expertise in personnel administration;(b)(c)advise the county legislative andbody, county executive bodies, and any county officer on the use of human resources;(c)(d)develop and implement programs for the improvement ofto improve employee effectiveness, such asincluding: (i)training,; (ii)safety,; (iii)health,; (iv)counseling,; and (v)welfare;(d)(e)(i)investigate periodically the operation and effect of this lawchapter and of the policies made under itthis chapter; and (ii)report investigation findings and recommendations to the county legislative body;(e)(f)establish and maintain records of all employees in the county service, setting forth as tothat includes each employeecounty employee's: (i)class,; (ii)title,; (iii)pay or status,; and (iv)other relevant data;(f)(g)make an annual report to the county legislative body and county executive regarding the work of the department; andoffice;(g)(h)apply and carry out this lawchapter and the policies under itthis chapter; and (i)perform any other lawful acts that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this lawchapter.(4)(2)(a)(i)The director shall recommend personnel rulespolicies for the county.(ii)(b)The county legislative body may:(A)(i)recommend personnel rulespolicies for the county; and(B)(ii)approve, amend, or reject personnel rulespolicies for the county before they are adopted.(b)(3)The rulesPersonnel policies shall provide for:(i)(a)recruiting efforts to bethat are planned and carried out in a manner that: (i)assures open competition,; and(ii)withplaces special emphasis to be placed on recruiting efforts to attract and help assure that individuals belonging to the following groups will be among the candidates from whom appointments are made: (A)minorities,; (B)women,; (C)personsindividuals with a disability as defined by and covered under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12102,; or (D)other groups that are substantially underrepresented in the county work force to help assure they will be among the candidates from whom appointments are madeworkforce;(ii)(b)the establishment of job related minimum requirements, wherever practical, that all successful candidates shall beare required to meet in order to be eligible for consideration for appointment or promotion;(iii)(c)selection procedures that include: (i)consideration of the relative merit of each applicant for employment,; (ii)a job related method of determining the eligibility or ineligibility of each applicant,for employment; and (iii)a valid, reliable, and objective system of ranking eligible applicants according to their qualifications and merit;(iv)(d)certification procedures that insureensure equitable consideration of an appropriate number of the most qualified eligible applicants based on the ranking system;(v)(e)appointments to positions in the career service by selection from the most qualified eligible applicants certified on eligible lists established in accordance with Subsections (4)(b)(iii) (3)(c) and (iv)(d);(vi)(f)occasional noncompetitive appointments in the occasional instance where there is evidence that open or limited competition is not practical, such asincluding for unskilled positions that have no minimum job requirements;(vii)(g)limitation of competitionscompetition at the discretion of the director for appropriate positions to facilitate employment of qualified applicants for employment with: (i)a substantial physical or mental impairment,; or (ii)other groups protected by Title VII of the Civil Rights Act;(viii)(h)(i)permanent appointment for entry to the career service that shall beis contingent upon a probationary county employee's satisfactory performance by the employee during a six-month probationary period of six months,; (ii)with the probationary period extendable a six-month probationary period that the county may extend for a period not to exceed an additional six months for good cause,; and(iii)but with the condition that thean opportunity for a probationary county employee mayto appeal directly to the council any undue prolongationprolonging of the six-month probationary period by the county that is designed to thwart merit principles;(ix)(i)temporary, provisional, or other noncareer service appointments, which may not: (i)be used as a way of defeatingto defeat the purpose of the career service; and (ii)may not exceed 270 days;(x)(j)lists of eligible applicants normally to be used, if available, for filling temporary positions, and short -term emergency appointments to bethat: (i)are made without regard to the other provisions of law; (ii)to provide for maintenance of essential services in an emergency situation where normal procedures are not practical,; and(iii) these emergency appointments do not to exceed 270 days;(xi)(k)(i)promotion and career ladder advancement of county employees to higher level positions; and (ii)assurance that all personsan individual promoted areis qualified for the higher level position;(xii)(l)recognition of the equivalency of other merit processes by waiving, at the director's discretion of the director, the open competitive examination for placement in the career service positions of thoseapplicants for employment who were originally selected through a competitive examination process in another governmental entity, the an individual in those cases, to serve a probationary period;(xiii)(m)preparation, maintenance, and revision of a position classification plan for all positions in the career service, that: (i)is based upon similarity of duties performed and responsibilities assumed,; (ii)so thatfor all positions in the same class: (A)reasonably requires the same qualifications may reasonably be required for,; and (B)equitably applies the same schedule of pay may be equitably applied to, all positions in the same class,; and (iii)theincludes a compensation plan that, in order to maintain a high quality public work force, to take into accountworkforce, accounts for: (A)the responsibility and difficulty of the work, for each position; (B)the comparative pay and benefits needed to compete in the labor market and; (C)to stay in proper alignment with other similar governmental units,; and (D)other factors;(xiv)(n)(i)keeping records of performance on all county employees in the career service; and (ii)requiring consideration of performance records in determining: (A)salary increases,; (B)any benefits for meritorious service,; (C)promotions,; (D)the order of layoffs and reinstatements,; (E)demotions,; (F)discharges,; and (G)transfers;(xv)(o)establishment of a plan: (i)governing layoffs of county employees resulting from: (A)lack of funds or work,; (B)abolition of positions,; or (C)material changes in duties or organization,; and (ii)governing reemployment of persons soformer county employees that the county laid off, takingthat takes into account the former county employee's: (A)with regard to layoffs and reemployment the relative ability,; (B)seniority,; and (C)merit of each employee;(xvi)(p)establishment of a plan for resolving employee grievances and complaints with final and binding decisions;(xvii)(q)establishment of disciplinary measures such asincluding: (i)suspension,; (ii)demotion in rank or grade, or; (iii)discharge,; and(iv)measures to provide for presentation of charges, hearing rights, and appeals for all permanent employees in the career service to the career service council;(xviii)(r)establishment of a procedure for employee development and improvement of poor performance;(xix)(s)establishment of: (i)hours of work,; (ii)holidays,; and (iii)attendance requirements in various classes of positions in the career service;(xx)(t)establishment and publicizing of fringe benefits such asincluding: (i)insurance,; (ii)retirement,; and (iii)leave programs; and(xxi)(u)any other requirements not inconsistent with this lawchapter that are proper for itsthe chapter's enforcement.(5)Rules adopted pursuant to Subsection (4)(b)(xx) shall provide for at least three work days of paid bereavement leave for an employee:(a)following the end of the employee's pregnancy by way of miscarriage or stillbirth; or(b)following the end of another individual's pregnancy by way of a miscarriage or stillbirth, if:(i)the employee is the individual's spouse or partner;(ii)(A)the employee is the individual's former spouse or partner; and(B)the employee would have been a biological parent of a child born as a result of the pregnancy;(iii)the employee provides documentation to show that the individual intended for the employee to be an adoptive parent, as that term is defined in Section 81-13-101, of a child born as a result of the pregnancy; or(iv)under a valid gestational agreement in accordance with Title 81, Chapter 5, Part 8, Gestational Agreement, the employee would have been a parent of a child born as a result of the pregnancy.

Section 22:
Section 22. Section 17-75-603, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-7 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-717-75-603Effective 11/06/25. Functions of county office of personnel management -- Personnel functions of county agencies, departments, or offices.(1)(a)The county office of personnel management shall perform the functions required by this Subsection (1).(b)The county executive, county legislative body, and county office of personnel management may not delegate thosethe functions described by this section to a separate county agency, office, or department.(c)The county office of personnel management shall:(i)design and administer a county pay plan that includes: (A)salaries,; (B)wages,; (C)incentives,; (D)bonuses,; (E)leave,; (F)insurance,; (G)retirement,; and (H)other benefits;(ii)design and administer the county classification plan and grade allocation system, including: (A)final decisions on position classification; and (B)final decisions on grade allocation;(iii)conduct position classification studies, including periodic desk audits, except that an agency, department, or office may submit classification recommendations to the county office of personnel management;(iv)maintain registers of: (A)publicly recruited applicants; and (B)certification of top-ranking eligible applicants;(v)monitor county agency, department, or office personnel practices to determine compliance with equal opportunity and affirmative action guidelines; and(vi)maintain central personnel records.(d)The county legislative body may approve, amend, or reject the pay plan.(2)County agencies, departments, or offices shall:(a)establish initial job descriptions;(b)recommend position classifications and grade allocations;(c)make final selections for appointments and promotions to vacant positions;(d)conduct performance evaluations;(e)discipline employees; and(f)perform other functions approved by the county executive, and agreed to by the county agency, office, or department.

Section 23:
Section 23. Section 17-75-604, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-6 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-617-75-604Effective 11/06/25. Certification of eligibility by director -- Power of director to examine payrolls.(1)The director shall certify:(a)No a new county employee shall be hired into a position covered by this chapter,; and (b)no employee shall be changeda change in paya county employee's compensation, title, or status,. (2)nor shall anyThe director, or the director's designee, shall certify an employee be paid, unless certified by the director as eligible to be paid under the provisions ofthis chapter, or regulations promulgatedpersonnel rules made under, this chapter. (3)The director of personnel management may examine payrolls at any time to determine conformity with this chapter and the countypersonnel rules.

Section 24:
Section 24. Section 17-75-605, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-12 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-1217-75-605Effective 11/06/25. Reciprocal agreements for benefit of system -- Cooperation by director with other governmental agencies.(1)The county may enter into reciprocal agreements, upon such terms as may be agreed upon, for the use of equipment, materials, facilities, and services with any public agency or body for purposes deemed of benefit to the public personnel system.(2)The director may cooperate with other governmental agencies charged with public personnel administration in: (a)conducting personnel tests,; (b)recruiting personnel,; (c)training personnel,; (d)establishing lists from which eligibles shall beeligible individuals are certified for appointment; and (e)for the interchange of personnel and their benefits.

Section 25:
Section 25. Section 17-75-701, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-13 is renumbered and amended to read:7. Prohibited Actions17-33-1317-75-701Effective 11/06/25. Prohibited actions.(1)It is an offense for aA person commits an offense under this chapter by:(a)to make anymaking a false statement, certificate, mark, rating, or report with regard to any test, certification, or appointment made under any provision of this lawthis chapter; or (b)in any manner commitcommitting or attemptattempting to commit any fraud preventing the impartial execution of this chapter.(2)(a)It is an offense for aA person, under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Section 76-8-103 or 76-8-105, to commits an offense under this chapter by directly or indirectly, give, render, pay, offer, solicit, or acceptgiving, rendering, paying, offering, soliciting, or accepting any money, service, or other valuable consideration for any appointment, proposed appointment, promotion, or proposed promotion to, or for any advantage in, a position in the career service.(b)Offenses described under Subsection (2)(a) do not include circumstances that are violations of Sections 76-8-103 and 76-8-105.(3)It is an offense for anyAn employee of the county office of personnel departmentmanagement, examiner, or other person tomay not:(a)defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person in his or heran individual's right to examination, eligibility, certification, or appointment under this chapter; or(b)furnish to any personan individual any special or secret information for the purpose of affecting the rights or prospects of any personan individual with respect to employment in the career service.

Section 26:
Section 26. Section 17-75-702, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-14 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-1417-75-702Effective 11/06/25. Violations -- Misdemeanor -- Ineligibility for employment and forfeiture of position.(1)Any personAn individual who willfully violates any provision of this chapter or the personnel rules and regulations promulgatedmade under itthis chapter is guilty of a class  A misdemeanor.(2)Any personIn addition to the sanctions of Subsection (1), an individual who has been adjudged guilty of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the personnel rules and regulations promulgatedmade under itthis chapter shall, for a period of five years, in addition to the sanctions of Subsection (1),: (a)be ineligible for appointment to or employment in a county position in the county service,; and (b)if ana county officer or employee of the county, shall forfeit thatthe county office or position.

Section 27:
Section 27. Section 17-76-101 is enacted to read:76. County Emergency Personnel Management1. General Provisions17-76-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.Reserved.

Section 28:
Section 28. Section 17-76-102 is enacted to read:17-76-102Effective 11/06/25. Applicability.Reserved.

Section 29:
Section 29. Section 17-76-103, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-23 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-2317-76-103Effective 11/06/25. Severability.(1)If any section or provision of this actchapter is declared unconstitutional or void, the fact of such holding shall in no wise affect those sections and provisions not held unconstitutional or void and which can be retained in effect without the provision declared unconstitutional and void, and it shall be the duty of the merit service commission to provide by rule for the operation and functioning of any activity within the purpose and spirit of the act which may be or may become necessary and proper and which is not specifically provided hereby.(2)(a)If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter is found to be in conflict with any state or federal law, conflict with which would impair funding otherwise receivable from the state or federal government, the conflicting provision is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the department, agency, or institution of the county directly affected.(b)A conflict with state or federal law described in Subsection (2)(a) does not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter.

Section 30:
Section 30. Section 17-76-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-1 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Deputy Sheriff Merit System17-30-117-76-201Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Governing body" means the county  legislative body.(2)(1)"Appointing authority" means the sheriff of a county having jurisdiction over any peace officer.(3)"Peace officer" means any paid deputy sheriff, other than a chief deputy designated by the sheriff, who is in the continuous employ of a county.(4)(2)"Commission" means the merit system commission consisting of three personsindividuals appointed as provided inin accordance with Section 17-30-317-76-203 and having the duty, power, and responsibility for the discharge of the functions of this chapter.(5)(3)"Department of Public Safety" means the department created in Section 53-1-103.(4)"Eligible register" means the list made by a commission described in Subsection 17-76-209(1) that contains the names of all applicants that took the examination and that received a passing grade.(5)"Examination" means the competitive examination for employment as a peace officer described in Section 17-76-207.(6)"Member" means an individual appointed to the merit commission in accordance with Section 17-76-203.(7)"Merit system officer" means a peace officer who has merit status as defined in this part.(8)"Peace officer" means any paid deputy sheriff, other than a chief deputy designated by the sheriff, who is in the continuous employ of a county.(9)"Police interlocal entity" means an interlocal entity, as defined in Section 11-13-103, that is created:(a)under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, by an agreement to which a county of the first class is a party; and(b)to provide law enforcement service to an area that includes the unincorporated part of the county.(10)"Police special district" means a special district, as defined in Section 17B-1-102:(a)whose creation was initiated by the adoption of a resolution under Section 17B-1-203 by the legislative body of a county of the first class, alone or with one or more other county legislative bodies; and(b)that is created to provide law enforcement service to an area that includes the unincorporated part of the county.

Section 31:
Section 31. Section 17-76-202, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-217-76-202Effective 11/06/25. Applicability.(1)This chapter does not apply to a county of the first class or an interlocal entity, as defined in Section 11-13-103, in which a county of the first class is a party to an interlocal agreement to provide law enforcement service.(2)From and after the effective date of this act theThe sheriff of each county with a population of 20,000 people or more which shallwho regularly employs one or more peace officers shall,:(a)appoint peace officers and fill vacant positions for peace officers: (i)by and with the advice and consent of the county legislative body,; (ii)and subject to the rules and regulations of the merit service commission,; and(iii)appoint from the classified merit service list furnished by the merit service commission, all subordinate peace officers in his department and in like manner fill all vacancies in the same; and (b)shall further promote, transfer, demote, suspend or remove peace officers in accordance with the provisions of this actpart.(3)Every peace officer who is serving as such upon the effective date of this actpart is considered: (a)fully qualified for such position without examination or test; and (b)is considered to have been appointed and to hold histhe position and classification pursuant to the provisions of this actof peace officer in accordance with this part.(4)Counties with a population of less than 20,000 people may implement a deputy sheriff'ssheriff merit system if: (a)approved by the county legislative body approves the deputy sheriff merit system; or (b)the people of the county through referendum or initiative approve the deputy sheriff merit system.

Section 32:
Section 32. Section 17-76-203, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-317-76-203Effective 11/06/25. Establishment of merit system commission -- Appointment, qualifications, and compensation of members.(1)(a)Each county with a population of 20,000 or more shall establish a merit system commission consisting of three members appointed as provided inin accordance with Subsection (1)(b).(b)(i)As used in this Subsection (1)(b):(A)"Police interlocal entity" means an interlocal entity, as defined in Section 11-13-103, that is created:(I)under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, by an agreement to which a county of the first class is a party; and(II)to provide law enforcement service to an area that includes the unincorporated part of the county.(B)"Police special district" means a special district, as defined in Section 17B-1-102:(I)whose creation was initiated by the adoption of a resolution under Section 17B-1-203 by the legislative body of a county of the first class, alone or with one or more other legislative bodies; and(II)that is created to provide law enforcement service to an area that includes the unincorporated part of the county.(ii)(b)(i)For a county in which a police interlocal entity is created, whether or not a police special district is also created in the county:(A)two members shall be appointed by the county legislative body of the county; and(B)one member shall be appointed by the governing body of the police interlocal entity.(iii)(ii)For a county in which a police special district is created but in which a police interlocal entity has not been created:(A)two members shall be appointed by the county legislative body of the county; and(B)one member shall be appointed by the board of trustees of the police special district.(iv)(iii)For each other county, all three members shall be appointed by the county legislative body.(c)Of the original appointees,members appointed in accordance with Subsection (1)(b): (i)one member shall be appointed for a term ending February 1 of the first odd-numbered year after the date of appointment,; (ii)and one member shall be appointedeach for termsa term ending two years after the date the term ends for the member described in Subsection (1)(c)(i); and (iii)one member shall be appointed for a term ending four years thereafterafter the date the term ends for the member described in Subsection (1)(c)(i).(d)Upon the expiration of any of the termsa member's term, a successor shall be appointed for a full term of six years.(e)Appointment of a successor to fill a vacancy resulting other than from expiration of term shall be for the unexpired portion of the term only.(2)Members of a commission A member shall: (a)be citizensa citizen of the state,; (b)shall have been residentsa resident of the area embraced by the governmental unit from which appointedgoverned by the commission not less than five years next precedingbefore the date of appointment,; and (c)shall hold no other office or employment under the governmental unit for whichthat appointed the member.(3)The county legislative body may: (a)compensate a member for service on the commission; and (b)reimburse thea member for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties.

Section 33:
Section 33. Section 17-76-204, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-4 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-417-76-204Effective 11/06/25. Duty of commission -- Provide for unspecified activities.(1)The commission shall be responsible for: (a)carrying out the provisions ofimplementing this act,part; and (b)shall makemaking all necessary rules and regulations,: (i)not in conflict with the provisions hereof,this part; and(ii)as may be necessary for that purposeto implement this part.(2)The commission shall make a rule for an activity within the purpose and spirit of this part that:(a)the commission deems necessary and proper; and(b)is not specifically provided by this part.

Section 34:
Section 34. Section 17-76-205, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-517-76-205Effective 11/06/25. Organization of commission -- Secretary -- Offices -- Job classification plan.(1)Each merit system commission shall be organized by its members whoMembers shall select one member as chairmanchairperson of the commission. (2)(a)and shall have assigned to it by theThe county legislative body,shall assign to the commission a qualified county employee of the county to act as the commission's secretary. (b)SuchThe county employee described in Subsection (2)(a) shall: (i)be acceptable to the commission; and (ii)shall act and serve as secretary without additional compensation unless the county legislative body so specifies additional compensation to be paid to the county employee. (3)The county legislative body shall provide suitable accommodations, supplies and equipment as needed to enable the commission to attend to itscommission business. (4)(a)The commission shall formulate a comprehensive job classification plan coveringthat:(i)includes all peace officers of the governmental unit.; (ii)The plan shall placeplaces all positions requiring substantially the same duties and qualifications in the same classification; (iii)and shall includespecifies minimum physical and educational qualifications of the applicants for each position, and; (iv)provideprovides standards for promotion.; and (v)is the basis for implementing this part.(b)The commission shall adopt aand may amend the comprehensive job classification plan described in Subsection (4)(a)which shall be the basis of the administration of this act until changed with the approval of the commission. (c)In the event If a new position is created and approved by the governingcounty legislative body, suchthe new position shall automatically be classified and become a part of the comprehensive job classification plan described in this Subsection (4).

Section 35:
Section 35. Section 17-76-206, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-21 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-2117-76-206Effective 11/06/25. Power of commission members to administer oaths and subpoena witnesses -- Rights of and fees for witnesses.(1)(a)AnyA member of a commission, in performance of hisperforming the member's duties as such, shall have power tomay administer oaths and subpoena witnesses and documents. (b)If a personan individual refuses to [or]comply or fails to obeycomply with a subpoena issued by a commissionermember, the district court may, upon application of a commissionerat the member's request, compel obedience as in like cases before the district courtthe individual to comply with the subpoena.(2)Witnesses A witness in proceedingsa proceeding before a commission: (a)shall beis subject to all the rights, privileges, duties, and penalties of witnesses in courts of record,; and (b)shall be paid the same fees, as an expense of the commissionreceive a witness fee from the commission, equivalent to those paid in a court of record.

Section 36:
Section 36. Section 17-76-207, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-6 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-617-76-207Effective 11/06/25. Examinations -- How prepared, conducted, and graded -- Notice of examination -- Preservation and inspection of examination papers.(1)(a)When necessary, thea commission shall giveadminister a competitive examinationsexamination for employment as a peace officer to determine the qualification of applicants for positions as peace officers.(b)The examinationsAn examination shall be practical in character and shall relate to matters that will fairly test the mental and physical ability and knowledge of the applicants to discharge the duties of the positionspeace officer.(c)The examinationsAn examination shall be prepared, conducted, and graded under the direction of theas directed by the commission, or by impartial special examiners if the commission finds it necessary.(2)(a)Notice of examination shall be:(i)(A)published one time not less than 15 days before the examination in a newspaper of general circulation in the area concerned; and(B)published, in accordance with Section 45-1-101, for 15 days before the examination; and(ii)posted in a conspicuous place in the office of the appointing authority's department concerned.(b)The notice shall set forth minimum and maximum wages, physical and educational requirements, and passing grades, which shall be not that are not less than 70% correct answers.(c)A person An applicant completing an examination shall be promptly notified of the applicant's final grade by mail at histhe applicant's last known address of his final grade.(3)All examination papers are the commission's property, and the commission shall preserve the examination papers until the expiration of the eligible register.(4)Examination papers are not open to public inspection without court order, except that:(a)an applicant may inspect the applicant's own examination papers at any time within 30 days after the date the commission mails the notice described in Subsection (2); and(b)the appointing authority may inspect the papers of any eligible applicant the commission certifies for appointment.

Section 37:
Section 37. Section 17-76-208, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-7 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-717-76-208Effective 11/06/25. Disqualification of applicant for examination -- Appeal to commission.(1)The commission shall disqualify an applicant forfrom taking an examination who:(a)does not meet advertised qualifications for peace officer;(b)has been convicted of a criminal offense inimical to the public service, or involving moral turpitude;(c)has practiced or attempted deception or fraud in the applicant's application or examination, or in securing eligibility for appointment; or(d)is not:(i)a citizen of the United States; or(ii)a lawful permanent resident of the United States who:(A)has been in the United States legally for the five years immediately before the day on which the application is made; and(B)has legal authorization to work in the United States.(2)If the commission disqualifies an applicant is rejectedin accordance with Subsection (1), the commission shall notify the applicant shall be notified by mail at the applicant's last known address.(3)At any time before the day on which the examination is held, an applicant may: (a)correct a defect in the applicant's application,; or (b)appeal in writing to the commission the commission's decision to disqualify the applicant.

Section 38:
Section 38. Section 17-76-209, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-9 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-917-76-209Effective 11/06/25. Preparation and expiration of eligible register -- Appointments from eligible register -- Failure to accept appointment -- Probationary period.(1)(a)Upon completion of an examination, the commission shall preparemake an eligible register containingthat contains the names of all persons receivingapplicants that received a passing grade in the order of grades earned, beginning with the highest.(2)(b)An eligible register shall expireexpires not later than two years after the date of the examination unless the commission, for good reason, shall extendextends the time not to exceed one additional year. (c)The promulgation ofWhen the commission makes a new eligible register shall automatically cancel all , previous eligible registers for the same class or position are automatically canceled.(2)(a)When a peace officer is to be appointed, the appointing authority shall request that the commission certify three eligible applicants for the position.(b)After the appointing authority makes a request described in Subsection (2)(a):(i)the commission shall certify to the appointing authority the names of the three applicants standing highest on the eligible register; and(ii)the appointing authority shall select and appoint one of the three applicants the commission certifies.(c)If an applicant described in Subsection (2)(b)(ii) does not accept the appointing authority's offer of appointment, the applicant may, in writing:(i)request that the applicant retain the applicant's place on the eligible register; and(ii)provide reasons sufficient, in the judgment of the commission, to justify the applicant's rejection of the appointing authority's offer of appointment.(3)(a)A peace officer appointed under Subsection (2) shall serve a probationary period of 12 consecutive months, during which time the appointing authority may discharge the peace officer.(b)The probationary period shall be extended as necessary for a peace officer who has not yet satisfactorily completed an approved peace officer training program and received a certificate of completion under Title 53, Chapter 6, Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.(c)If a peace officer remains in the position to which the peace officer was appointed after the expiration of the probationary period, the peace officer's retention constitutes appointment to merit status.(d)Service as a peace officer under a temporary or emergency appointment is not considered as part of the probationary period.(e)A peace officer removed during the peace officer's probationary period may not be placed on the eligible register again without having passed another regular examination.

Section 39:
Section 39. Section 17-76-210, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-12 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-1217-76-210Effective 11/06/25. Vacancies -- Positions requiring special qualifications -- Competition suspended -- Promotion -- Promotion register.(1)(a)In case of When there is a vacancy in a position requiring peculiar and exceptional qualifications of a scientific, professional, or expert character, the commission may, after public hearing and by unanimous vote of the commission, suspend competition regarding the position upon satisfactory evidence that: (i)competitioncompetitive hiring is impracticable; and (ii)that the position can best be filled by the selection of some designated personan individual of recognized attainments the board may, after public hearing and by the affirmative vote of all members suspend competition,. (b)and all such cases of suspensionWhen the commission suspends competitive hiring, the commission shall be reported together withreport the reason therefor,for suspending competitive hiring in the commission's annual reports of the commission.(2)(a)VacanciesThe appointing authority shall fill vacancies occurring in the merit system classification of any county shall be filled by by promotion insofar asif possible.  (b)A promotion shall be made only after an open competitive examination, with admission to which shall bethe examination limited to merit system officers.  (c)Such examinationAn examination for a promotion shall include an average of service ratings for the next preceding year, a rating of seniority, and test the merit system officer's competence of the peace officer to perform the duties required in the position for which application is made.  (d)The combinedAn examination for a promotion shall not combine the weights of service rating and seniority shall be notto more than 40% of the whole examination.  (e)SucceedingThe appointing authority shall fill subsequent vacancies shall also be filled by promotion until the lowest grade is reached, which grade shall then be filled from the eligible list as herein set forthin accordance with this part.(3)(f)(i)After a promotionalan examination for a promotion, the commission shall prepare a promotionalpromotion register which shall takethat takes precedence over an eligible register. (ii)Certification therefrom The commission shall be mademake the promotion register in the same manner as from anit makes an eligible register.

Section 40:
Section 40. Section 17-76-211, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-14 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-1417-76-211Effective 11/06/25. Temporary appointment -- Emergency appointment.(1)AAn appointing authority may make a temporary appointment for a period not exceeding 60 days may be made, pending examination, when there is no existing eligible, promotion, or re-employment register in existence.(2)(a)An appointing authority may make an emergency appointment for a period not exceeding seven days.(b)With the commission's consent, the appointing authority may extend an emergency appointment one time, for an additional period not to exceed seven days, if:(i)an eligible applicant is not immediately available from an existing eligible register, promotion register described in Section 17-76-210, or reemployment register described in Section 17-76-212; and(ii)the work to be performed is necessary to expedite the public business.

Section 41:
Section 41. Section 17-76-212, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-16 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-1617-76-212Effective 11/06/25. Temporary layoffs -- Reemployment register.(1)A peace officer may be temporarily laid off:(a)Whenwhen the appointing authority determines it is necessary because of lack of funds or work an officer may,; and (b)with the commission's approval of the commission, be temporarily laid off. (2)Such A layoff described in Subsection (1) shall be made according to the lowest rating of the peace officers of the class of position affected, calculated upon seniority under a method prescribed by the commission. (3)A person An individual serving under temporary or emergency appointment shall be laid off before any merit system officer. (4)A merit system officer who is laid off shall be placed upon a re-employmentreemployment register to be re-employed in the inverse order in which the merit system officer is laid off, which reemployment register shall take precedence over all eligible registers.

Section 42:
Section 42. Section 17-76-213, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-13 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-1317-76-213Effective 11/06/25. Transfer of merit system officer.A merit system officer may be transferred, without examination, from one position to a similar position in the same class and grade in the same governmental unit.

Section 43:
Section 43. Section 17-76-214, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-17 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-1717-76-214Effective 11/06/25. Leave of absence -- Sick leaves and vacations.(1)The appointing authority, with the commission's approval of the commission, may grant ana peace officer a leave of absence without pay for a period not to exceed one year. (2)In the event anIf a peace officer on leave takes a higher position in police work whichthat does not come under the merit system provisions of this actpart, the leaveappointing authority may, with the commission's consent of the commission, be renewedrenew the leave of absence. (3)In the event anIf a peace officer is elected sheriff, or is appointed chief deputy, the peace officer shall automatically be placed on a leave of absence for the period of time the peace officer remains sheriff or chief deputy. (4)Upon the termination of a leave of absence, the peace officer shall be returned to the peace officer's former position.(2)(5)Sick leaves and vacations with pay shall be as provided by law or ordinance.

Section 44:
Section 44. Section 17-76-215, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-18 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-1817-76-215Effective 11/06/25. Demotion, reduction in pay, suspension or discharge -- Grounds.(1)A merit system officer holding a permanent appointment may be demoted, reduced in pay, suspended, or discharged for:(a)neglect of duty;(b)disobedience of a reasonable order;(c)misconduct;(d)inefficiency, or inability to satisfactorily perform assigned duties; or(e)any act inimical to the public service.(2)No merit system officer shall be suspended for more than 30 days at one time, nor more than 60 days in one year. (3)Demotion, reduction in pay, suspension, or discharge shall be made upon order of the appointing authority.

Section 45:
Section 45. Section 17-76-216, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-19 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-1917-76-216Effective 11/06/25. Disciplinary charges and merit system officer grievances -- Appeal to commission -- Hearing -- Findings.(1)Each personAn appointing authority who orders the demotion, reduction in pay, suspension, or discharge of a merit system officer for any cause set forthdescribed in Section 17-30-1817-76-215 shall:(a)file written charges with the commission; and(b)serve the merit system officer with a copy of the written charges.(2)(a)(i)An A merit system officer who is the subject of charges under Subsection (1) may, within 10 days after service ofthe day on which the charges were served, appeal in writing to the commission.(ii)In the absence of an appeal, a copy of the charges under Subsection (1) may not be made public without the consent of the merit system officer charged.(b)If ana merit system officer files a grievance, as defined by the commission, and exhausts all internal grievance procedures, if any, the merit system officer may, within 10 days after receivingthe day on which the merit system officer received notice of the final disposition of the grievance, file an appeal with the commission.(3)(a)The commission shall:(i)fix a time and place for a hearing upon the charges or appeal of the a merit system officer grievance; and(ii)give notice of the hearing to the parties.(b)(i)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b)(ii), each hearing under this Subsection (3) shall be held not less than 10 days, and not more than 90 days, after the day on which a merit system officer files an appeal or grievance is filed.(ii)A hearing may be held more than 90 days after an appeal or grievance is filed if:(A)the merit system officer and employer agree; or(B)the commission determines forthere is good cause the commission so ordersto delay the hearing.(4)(a)If the aggrieved merit system officer so desires, the hearing shall be public.(b)The parties may be represented by counsel at the hearing.(5)After the hearing, the commission shall make its decision in writing, including findings of fact, and shall mail a copy of the commission's decision to each party.(6)(a)An individual aggrieved by an act or failure to act of any commission under this part has exhausted the remedies of appeal to the commission, the individual may appeal the commission's decision to the district court.(b)The courts may review questions of law and fact, and may affirm, set aside, or modify the ruling complained of.

Section 46:
Section 46. Section 17-76-217, which is renumbered from Section 17-30-22 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30-2217-76-217Effective 11/06/25. Prohibitions against political activities -- Penalties.(1)Any employee of a governmental unit or member of a governing body, or appointing authority, or peace officer who shallIt is a class B misdemeanor for an individual with authority to, or who seeks, assists, promises, or threatens to appoint, promote, transfer, demote, suspend, discharge, or change the amount of compensation of anya merit system officer or seek, aid or abet the appointment, promotion, transfer, demotion, suspension, discharge or change in the amount of compensation of any merit system officer, or promise or threaten to do so, for giving, withholding, or neglecting to make any contributions or any service for any political purpose,. (2)or who solicitsIt is a class B misdemeanor for an individual described in Subsection (1) to solicit, directly or indirectly, any sucha contribution or service,for a political purpose from a merit system officer, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.  (3)This section does not apply to political speeches or use of mass communicationscommunication media for political purposes by personsan individual who is not a merit system officersofficer even though a merit system officersofficer may be present or within the reach of such media unless the purpose and intent is to violate this section with direct respect to those officersthe merit system officer.(2)(4)NoA merit system officer may not engage in any political activity during the hours of employment,. (5)nor shall any personAn individual may not solicit political contributions from a merit system officersofficer during hours of employment for political purposes;. (6)but nothing in this section shallThis section does not preclude voluntary contributions by a merit system officer from voluntarily contributing to the party or candidate of the merit system officer's choice.

Section 47:
Section 47. Section 17-76-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-102 is renumbered and amended to read:3. Peace Officer Merit System in Counties of the First Class17-30a-10217-76-301Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Appointing authority" means the county sheriff or the chief executive officer of a police interlocal entity.(2)"Commission" means the merit system commission consisting of three personsindividuals appointed in accordance with Section 17-30a-20217-76-304.(3)"Department" means a county sheriff's office or a police interlocal entity.(4)"Eligible appointment register" means the list made by a commission described in Section 17-76-310 that contains the names of all applicants that took the examination and that received a passing grade.(5)"Examination" means the competitive examination to determine the qualification of an applicant for a position as a peace officer described in Section 17-76-307.(4)(6)"Legislative body" means the county legislative body or the governing body of the police interlocal entity.(5)(7)"Merit system officer" means a peace officer who has merit status as defined in this chapterpart.(6)(8)"Peace officer" means a paid deputy sheriff or law enforcement officer, other than a chief deputy or other exempt appointed officer designated by the appointing authority, who is in the continuous employ of the appointing authority.(7)(9)"Police interlocal entity" means an interlocal entity, as defined in Section 11-13-103, created:(a)under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, by an agreement to which a county of the first class is a party; and(b)to provide law enforcement service to an area that includes the unincorporated part of the county.

Section 48:
Section 48. Section 17-76-302, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-103 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-10317-76-302Effective 11/06/25. Applicability.This chapterpart applies to a county of the first class or a police interlocal entity in which a county of the first class is a party to an interlocal agreement to provide law enforcement service.

Section 49:
Section 49. Section 17-76-303, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-104 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-10417-76-303Effective 11/06/25. Subordinate peace officers appointed, reappointed.(1)The appointing authority of a county or police interlocal entity subject to this chapterpart that regularly employs one or more peace officers shall:(a)appoint a peace officer with the advice and consent of the county legislative body or police interlocal entity governing body, subject to the commission's rules and regulations of the commission;(b)appoint each subordinate peace officer;(c)fill a vacancy in the department; and(d)further promote, transfer, reassign, reappoint, demote, suspend, or remove a peace officer in accordance with the provisions of this chapterpart.(2)The commission shall adopt rules governing the appointment of peace officers through reappointment of a former employee who separated in good standing, within one year after separation.(3)A peace officer appointed before May 13, 2014, is considered to have been appointed to and hold the peace officer's position and classification pursuant toin accordance with the provisions of this chapterpart.

Section 50:
Section 50. Section 17-76-304, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-202 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-20217-76-304Effective 11/06/25. Establishment of merit commission -- Appointment, qualifications, and compensation of members.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a county subject to this chapter shall establish a merit system commission consisting of three appointed members:(i)two members appointed by the legislative body of the county; and(ii)one member appointed by the governing body of a police interlocal entity.(b)If there is no police interlocal entity within the county, the county legislative body shall appoint all three members of a commission described in Subsection (1)(a).(c)(i)Of the original appointees described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b),: (A)one member shall be appointed for a term ending February 1 of the first odd-numbered year after the date of appointment,; (B)and one eachmember shall be appointed for termsa term ending two years after the date the term ends for the member described in Subsection (1)(c)(i)(A); and (C)one member shall be appointed for a term ending four years thereafterafter the date the term ends for the member described in Subsection (1)(c)(i)(A).(ii)For a term subsequent toafter a term described in Subsection (1)(c), a commission member shall hold a term of six years.(d)If an appointed position described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b) is vacated for a cause other than expiration of the member's term, the position is filled by appointment for the unexpired portion of the term only.(2)A member of the commission:(a)shall be a resident of the state;(b)for at least five years precedingbefore the date of appointment, shall be a resident of:(i)the county; or(ii)if applicable, the area served by the police interlocal entity from which appointed; and(c)may not hold another office or employment with the county or, if applicable, in a municipality served by the police interlocal entity for which the member is appointed.(3)The county legislative body or interlocal entity governing body may: (a)compensate a member for service on the commission; and (b)reimburse the member for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties.

Section 51:
Section 51. Section 17-76-305, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-203 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-20317-76-305Effective 11/06/25. General duty -- Creation of comprehensive job classification plan -- Oaths and subpoenas -- Provide for unspecified activities.(1)The commission:(a)is responsible for carrying out the provisions of this chapter; and(b)shall make necessary rules and regulations to govern the merit system in accordance with this chapterpart, including:(i)adopting merit rules regarding:(A)appointments and registers;(B)examinations;(C)promotions;(D)reassignments;(E)reappointments;(F)disciplinary grievance procedures;(G)administrative reviews;(H)recognition of the equivalency of another merit system for the purpose of appointing a peace officer from another agency; and(I)reductions in force;(ii)adopting a rule regarding the preparation of a job classification plan; and(iii)adopting rules necessary for the efficient management of the merit system not specifically enumerated above and not inconsistent with this chapter or applicable law.(2)Upon the request of the appointing authority and after conducting a public hearing, the commission may temporarily suspend a rule if the suspension is necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapterpart.(3)(a)The commission shall formulate a comprehensive job classification plan covering all merit system officers employed by the sheriff or by the police interlocal entity.(b)The job classification plan shall:(i)place all positions requiring substantially the same duties and qualifications in the same classification;(ii)include minimum physical and educational qualifications of the applicants for each position; and(iii)provide standards for promotion.(c)If a new position is created and approved, the commission shall classify the position in the job classification plan.(4)(a)A member of the commission, in performance of commission duties, may administer oaths and subpoena witnesses and documents.(b)If an individual refuses to comply with or fails to comply with a subpoena issued by a member of the commission, the district court may, upon application by the member of the commission, compel obedience.(5)(a)A witness in a proceeding before the commission is subject to all the rights, privileges, duties, and penalties of witnesses in courts of record.(b)The commission shall pay a witness fee equivalent to those paid for a court of record.(6)The commission may adopt a rule for an activity within the purpose and spirit of this part that:(a)the commission deems is necessary and proper; and(b)not otherwise prohibited by law.

Section 52:
Section 52. Section 17-76-306, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-204 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-20417-76-306Effective 11/06/25. Organization of commission -- Support -- Offices.(1)The members of thea commission shall select one member as chair.(2)The commission shall adopt rules concerning itsthe commission's internal organization and procedures.(3)(a)The county sheriff or the chief executive of the police interlocal entity:(i)shall assign human resources staff sufficient to perform the commission's support duties; and(ii)may assign other staff to the commission with the commission's consent of the commission.(b)The county or police interlocal entity shall provide suitable accommodations, supplies, and equipment as needed to enable the commission to attend to itscommission business.(c)The county sheriff or chief executive of the police interlocal entity may, in accordance with the contracting process established by the county or police interlocal entity, contract support services to third parties.

Section 53:
Section 53. Section 17-76-307, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-302 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-30217-76-307Effective 11/06/25. Examinations -- How prepared, conducted, and graded -- Notice.(1)(a)If necessary, the commission shall give a competitive examination to determine the qualification of an applicant for a position as a merit system officer.(b)The commission shall ensure that an examination:(i)is practical in character; and(ii)relates to matters that fairly test the mental and physical ability and knowledge of an applicant to discharge the duties of the position.(c)(i)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(c)(ii), the commission shall direct the preparation, administration, and grading of the examination.(ii)The commission may direct an impartial special examiner to prepare, administer, and grade the examination on behalf of the commission.(2)(a)The commission shall publish notice of an examination internally and to the public.(b)(i)The commission shall design the notice described in Subsection (2)(a) to encourage an applicant to participate in competitive appointments.(ii)The notice shall set forthdescribe minimum qualifications, pay scale, physical and educational requirements, and passing grades.(c)The commission or the commission's designee shall promptly notify a personan applicant of the person'sapplicant's final grade.

Section 54:
Section 54. Section 17-76-308, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-303 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-30317-76-308Effective 11/06/25. Disqualification of applicant for examination -- Appeal to commission.(1)In accordance with this section and rules adopted by thea commission, the commission may disqualify an applicant may be disqualified if the applicant:(a)does not meet minimum qualifications;(b)has been convicted of a criminal offense inimical to the public service or involving moral turpitude;(c)has practiced or attempted deception or fraud in the application or examination process or in securing eligibility for appointment; or(d)is not:(i)a citizen of the United States; or(ii)a lawful permanent resident of the United States who:(A)has been in the United States legally for the five years immediately before the day on which the application is made; and(B)has legal authorization to work in the United States.(2)If an applicant is rejected, the commission shall promptly notify the applicant shall be promptly notified.(3)At any time before the day on which the examination is held, an applicant may correct a defect in the applicant's application.(4)An applicant may file a written appeal regarding the application process with the commission at any time before the day on which the examination is held.

Section 55:
Section 55. Section 17-76-309, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-304 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-30417-76-309Effective 11/06/25. Preservation and inspection of examination papers.(1)(a)Examination papers and related documents: (i)are the commission's property of the commission; and (ii)the commission shall preserve themexamination papers and related documents until the expiration of the eligible register for which an examination is given.(b)Preservation of examination papers and related documents after the time period described in Subsection (1)(a) is subject to a retention schedule adopted by the commission.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), examination papers and related documents are not open to public inspection without a court order.(b)An applicant may inspect the applicant's own papers at any time within 30 days after the commission sends notice of the applicant's grade.(c)The appointing authority may inspect the papers of any eligible applicant certified for appointment.

Section 56:
Section 56. Section 17-76-310, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-305 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-30517-76-310Effective 11/06/25. Preparation and expiration of eligible appointment register -- Appointments from eligible appointment register -- Failure to accept appointment -- Probationary period.(1)Upon completion of an examination, the commission shall prepare and adopt an eligible appointment register containing the names of applicants receiving a passing grade ranked in the order of grades earned, beginning with the highest.(2)(a)An eligible appointment register shall expire not later than two years after the date of the examination unless the commission, for good reason, extends the time not to exceed one additional year.(b)If the commission adopts a new eligible appointment register, a previous eligible appointment register for the same class or position is cancelled.(3)If the appointment of a peace officer is an appointment based on an examination, the appointing authority shall request that the commission certify eligible applicants for each position.(4)(a)The commission shall certify, to the appointing authority, a number of names equal to three times the number of allocations being filled.(b)The names of the applicants shall be ranked in order of examination score, beginning with the name of the applicant standing highest on the eligible appointment register.(5)The appointing authority shall select a person described in Subsection (4)(b) and appoint one person to each open position.(6)If a certified applicant fails to accept a proffered appointment, the applicant:(a)may request in writing that the applicant be able to retain the applicant's place on the eligible appointment register; and(b)shall provide reasons sufficient, in the judgment of the commission, to justify the applicant's failure to accept.(7)A peace officer appointed under Subsection (5) shall serve a probationary period of 12 consecutive months, during which time the officer may be discharged at the appointing authority's sole discretion.(8)(a)At the request of the appointing authority, and with the approval of the commission, the probationary period may be extended beyond 12 months for a peace officer who has not yet satisfactorily completed an approved peace officer training program and received a certificate of completion under Title 53, Chapter 6, Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.(b)At the request of the appointing authority, and with the approval of the commission, the probationary period of a peace officer may be extended beyond 12 months for good cause shown.(c)Service under a temporary or part-time appointment is not considered a part of the probationary period.(9)If a peace officer is retained in a position after the expiration of the probationary period, the peace officer's retention constitutes appointment to merit status.(10)A person removed from employment during the probationary period may not be placed on the eligible appointment register again without having passed another regular examination.(11)The commission may make or adopt policies governing probationary periods for other appointments, including the appointing or transfer of a peace officer from another jurisdiction.

Section 57:
Section 57. Section 17-76-311, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-308 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-30817-76-311Effective 11/06/25. Vacancies -- Positions requiring special qualifications -- Competition suspended -- Promotion -- Promotion register.(1)In case ofWhen there is a vacancy in a position requiring peculiar and exceptional qualifications of a scientific, professional, or expert character, andthe commission may, after a public hearing and unanimous vote by the commission, suspend competition regarding the position upon satisfactory evidence that: (a)competitioncompetitive hiring is impracticable; and (b)the position can best be filled by the selection of some designated personan individual of recognized attainments, the commission may, after a public hearing and by unanimous vote, suspend competition regarding that position.(2)The commission shall report a suspension under Subsection (1) in the commission minutes, together with the reason for suspension.(3)With the exception of an appointment made in accordance with a commission rule adopted under Subsection 17-30a-203(1)(b)(i)(H)Subsection 17-76-305(1)(b)(i)(H), a department shall fill a supervisor vacancy in the merit system classification by promotion insofar as possible.(4)(a)A department shall make a promotion only after an open competitive examination, admission to which shall be limited to merit system officers.(b)AnA promotion examination process described in Subsection (4)(a) shall include consideration of the seniority and competence of the peacemerit system officer to perform the duties required in the position for which application is made.(c)The seniority element of the promotion examination may not exceed 40% of the entire examination score.(5)(a)After a promotional examination, the commission shall prepare a promotional eligible appointment register that shall take precedence over any previously existing eligible appointment register.(b)The certified promotional eligible appointment register shall consist of three names for the initial vacancy and one more name for each additional vacancy, ranked in the order of the examination score, beginning with the highest scoring applicant.

Section 58:
Section 58. Section 17-76-312, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-310 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-31017-76-312Effective 11/06/25. Temporary and part-time appointment.(1)A department may appoint an employee to a temporary appointment for a period not exceeding 120 days within any 12 month12-month period.(2)A temporary employee is not a merit system officer and may be appointed without examination.(3)A department may appoint an employee to a part-time appointment for a period not to exceed 29 hours per week.(4)A part-time employee is not a merit system officer and may be appointed without examination.

Section 59:
Section 59. Section 17-76-313, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-311 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-31117-76-313Effective 11/06/25. Temporary layoffs -- Reappointment register.(1)Subject to Subsections (2) and (3), and if necessary, because of lack of funds or work, a department may temporarily lay off a merit system officer.(2)A department that lays off a merit system officer under Subsection (1) shall lay off the merit system officer according to the seniority of the merit system officers of the class of positions affected, following the process prescribed by commission rule.(3)A department shall lay off a personan individual serving under temporary or part-time appointment before a merit system officer.(4)(a)If a merit system officer is laid off, the department shall place the merit system officer on aan eligible reappointment register to be reappointed in the inverse order in which the officer is laid off.(b)The eligible reappointment register described in Subsection (4)(a) takes precedence over all other eligible reappointment registers.

Section 60:
Section 60. Section 17-76-314, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-309 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-30917-76-314Effective 11/06/25. Transfer and reassignment.(1)A merit system officer may be transferred, without examination, from one position to a similar position in the same class and grade within the department.(2)A merit system officer may be voluntarily reassigned, including to another class and grade, in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.

Section 61:
Section 61. Section 17-76-315, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-313 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-31317-76-315Effective 11/06/25. Vacation, sick leave, and other benefits.For merit system officers, provisions regarding vacation, sick, other leave, or any other employment condition or benefit not covered by this chapter shall be established by:(1)applicable law;(2)county ordinance or regulation; or(3)police interlocal entity rule or regulation.

Section 62:
Section 62. Section 17-76-316, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-312 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-31217-76-316Effective 11/06/25. Reappointment after temporary leave.(1)(a)Consistent with rulespolicies adopted by the commission and within the appointing authority's discretion, a merit system officer may be granted a temporary leave of absence outside the department.(b)Leave granted under Subsection (1)(a) is without pay and for a period not to exceed one year.(c)In accordance with applicable law or ordinance, the appointing authority may reappoint the merit system officer without examination at the end of the leave.(2)(a)In the event a merit system officer is elected sheriff or is appointed to any merit-exempt position in the department, the merit system officer's merit system status shall automatically be suspended for the period of time the officer remains sheriff or in a merit-exempt appointment.(b)At the end of the period of election to sheriff or suspension of merit status under Subsection (2)(a), the merit system officer shall be returned to the merit system officer's former position as a merit system officer without examination.(3)The appointing authority shall authorize any leave required by federal law.

Section 63:
Section 63. Section 17-76-317, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-402 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-40217-76-317Effective 11/06/25. Disciplinary charges and merit system officer grievances -- Appeal to commission -- Hearings -- Findings -- Appeal to district court -- Scope of review.(1)An appointing authority may demote, suspend, discharge, or reduce a merit system officer's pay for:(a)neglect of duty;(b)disobedience of a reasonable order;(c)misconduct;(d)inefficiency or inability to satisfactorily perform assigned duties; or(e)an act inimical to public service.(2)A department may not suspend a merit system officer for more than 176 work hours at one time, or for more than 352 work hours in one year.(3)The appointing authority shall order the demotion, reduction in pay, suspension, or discharge of a merit system officer.(4)The appointing authority:(a)may impose disciplinary charges in accordance with a rule, policy, ordinance, or law; and(b)shall serve the merit system officer to be disciplined with a copy of the written charges.(5)(a)A disciplined merit system officer may file an appeal of the disciplinary charges with the department, which shall conduct the appeal internally.(b)The department shall conduct an appeal in accordance with policies made by the appointing authority.(6)If the disciplinary charges are sustained on internal appeal, the merit system officer may appeal to the commission in accordance with the provisions of this section and commission policy.(7)(a)A merit system officer disciplined in accordance with Subsection (1) may, within 10 calendar days after the day on which the department makes the appeal decision described in Subsection (5), make an appeal in writing to the commission.(b)If the merit system officer fails to make an internal appeal of the disciplinary action, the merit system officer may not appeal to the commission.(8)The commission may hear appeals regarding demotion, reduction in pay, suspension, or discharge of a merit system officer for any cause provided in Subsection (1).(9)(a)The commission shall:(i)fix a time and place for a hearing on the appeal; and(ii)give notice of the hearing to the parties.(b)(i)Except as provided in Subsection (9)(b)(ii), the commission shall hold a hearing under this Subsection (9) no less than 10 and no more than 90 days after the day on which an appeal is filed.(ii)The commission may hold a hearing more than 90 days after the day on which an appeal is filed if:(A)the parties agree; or(B)the commission finds that the delay is for good cause.(c)(i)The commission shall hold the hearing in accordance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(ii)Notwithstanding Subsection (9)(c)(i), if the commission proposes to and is authorized to close the hearing to the public in accordance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, the commission shall open the meeting to the public if the aggrieved merit system officer requests that the commission open the hearing.(d)The parties may be represented by counsel at the hearing.(10)The commission, on the commission's own motion or at the request of the appointing authority, may dismiss an appeal for unjustified delay, removal to a court or other venue, or for other good cause shown.(11)In resolving an appeal, the commission may sustain, modify, or vacate a decision of the appointing authority.(12)After the hearing described in Subsection (9), the commission shall publish a written decision, including findings of fact and conclusions of law, and shall notify each party.(13)A person may appeal a final action or order of the commission to the Court of Appeals for review.(a)A person shall file a notice of appeal within 30 days of the issuance of the final action or order of the commission.(b)The Court of Appeals shall base the court's review on the record of the commission and for the purpose of determining if the commission has abused the commission's discretion or exceeded the commission's authority.

Section 64:
Section 64. Section 17-76-318, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-314 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-31417-76-318Effective 11/06/25. Prohibitions against political activities -- Penalties.(1)(a)An officer, employee, or member of a governing body of a county or a police interlocal entity, whether elected or appointed, may not directly or indirectly coerce, command, or advise a merit system officer to pay, lend, or contribute part of the merit system officer's salary or compensation or anything else of value to a party, committee, organization, agency, or person for political purpose.(b)A county or police interlocal entity officer, employee, or member of a governing body, whether elected or appointed, may not make or attempt to make a merit system officer's personnel status dependent upon the merit system officer's support or lack of support for a political party, committee, organization, agency, or person engaged in a political activity.(2)Subsection (1) does not apply to political speeches or use of mass communications media for political purposes by a personan individual where a merit system officer is present, unless the purpose and intent of the speaker is to violate this section with direct respect to those merit system officers.(3)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a merit system officer may not engage in a political activity or solicit political contributions from merit system officers during the hours of employment, or use employer resources at any time for political purposes.(b)Subsection (3)(a) does not preclude a voluntary contribution by a merit system officer to the party or candidate of the merit system officer's choice.

Section 65:
Section 65. Section 17-76-401 is enacted to read:4. Provisions Unique to Law Enforcement Officers17-76-401Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this section:(1)"Commission" means the same as that term is defined in Sections 17-76-201 and 17-76-301.(2)"Nonexempt employee" means a county employee who is nonexempt under the requirements of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1978, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.(3)"Overtime" means hours worked in excess of a nonexempt employee's work period.(4)"Regular hourly rate" means the hourly rate of pay a nonexempt employee receives for hours worked during a work period.(5)"Work period" means the maximum number of hours, within a specified number of consecutive days, that a nonexempt employee may work before the nonexempt employee is compensated for overtime.

Section 66:
Section 66. Section 17-76-402, which is renumbered from Section 17-33-11.7 is renumbered and amended to read:17-33-11.717-76-402Effective 11/06/25. Applicability -- Overtime for law enforcement personnel -- Exception.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Nonexempt employee" means an county employee who is nonexempt under the requirements of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1978, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.(b)"Overtime" means hours worked in excess of a nonexempt employee's work period.(c)"Regular hourly rate" means the hourly rate of pay a nonexempt employee receives for hours worked during a work period.(d)"Work period" means the maximum number of hours, within a specified number of consecutive days, that a nonexempt employee may work before the nonexempt employee is compensated for overtime.(2)(1)This section does not apply to a county subject to Chapter 30a, Peace Officer Merit System in Counties of the First Class ActPart 3, Peace Officer Merit System in Counties of the First Class.(3)(2)The legislative body of a county that employs a nonexempt employee engaged in law enforcement activities may, except as otherwise required by a contract or a collective bargaining agreement, enact an ordinance or pass a resolution that:(a)designates a work period for the nonexempt employee that is the same as, or equivalent to, a work period described in Subsection 63A-17-502(2); and(b)compensates the nonexempt employee for overtime at a rate of one and one-half times the nonexempt employee's regular hourly rate.

Section 67:
Section 67. Section 17-76-403, which is renumbered from Section 17-30a-502 is renumbered and amended to read:17-30a-50217-76-403Effective 11/06/25. Appointment of more than one deputy.(1)The sheriff, with the consent of the commission and the county legislative body, may appoint more than one chief deputy, deputy chief, or undersheriff.(2)In counties employing more than 100 full time uniformed peace officers, the appointing authority, with the consent of the merit commission and the county legislative body, may appoint more than one chief deputy or undersheriff.

Section 68:
Section 68. Section 17-76-501 is enacted to read:5. Firefighters' Civil Service Commission17-76-501Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this section:(1)"Council" means a county fire civil service council created in accordance with Section 17-76-502.(2)"Executive director" means a council fire civil service executive director appointed in accordance with Section 17-76-505.

Section 69:
Section 69. Section 17-76-502, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-1 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-117-76-502Effective 11/06/25. County fire civil service councils created.(1)There is created in each of the counties of this state having and maintaining a regularly organized fire department in which there are regularly employed four or more paid firefighters, a County Fire Civil Service Councilcounty fire civil service council consisting of three members to be appointed by the county executive.(2)Each member of the council shall serve for a term of three years except that the county executive shall appoint the original council members as follows:(a)one member for a period of one year;(b)one member for a period of two years; and(c)one member for a period of three years.

Section 70:
Section 70. Section 17-76-503, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-217-76-503Effective 11/06/25. Vacancies -- Compensation -- Removal from office.(1)Any vacancy occurring on the County Fire Civil Service Councilcouncil shall be filled by appointment by the county executive for the unexpired term.(2)A council member of the council may not hold, during the term of the council member's office, any other public office or be a candidate for any other public office.(3)(a)Each council member shall receive $50 for each meeting of the council attended by the council member.  (b)The county legislative body may raise the compensation of a council member as the county legislative body considers appropriate.  (c)The compensation and allowance described in Subsections (3)(a) and (b) shall be a charge against the county and paid monthly.(4)(a)In case of misconduct, willful neglect, or an inability to perform the duties of the council member's office, a council member may be removed from office by the county legislative body upon a majority vote of the county legislative body.(b)A county legislative body that moves to remove a council member from office under Subsection (4)(a) shall provide the council member with the opportunity to be heard in the council member's own defense.

Section 71:
Section 71. Section 17-76-504, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-317-76-504Effective 11/06/25. Organization of fire civil service council.(1)The County Fire Civil Service Council A council shall select one of itsthe council's members as chair.(2)The county executive shall assign a qualified employee of the county to act as secretary to the council and a qualified attorney to act as legal counsel to the council, each of which shall be acceptable to the council and shall act and serve without additional compensation.(3)The county executive shall provide suitable accommodations, equipment, and necessary funds to enable the council of its county to properly conduct itscouncil business.

Section 72:
Section 72. Section 17-76-505, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-6 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-617-76-505Effective 11/06/25. Duties of executive director -- Duties of secretary.(1)(a)Within each county subject to this chapterpart, there is created the office of executive director of County Fire Civil Servicecounty fire civil service, who shall be appointed by the county executive.(b)The executive director shall: (i)be a personan individual with proven experience in personnel management; and (ii)shall be accountable to the county executive for histhe executive director's performance in office.(c)The position of executive director shall be a merit position under Title 17, Chapter 33, County Personnel Management ActChapter 75, General County Personnel Management, and shall be recruited and selected in the same manner as the holders of other career service merit positions, with the concurrence of the County Fire Civil Service Councilcouncil.(2)The County Fire Civil ServiceAn executive director shall:(a)exercise, on behalf of the county, executive or administrative duties regarding the management and administration of the County Fire Civil Service System, including the management and administration of examinations, classification of duties, preparation of hiring registers, recommendations regarding civil service regulations and policies, and other duties provided in this chapterpart;(b)classify personsindividuals successfully passing examinations in the order of theireach individual's ascertained merit and prepare a list of themthe individuals;(c)make certification of classifications when required;(d)make, publish, and distribute necessary rules relative to examinations, classifications, and certifications as may be proper and desirable in the administration of this chapterpart;(e)establish and maintain records of employees in the County Fire Civil Service System setting forth as to each employee class, title, pay, status, and other relevant data;(f)make necessary and proper reports to the County Fire Civil Service Councilcouncil, the fire chief, or the county executive;(g)apply and carry out the provisions of this chapterpart and the policies and rules adopted under itthis part; and(h)perform other lawful acts that may be necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this chapterpart.(3)TheAn executive director shall appoint the members of and act as chair to a County Fire Civil Service Advisory Committee which shall assist the executive director in making recommendations to the county executive regarding County Fire Civil Service System rules and policies.(4)A secretary of a council shall:(a)keep a record of all council meetings, work, and official acts;(b)have custody of the council's books and records; and(c)perform other service as required by the council.(5)Each executive director shall:(a)each December, make an annual report to the county executive and the county legislative body; and(b)make other reports as required by the county executive regarding the activities of the council and County Fire Civil Service System.

Section 73:
Section 73. Section 17-76-506, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-2.4 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-2.417-76-506Effective 11/06/25. County Fire Civil Service System rules and policies.(1)The executive director shall recommend rules and policies for the County Fire Civil Service System, which shall be subject to approval by the county legislative body.(2)The County Fire Civil Service System rulespolicies shall provide for recruiting activities, including the recruiting of minorities and women, job-related minimum requirements, selection procedures, certification procedures, appointments, probationary periods, promotion, position classification, recordkeeping, reductions in force, grievances and complaints, disciplinary action, work hours, holidays, and other necessary and proper requirements not inconsistent with this chapterpart.(3)The executive director shall publish or cause to be published these rules and policies made or adopted under this section in a manual form, to be updated regularly and made available to fire department employees.(4)The County Fire Civil Service System shall be established and administered in a manner that will provide for the effective implementation of the following merit principles:(a)recruiting, selecting, and advancing employees on the basis of the employee's relative ability, knowledge, and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for initial appointment;(b)provision of equitable and adequate job classification and compensation systems, including pay and benefits programs;(c)training of employees as needed to assure high-quality performance;(d)retention of employees on the basis of the adequacy of the employee's performance and separation of employees whose inadequate performance cannot be corrected;(e)fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of personal administration without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, political affiliation, age, or disability, and with proper regard for their privacy and constitutional rights as citizens;(f)provision of information to employees regarding the employee's political rights and prohibited practices under the Hatch Act; and(g)provision of a formal procedure for processing the appeals and grievances of employees without discrimination, coercion, restraint, or reprisal.

Section 74:
Section 74. Section 17-76-507, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-517-76-507Effective 11/06/25. Appointment of county fire department personnel -- Volunteers.(1)(a)Except for the chief and deputy chief of a county fire department, all firefighter positions in county fire departments shall be filled by personsindividuals appointed from a certified county fire civil service register.(b)County fire civil service registers for employment and promotion shall be prepared by the County Fire Civil Service executive director according to the requirements of this chapterpart and civil service rulespolicies.(2)(a)The chief and the deputy chief of any county fire department may be appointed from either the certified county fire civil service register or from qualified applicants outside of the county civil service system.(b)The positions of chief and deputy chief are exempt from civil service status.(c)A chief or deputy chief who is appointed from the certified county fire civil service register shall be returned to the civil service status that hethe individual held before histhe individual's appointment after histhe individual's appointment expires or terminates.(3)(a)All personsindividuals employed as firefighters, emergency medical technicians, or a combination of firefighter and emergency medical technician,: (i)shall beare subject to the provisions of this chapterpart; and (ii)shall be members of the County Fire Civil Service System.(b)Other fire department employees who do not provide firefighter services are not considered subject to this chapterpart and shall be covered by the countywideare subject to the merit system described in Chapter 75, General County Personnel Management.(4)(a)A volunteer firefighter or paid-call firefighter is not subject to this chapterpart and is not a merit employee subject to the County Fire Civil Service System.(b)(i)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b)(ii), a volunteer or paid-call firefighter may not work more than 1,040 hours per calendar year.(ii)Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(b)(i), a wildland firefighter may work more than 1,040 hours per calendar year if approved by the county legislative body.(iii)For purposes of this Subsection (4)(b), "wildland firefighter" means a seasonally employed firefighter who does not receive the same employment benefits as a full-time employee and who is hired to suppress wildland fires in areas outside of inhabited, urban areas.

Section 75:
Section 75. Section 17-76-508, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-7 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-717-76-508Effective 11/06/25. Examinations.(1)(a)A personAn individual may not be appointed to any civil service position as a firefighter in any fire department subject to the provisions of this chapterpart until hethe firefighter has successfully passed an examination and been certified as eligible for consideration by the County Fire Civil Service executive director, except that any.(b)Any honorably discharged veteran of the United States military service shall receive preferential employment consideration for entry into the County Fire Civil Service System.(2)All examinations shall be public, competitive, and free and fairly test the ability of personsapplicants to discharge the duties of the position.

Section 76:
Section 76. Section 17-76-509, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-8 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-817-76-509Effective 11/06/25. Eligible appointees -- Certification of eligible appointees -- Probationary period.(1)The fire chief of each fire department of counties subject to the provisions of this chapterpart shall, subject to the rulespolicies of the County Fire Civil Service Councilcouncil, appoint from the certified county fire civil service register, all personsindividuals necessary to fill all firefighter civil service positions in the county fire department.(2)(a)The fire chief of each county fire department shall notify the executive director of all positions to be filled in the department when the need arises.(b)After receiving the notice described in Subsection (2)(a), the executive director shall, as soon as possible, certify from the certified county fire civil service register to the head of the fire department the appropriate number of persons, consistent with adopted rules.(3)Appointments from the certified register shall be placed on probation under conditions and for a period as prescribed by council rules.

Section 77:
Section 77. Section 17-76-510, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-10 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-1017-76-510Effective 11/06/25. Vacancies in civil service positions.Any vacancy occurring in any county fire civil service position in any county fire department subject to this chapterpart shall be filled by an employee of the department having a lesser, equal, or superior position than that in which the vacancy occurs if that employee submits himself to examination for the position, is found qualified, and is certified by the County Fire Civil Service executive director as provided in this chapterpart.

Section 78:
Section 78. Section 17-76-511, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-11 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-1117-76-511Effective 11/06/25. Temporary work -- Term or period.(1)Subject to Subsection (2), the head of any county fire department coming within the provisions of this actpart may, with the advice and consent of the county legislative body, appoint to any position or place of employment in the fire department, any personindividual for temporary work without making the appointment from the certified civil service list.(2)An appointment described in Subsection (1) may not be longer than one month in the aggregate in the same calendar year.

Section 79:
Section 79. Section 17-76-512, which is renumbered from Section 17-28-12 is renumbered and amended to read:17-28-1217-76-512Effective 11/06/25. Removal from office and disciplinary action -- Appeals -- Hearing and determination -- Findings -- Appeal to district court.(1)Any personAn individual holding a position under this chapterpart may be removed from office or employment, reduced in rank or grade, or otherwise disciplined by the fire chief for: (a)misconduct,; (b)incompetency,; (c)failure to perform the duties of his employment duties;(d)orfailure to properly observe the rules of the office or department in which hethe individual is employed,; or (e)for other cause, as set out in County Fire Civil Service Council rulescouncil policies.(2)(a)Any such disciplinary action described in Subsection (1) is subject to appeal in all cases by the aggrieved party to the County Fire Civil Service Councilcouncil in the manner established by rule. (b)After an appeal described in Subsection (2)(a) is filed the council shall, as soon as practicable, hear and determine the matter.(3)(a)If itthe council determines that it is in the best interest of the county, the county legislative body may appoint an administrative law judge, trained and experienced in personnel matters, to initially hear the matter. (b)Upon hearing, the administrative law judge shall make findings of fact and a recommendation to the council. (c)The council may: (i)adopt or reject the recommendation of the administrative law judge; or (ii)request that the administrative law judge hold further factual hearings prior to the council's decision.(4)The council may then affirm, modify, vacate, or set aside the order for disciplinary action.(5)The aggrieved party shall, upon demand, be granted a public hearing, at which hethe aggrieved party may appear in person or by counsel or both.(6)(a)After the hearing, the findings and determination of the County Fire Civil Service Councilcouncil shall be certified to the head of the county fire department from whose order the appeal is taken. (b)Notice in writing of the determination of the council shall be served upon the personindividual affected.(7)The council determination shall be enforced and followed by the head of the fire department until an appeal is taken to the district court by any affected personindividual.(8)(a)An individual aggrieved by a determination of the council described in Subsection (6) may, within 30 days after notice of the council's determination, file an action in the district court of the county or in the county of the aggrieved individual's residence, against the council in the council's official capacity, setting out the individual's grievance and right to complain.(b)In the council's answer to the complaint described in Subsection (8)(a), the council may set out any matter in justification.(9)The court shall determine the issues of both questions of law and fact and may affirm, set aside, or modify the council ruling.

Section 80:
Section 80. Section 17-77-101, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-102 is renumbered and amended to read:77. Local Health and Human Service1. General Provisions17-43-10217-77-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Assisted outpatient treatment" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-301.(2)"Crisis worker" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-610.(3)"Department" means the Department of Health and Human Services created in Section 26B-1-201.(2)(4)"Division" means the Division of Integrated Healthcare within the department.(3)(5)"First responder" means:(a)a law enforcement officer, as that term is defined in Section 53-13-103;(b)emergency medical service personnel, as that term is defined in Section 53-2d-101;(c)an emergency medical technician, as that term is defined in Section 53-2e-101;(d)an advanced emergency medical technician, as that term is defined in Section 53-2e-101;(e)a firefighter, as that term is defined in Section 53B-8c-102;(f)a dispatcher, as that term is defined in Section 53-6-102; or(g)a mobile outreach social worker.(6)"Local mental health crisis line" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-610.(7)"Mental health therapist" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-60-102.(8)"Public funds":(a)means:(i)federal money received from the department;(ii)state money appropriated by the Legislature to the department, a county governing body, or a local substance abuse authority for the purposes of providing substance abuse programs or services; and(iii)state money appropriated by the Legislature to the department, a county governing body, or a local mental health authority for the purposes of providing mental health programs or services; and(b)includes federal and state money described in Subsection (8)(a):(i)even after the money has been transferred by:(A)a local substance abuse authority to a private provider under an annual or otherwise ongoing contract to provide comprehensive substance abuse programs or services for the local substance abuse authority; or(B)a local mental health authority to a private provider under an annual or otherwise ongoing contract to provide comprehensive mental health programs or services for the local mental health authority; and(ii)while in the possession of the private provider.(9)"Statewide mental health crisis line" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-610.

Section 81:
Section 81. Section 17-77-102, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-313 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-31317-77-102Effective 11/06/25. Provisions for general health -- Creation of local health department.Each county shall:(1)make provisions for the preservation of health in the county and pay the related expenses; and(2)create a local health department as provided in Title 26A, Chapter 1, Part 1, Local Health Department Act.

Section 82:
Section 82. Section 17-77-103, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-318 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-31817-77-103Effective 11/06/25. Mental health and substance use services.Each county shall provide mental health and substance use services in accordance with Title 26B, Chapter 5, Health Care - Substance Use and Mental Health.

Section 83:
Section 83. Section 17-77-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-201 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Local Substance Abuse Authorities17-43-20117-77-201Effective 11/06/25. Local substance abuse authorities -- Responsibilities.(1)(a)(i)In each county other than a county described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii) or (iii), the county legislative body is the local substance abuse authority.(ii)In each county operating under a county executive-council form of government under Section 17-52a-20317-62-203, the county legislative body is the local substance abuse authority, provided howeverexcept that the county executive administers any contract for plan services shall be administered by the county executive.(ii)(iii)In each county operating under a council-manager form of government under Section 17-52a-20417-62-204, the county manager is the local substance abuse authority.(iii)In each county other than a county described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) or (ii), the county legislative body is the local substance abuse authority.(b)Within legislative appropriations and county matching funds required by this section, and under the direction of the division, each local substance abuse authority shall:(i)develop substance use prevention and treatment services plans;(ii)provide substance use services to residents of the county; and(iii)cooperate with the division's efforts of the division to promote integrated programs that address an individual's substance use, mental health, and physical healthcare needs, as described in Section 26B-5-102.(c)Within legislative appropriations and county matching funds required by this section, each local substance abuse authority shall cooperate with the department's efforts of the department to promote a system of care, as defined in Section 26B-5-101, for minors with or at risk for complex emotional and behavioral needs, as described in Section 26B-5-101.(2)(a)By executing an interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, two or more counties may join to:(i)provide substance use prevention and treatment services; or(ii)create a united local health department that provides substance use treatment services, mental health services, and local health department services in accordance with Subsection (3).(b)The legislative bodies of counties joining to provide services may establish acceptable ways of apportioning the cost of substance use services.(c)Each agreement for joint substance use services shall:(i)(A)designate the county treasurer of one of the participating counties, or another personindividual as the treasurer, for the combined substance abuse authorities and as the custodian of money available for the joint services; and(B)provide that the designated treasurer, or other disbursing officer authorized by the treasurer, may make payments from the money for the joint services upon audit of the appropriate auditing officer or officers representing the participating counties;(ii)provide for the appointment of an independent auditor or a county auditor of one of the participating counties as the designated auditing officer for the combined substance abuse authorities;(iii)(A)provide for the appointment of the county attorney or district attorney of one of the participating counties as the designated legal officer for the combined substance abuse authorities; and(B)authorize the designated legal officer designated under Subsection (2)(c)(iii)(A) to request and receive the assistance of the county or district attorneys of the other participating counties in defending or prosecuting actions within their counties relating to the combined substance abuse authorities; and(iv)provide for the adoption of management, clinical, financial, procurement, personnel, and administrative policies as already established by one of the participating counties or as approved by the legislative body of each participating county or interlocal board.(d)An agreement for joint substance use services may provide for: (i)joint operation of services and facilities; or (ii)for operation of services and facilities under contract by one participating local substance abuse authority for other participating local substance abuse authorities.(3)(a)A county governing body may elect to combine the local substance abuse authority with: (i)the local mental health authority created in Part 3, Local Mental Health Authorities, and; or (ii)the local health department created in Title 26A, Chapter 1, Part 1, Local Health Department Act, to create a united local health department under Section 26A-1-105.5. (b)A local substance abuse authority that joins a united local health department shall comply with this part.(4)(a)Each local substance abuse authority is accountable to the department and the state with regard to the use of state and federal funds received from those departmentsthe department for substance use services, regardless of whether the services are provided by a private contract provider.(b)(i)Each local substance abuse authority shall comply, and require compliance by itsthe local substance abuse authority's contract provider, with all directives issued by the department regarding the use and expenditure of state and federal funds received from those departmentsthe department for the purpose of providing substance use programs and services.  (ii)The department shall: (A)ensure that those directives issued by the department described in Subsection (4)(b)(i) are not duplicative or conflicting,; and (B)shall consult and coordinate with local substance abuse authorities with regard to programs and services.(5)Each local substance abuse authority shall:(a)review and evaluate substance use prevention and treatment needs and services, including substance use needs and services for individualsan individual incarcerated in a county jail or other county correctional facility;(b)annually prepare and submit to the division a plan approved by the county legislative body for funding and service delivery that includes:(i)provisions for services, either directly by the substance abuse authority or by contract, for adults, youth, and children, including those incarcerated in a county jail or other county correctional facility;(ii)primary prevention, targeted prevention, early intervention, and treatment services; and(iii)in a form and format usable by a first responder, an inclusive list of providers of substance use services available for individuals within the local substance abuse authority's jurisdiction;(c)establish and maintain, either directly or by contract, programs licensed under Title 26B, Chapter 2, Part 1, Human Services Programs and Facilities;(d)appoint directly or by contract a full or part time director for substance use programs, and prescribe the director's duties;(e)provide input and comment on new and revised rules established by the division;(f)establish and require contract providers to establish administrative, clinical, procurement, personnel, financial, and management policies regarding substance use services and facilities, in accordance with the rules of the division, and state and federal law;(g)establish mechanisms allowing for direct citizen input;(h)annually contract with the division to provide substance use programs and services in accordance with the provisions of Title 26B, Chapter 5, Health Care - Substance Use and Mental Health;(i)comply with all applicable state and federal: (i)statutes,; (ii)policies,; (iii)audit requirements,; (iv)contract requirements,; and (v)any directives resulting from those audits and contract requirements;(j)promote or establish programs for the prevention of substance use within the community setting through community-based prevention programs;(k)provide funding equal to at least 20% of the state funds that it receives to fund services described in the plan;(l)comply with the requirements and procedures of: (i)Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act,; (ii)Title 17B, Chapter 1, Part 6, Fiscal Procedures for Special Districts,; and (iii)Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act;(m)for persons convicted of driving under the influence in violation of Section 41-6a-502 or 41-6a-517, conduct the following as defined in Section 41-6a-501:(i)a screening;(ii)an assessment;(iii)an educational series; and(iv)substance abuse treatment; and(n)utilize proceeds of the accounts described in Subsection 26B-5-209(1) to supplement the cost of providing the services described in Subsection (5)(m).(6)Before disbursing any public funds, each local substance abuse authority shall require that each entity that receives any public funds from the local substance abuse authority agrees in writing that:(a)the entity's financial records and other records relevant to the entity's performance of the services provided to the local substance abuse authority shall be subject to examination by:(i)the division;(ii)the local substance abuse authority director;(iii)(A)the county treasurer and county attorney or district attorney; or(B)if two or more counties jointly provide substance use services under an agreement under Subsection (2), the designated treasurer and the designated legal officer;(iv)the county legislative body; and(v)in a county with a county executive that is separate from the county legislative body, the county executive;(b)the county auditor may examine and audit the entity's financial and other records relevant to the entity's performance of the services provided to the local substance abuse authority; and(c)the entity will comply with the provisions of Subsection (4)(b).(7)(a)A local substance abuse authority may receive for substance abuse services:(i)property,; (ii)grants,; (iii)gifts,; (iv)supplies,; (v)materials,; (vi)contributions,; and (vii)any benefit derived therefrom, for substance abuse servicesfrom the items described in Subsections (7)(a)(i) through (vi).  (b)If those giftsan item described in Subsections (7)(a)(i) through (vi) are conditioned upon theirthe item's use for a specified service or program, theythe item shall be so used.(8)(a)As used in this section, "public funds" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-43-203.(b)Public funds received for the provision of services pursuant toin accordance with the local substance abuse plan may not be used for any other purpose except those authorized in the contract between the local substance abuse authority and the provider for the provision of plan services.(9)Subject to the requirements of the federal Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment Block Grant, Pub. L. No. 102-321, a local substance abuse authority shall ensure that all substance use treatment programs that receive public funds:(a)accept and provide priority for admission to a pregnant woman or a pregnant minor; and(b)if admission of a pregnant woman or a pregnant minor is not possible within 24 hours of the time that a request for admission is made, provide a comprehensive referral for interim services that:(i)are accessible to the pregnant woman or pregnant minor;(ii)are best suited to provide services to the pregnant woman or pregnant minor;(iii)may include:(A)counseling;(B)case management; or(C)a support group; and(iv)shall include a referral for:(A)prenatal care; and(B)counseling on the effects of alcohol and drug use during pregnancy.(10)If a substance use treatment program described in Subsection (9) is not able to accept and admit a pregnant woman or pregnant minor under Subsection (9) within 48 hours of the time that request for admission is made, the local substance abuse authority shall contact the Division of Integrated Healthcare for assistance in providing services to the pregnant woman or pregnant minor.

Section 84:
Section 84. Section 17-77-202, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-202 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-20217-77-202Effective 11/06/25. Requirements for distributing public funds.(1)Each local substance abuse authority shall award all public funds in accordance with this section and in compliance with:(a)the requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code; or(b)a county procurement ordinance that requires similar procurement practicesadopted under Section 17-63-506.(2)(a)If all initial bids on the project are rejected, the local substance abuse authority shall publish a new invitation to bid.  (b)If no satisfactory bid is received by the local substance abuse authority when the bids received from the second invitation are opened, the local substance abuse authority may execute a contract without requiring competitive bidding.(3)A local substance abuse authority need notis not required to comply with the procurement provisions of this section when itthe local substance abuse authority disburses public funds to: (a)another political subdivision of the state; or (b)an institution of higher education of the state.(4)(a)Each contract awarded by a local substance abuse authority shall be for a fixed amount and limited period.  (b)A local substance abuse authority may modify a contract may be modified due to changes in available funding for the same contract purpose without competition.

Section 85:
Section 85. Section 17-77-203, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-203 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-20317-77-203Effective 11/06/25. Use and oversight of public funds.(1)As used in this section, "public funds":(a)means:(i)federal money received from the Department of Health and Human Services; and(ii)state money appropriated by the Legislature to the Department of Health and Human Services, a county governing body, or a local substance abuse authority for the purposes of providing substance abuse programs or services; and(b)includes that federal and state money:(i)even after the money has been transferred by a local substance abuse authority to a private provider under an annual or otherwise ongoing contract to provide comprehensive substance abuse programs or services for the local substance abuse authority; and(ii)while in the possession of the private provider.(2)(1)(a)Each local substance abuse authority is responsible for oversight ofoverseeing all public funds received by itthe local substance abuse authority receives, to determine that those public funds are utilized in accordance with: (i)federal and state law,; (ii)the rules and policies of the Department of Health and Human Services,department; and (iii)the provisions of any contract between the local substance abuse authority and the Department of Health and Human Servicesdepartment or a private provider.  (b)ThatLocal substance abuse authority oversight includes requiring that neither the contract provider, as described in Subsection (1)a private provider that contracts with the local substance abuse authority to provide comprehensive substance abuse programs or services for the local substance abuse authority, nor any of itsthe private provider's employees:(a)(i)violate any applicable federal or state criminal law;(b)(ii)knowingly violate: (A)any applicable department rule or policy of the Department of Health and Human Services, or knowingly violate; or(B)any provision of a contract between the local substance abuse authority and the Department of Health and Human Servicesdepartment or the private provider;(c)(iii)knowingly: (A)keep any false account; or (B)make any false entry or erasure in any account of or relating to the public funds;(d)(iv)fraudulently alter, falsify, conceal, destroy, or obliterate any account of or relating to public funds;(e)(v)fail to ensure competent oversight for lawful disbursement of public funds;(f)(vi)appropriate public funds for an unlawful use or for a use that is not in compliancedoes not comply with contract provisions; or(g)(vii)knowingly or intentionally use public funds: (A)unlawfully or; (B)in violation of a governmental contract provision,; or (C)in violation of state policy.(3)(2)EachA local substance abuse authority that knows or reasonably should know of any of the circumstances described in Subsection (2)(1), and that fails or refuses to take timely corrective action in good faith shall, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be required to make full and complete repayment to the state of all public funds improperly used or expended.(4)(3)Any public funds required to be repaid to the state by a local substance abuse authority under Subsection (3)(2), based upon the actions or failure of the contract provider, may be recovered by the local substance abuse authority from itsthe contract provider, in addition to the local substance abuse authority's costs and attorney'sattorney fees.

Section 86:
Section 86. Section 17-77-204, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-204 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-20417-77-204Effective 11/06/25. Fees for substance abuse services -- Responsibility for cost of service to nonresident -- Funds from other sources.(1)Each local substance abuse authority shall charge a fee for substance use services, except that substance use services may not be refused to any personindividual because of inability to pay.(2)If a local substance abuse authority, through itsa designated provider, provides a service described in Subsection 17-43-201(5)Section 17-77-201 to a personan individual who resides within the jurisdiction of another local substance abuse authority, the local substance abuse authority in whose jurisdiction the personindividual resides is responsible for the cost of that service if itsthat local substance abuse authority's designated provider has authorized the provision of thatthe service.(3)A local substance abuse authority, and entities that contract with a local substance abuse authority to provide substance use services, may receive funds made available by federal, state, or local health, substance use, mental health, education, welfare, or other agencies, in accordance with the provisions of this part and Title 26B, Chapter 5, Health Care - Substance Use and Mental Health.

Section 87:
Section 87. Section 17-77-205, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-205 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-20517-77-205Effective 11/06/25. Registration as a limited purpose entity.(1)Each local substance abuse authority shall register and maintain the local substance abuse authority's registration as a limited purpose entity, in accordance with Section 67-1a-15.(2)A local substance abuse authority that fails to comply with Subsection (1) or Section 67-1a-15 is subject to enforcement by the state auditor, in accordance with Section 67-3-1.

Section 88:
Section 88. Section 17-77-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-301 is renumbered and amended to read:3. Local Mental Health Authorities17-43-30117-77-301Effective 11/06/25. Local mental health authorities -- Responsibilities.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Assisted outpatient treatment" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-301.(b)"Crisis worker" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-610.(c)"Local mental health crisis line" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-610.(d)"Mental health therapist" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-60-102.(e)"Public funds" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-43-303.(f)"Statewide mental health crisis line" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-610.(2)(1)(a)(i)In each county other than a county described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii) or (iii), the county legislative body is the local mental health authority.(ii)In each county operating under a county executive-council form of government under Section 17-52a-20317-62-203, the county legislative body is the local mental health authority, provided howeverexcept that the county executive administers any contract for plan services shall be administered by the county executive.(ii)(iii)In each county operating under a council-manager form of government under Section 17-52a-20417-62-204, the county manager is the local mental health authority.(iii)In each county other than a county described in Subsection (2)(a)(i) or (ii), the county legislative body is the local mental health authority.(b)Within legislative appropriations and county matching funds required by this section, under the direction of the division, each local mental health authority shall:(i)provide mental health services to individuals within the county; and(ii)cooperate with the division's efforts of the division to promote integrated programs that address an individual's substance use, mental health, and physical healthcare needs, as described in Section 26B-5-102.(c)Within legislative appropriations and county matching funds required by this section, each local mental health authority shall cooperate with the department's efforts of the department to promote a system of care, as defined in Section 26B-5-101, for minors with or at risk for complex emotional and behavioral needs, as described in Section 26B-5-101.(3)(2)(a)By executing an interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, two or more counties may join to:(i)provide mental health prevention and treatment services; or(ii)create a united local health department that combines substance use treatment services, mental health services, and local health department services in accordance with Subsection (4)(3).(b)The legislative bodies of counties joining to provide services may establish acceptable ways of apportioning the cost of mental health services.(c)Each agreement for joint mental health services shall:(i)(A)designate the county treasurer of one of the participating counties or another personindividual as the treasurer for the combined mental health authorities and as the custodian of money available for the joint services; and(B)provide that the designated county treasurer, or other disbursing officer authorized by the designated county treasurer, may make payments from the money available for the joint services upon audit of the appropriate auditing officer or officerscounty auditor representing the participating counties;(ii)provide for the appointment of an independent auditor or a county auditor of one of the participating counties as the designated auditing officer for the combined mental health authorities;(iii)(A)provide for the appointment of the county attorney or district attorney of one of the participating counties as the designated legal officer for the combined mental health authorities; and(B)authorize the designated legal officer to request and receive the assistance of the county or district attorneys of the other participating counties in defending or prosecuting actions within their counties relating to the combined mental health authorities; and(iv)provide for the adoption of management, clinical, financial, procurement, personnel, and administrative policies as already established by one of the participating counties or as approved by the legislative body of each participating county or interlocal board.(d)An agreement for joint mental health services may provide for:(i)joint operation of services and facilities or for operation of services and facilities under contract by one participating local mental health authority for other participating local mental health authorities; and(ii)allocation of appointments of members of the mental health advisory council between or among participating counties.(4)(3)(a)A county governing body may elect to combine the local mental health authority with: (i)the local substance abuse authority created in Part 2, Local Substance Abuse Authorities, and; or (ii)the local health department created in Title 26A, Chapter 1, Part 1, Local Health Department Act, to create a united local health department under Section 26A-1-105.5. (b)A local mental health authority that joins with a united local health department shall comply with this part.(5)(4)(a)Each local mental health authority is accountable to the department and the state with regard to the use of state and federal funds received from those departmentsthe department for mental health services, regardless of whether the services are provided by a private contract provider.(b)(i)Each local mental health authority shall comply, and require compliance by itsthe local mental health authority's contract provider, with all directives issued by the department regarding the use and expenditure of state and federal funds received from those departmentsthe department for the purpose of providing mental health programs and services.  (ii)The department shall: (A)ensure that those directives issued by the department described in Subsection (4)(b)(i) are not duplicative or conflicting,; and (B)shall consult and coordinate with local mental health authorities with regard to programs and services.(6)(5)(a)Each local mental health authority shall:(i)review and evaluate mental health needs and services, including mental health needs and services for:(A)an individual incarcerated in a county jail or other county correctional facility; and(B)an individual who is a resident of the county and who is court ordered to receive assisted outpatient treatment under Section 26B-5-351;(ii)in accordance with Subsections (6)(b)(5)(b) and (c), annually prepare and submit to the division a plan approved by the county legislative body for mental health funding and service delivery, either directly by the local mental health authority or by contract;(iii)establish and maintain, either directly or by contract, programs licensed under Title 26B, Chapter 2, Part 1, Human Services Programs and Facilities;(iv)appoint, directly or by contract, a full-time or part-time director for mental health programs and prescribe the director's duties;(v)provide input and comment on new and revised rules established by the division;(vi)establish and require contract providers to establish administrative, clinical, personnel, financial, procurement, and management policies regarding mental health services and facilities, in accordance with the rules of the division, and state and federal law;(vii)establish mechanisms allowing for direct citizen input;(viii)annually contract with the division to provide mental health programs and services in accordance with the provisions of Title 26B, Chapter 5, Health Care - Substance Use and Mental Health;(ix)comply with all applicable state and federal: (A)statutes,; (B)policies,; (C)audit requirements,; (D)contract requirements,; and (E)any directives resulting from those audits and contract requirements;(x)provide funding equal to at least 20% of the state funds that it receives to fund services described in the plan;(xi)comply with the requirements and procedures of: (A)Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act,; (B)Title 17B, Chapter 1, Part 6, Fiscal Procedures for Special Districts,; and (C)Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act;(xii)take and retain physical custody of minors committed to the physical custody of local mental health authorities by a judicial proceeding under Title 26B, Chapter 5, Part 4, Commitment of Persons Under Age 18; and(xiii)cooperate with the Department of Corrections to complete the requirements described in Subsection 64-13-21(8)Section 64-14-204.(b)Each plan under Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(5)(a)(ii) shall include services for adults, youth, and children, which shall include:(i)inpatient care and services;(ii)residential care and services;(iii)outpatient care and services;(iv)24-hour crisis care and services;(v)psychotropic medication management;(vi)psychosocial rehabilitation, including vocational training and skills development;(vii)case management;(viii)community supports, including: (A)in-home services,; (B)housing,; (C)family support services,; and (D)respite services;(ix)consultation and education services, including: (A)case consultation,; and(B)collaboration with other county service agencies, public education, and public information;(x)services to individualsan individual incarcerated in a county jail or other county correctional facility; and(xi)services to individualsan individual described in Subsection 64-13-21(8)(a)64-14-204(8)(a).(c)Each plan under Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(5)(a)(ii) shall include, in a form and format usable by a first responder, an inclusive list of providers of mental health services for individuals within the local mental health authority's jurisdiction.(7)(6)(a)If a local mental health authority provides for a local mental health crisis line under the plan for 24-hour crisis care and services described in Subsection (6)(b)(iv)(5)(b)(iv), the local mental health authority shall:(i)collaborate with the statewide mental health crisis line described in Section 26B-5-610;(ii)ensure that each individual who answers calls to the local mental health crisis line:(A)is a mental health therapist or a crisis worker; and(B)meets the standards of care and practice established by the Division of Integrated Healthcare, in accordance with Section 26B-5-610; and(iii)ensure that when necessary, based on the local mental health crisis line's capacity, calls are immediately routed to the statewide mental health crisis line to ensure that when an individual calls the local mental health crisis line, regardless of the time, date, or number of individuals trying to simultaneously access the local mental health crisis line, a mental health therapist or a crisis worker answers the call without the caller first:(A)waiting on hold; or(B)being screened by an individual other than a mental health therapist or crisis worker.(b)If a local mental health authority does not provide for a local mental health crisis line under the plan for 24-hour crisis care and services described in Subsection (6)(b)(iv)(5)(b)(iv), the local mental health authority shall use the statewide mental health crisis line as a local crisis line resource.(8)(7)Before disbursing any public funds, each local mental health authority shall require that each entity that receives any public funds from a local mental health authority agrees in writing that:(a)the entity's financial records and other records relevant to the entity's performance of the services provided to the mental health authority shall be subject to examination by:(i)the division;(ii)the local mental health authority director;(iii)(A)the county treasurer and county or district attorney; or(B)if two or more counties jointly provide mental health services under an agreement under Subsection (3)(2), the designated treasurer and the designated legal officer;(iv)the county legislative body; and(v)in a county with a county executive that is separate from the county legislative body, the county executive;(b)the county auditor may examine and audit the entity's financial and other records relevant to the entity's performance of the services provided to the local mental health authority; and(c)the entity will comply with the provisions of Subsection (5)(b)(4)(b).(9)(8)(a)A local mental health authority may receive for mental health services:(i)property,; (ii)grants,; (iii)gifts,; (iv)supplies,; (v)materials,; (vi)contributions,; and (vii)any benefit derived therefrom, for mental health servicesfrom the items described in Subsections (8)(a)(i) through (vi).  (b)If those giftsthe items described in Subsections (8)(a)(i) through (vi) are conditioned upon their use for a specified service or program, they shall be so used.(10)(9)Public funds received for the provision of services pursuant toin accordance with the local mental health plan may not be used for any other purpose except those authorized in the contract between the local mental health authority and the provider for the provision of plan services.(11)(10)A local mental health authority shall: (a)provide assisted outpatient treatment services to a resident of the county who has been ordered under Section 26B-5-351 to receive assisted outpatient treatment; and(b)to the extent feasible, coordinate with the Department of Corrections to ensure the continuity of mental health services for county residents who are on probation or parole.

Section 89:
Section 89. Section 17-77-302, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-302 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-30217-77-302Effective 11/06/25. Requirements for distributing public funds.(1)Each local mental health authority shall award all public funds by complyingin accordance with this section and in compliance with: (a)the requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code,; or (b)by complying with a county procurement ordinance which requires similar procurement practicesadopted under Section 17-63-506.(2)(a)If the local mental health authority rejects all initial bids on the project are rejected, the local mental health authority shall publish a new invitation to bid in the manner specified in this section.  (b)If nothe local mental health authority does not receive a satisfactory bid is received by the authority when the bids received from the second invitation are opened, the local mental health authority may execute a contract without requiring competitive bidding.(3)The local mental health authority need notis not required to comply with the procurement provisions of this section when itthe local mental health authority disburses public funds to: (a)another political subdivision of the state; or (b)an institution of higher education of the state.(4)(a)Each contract awarded by a local mental health authority shall be for a fixed amount and limited period.  (b)A contract may be modified due to changes in available funding for the same contract purpose without competition.

Section 90:
Section 90. Section 17-77-303, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-303 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-30317-77-303Effective 11/06/25. Use and oversight of public funds.(1)As used in this section, "public funds":(a)means:(i)federal money received from the department or the Department of Health and Human Services; and(ii)state money appropriated by the Legislature to the department, the Department of Health and Human Services, a county governing body, or a local mental health authority for the purposes of providing mental health programs or services; and(b)includes that federal and state money:(i)even after the money has been transferred by a local mental health authority to a private provider under an annual or otherwise ongoing contract to provide  comprehensive mental health programs or services for the local mental health authority; and(ii)while in the possession of the private provider.(2)(1)(a)Each local mental health authority is responsible for oversight ofoverseeing all public funds received by itthe local mental health authority receives, to determine that those public funds are utilized in accordance with: (i)federal and state law,; (ii)the rules and policies of the department and the Department of Health and Human Services,; and (iii)the provisions of any contract between the local mental health authority and the department, the Department of Health and Human Services, or a private provider.  (b)ThatThe local mental health authority oversight includes requiring that neither the contract provider, as described in Subsection (1)a private provider that contracts with the local mental health authority to provide comprehensive mental health programs or services for the local mental health authority, nor any of itsthe private provider's employees:(a)(i)violate any applicable federal or state criminal law;(b)(ii)knowingly violate: (A)any applicable department rule or policy of the department or Department of Health and Human Services,; or (B)any provision of contract between the local mental health authority and the department, the Department of Health and Human Services, or the private provider;(c)(iii)knowingly keep any false account or make any false entry or erasure in any account of or relating to the public funds;(d)(iv)fraudulently alter, falsify, conceal, destroy, or obliterate any account of or relating to public funds;(e)(v)fail to ensure competent oversight for lawful disbursement of public funds;(f)(vi)appropriate public funds for an unlawful use or for a use that is not in compliance with contract provisions; or(g)(vii)knowingly or intentionally use public funds: (A)unlawfully or; (B)in violation of a governmental contract provision,; or (C)in violation of state policy.(3)(2)A local mental health authority that knew or reasonably should have known of any of the circumstances described in Subsection (2)(1), and that fails or refuses to take timely corrective action in good faith shall, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be required to make full and complete repayment to the state of all public funds improperly used or expended.(4)(3)Any public funds required to be repaid to the state by a local mental health authority pursuant toin accordance with Subsection (3)(2), based upon the actions or failure of the contract provider, may be recovered by the local mental health authority from its contract provider, in addition to the local mental health authority's costs and attorney fees.

Section 91:
Section 91. Section 17-77-304, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-304 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-30417-77-304Effective 11/06/25. Contracts for mental health services provided by local mental health authorities.If a local mental health authority has established a plan to provide services authorized by this part, and those services meet standards fixed by rules of the division, the local mental health authority may enter into a contract with the division for thosemental health services to be furnished by that local mental health authority for an agreed compensation to be paid by the division.

Section 92:
Section 92. Section 17-77-305, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-306 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-30617-77-305Effective 11/06/25. Fees for mental health services -- Responsibility for cost of services to nonresident -- Authority may receive funds from other sources.(1)Each local mental health authority shall charge a fee for mental health services, except that mental health services may not be refused to any personindividual because of inability to pay.(2)If a local mental health authority, through itsa designated provider, provides a service described in Section 17-43-30117-77-301 to a personan individual who resides within the jurisdiction of another local mental health authority, the local mental health authority in whose jurisdiction the personindividual resides is responsible for the cost of that service if itsthat local mental health authority's designated provider has authorized the provision of thatthe service.(3)A local mental health authority, and entities that contract with a local mental health authority to provide mental health services, may receive funds made available by federal, state, or local health, substance use, mental health, education, welfare, or other agencies, in accordance with the provisions of this part and Title 26B, Chapter 5, Health Care - Substance Use and Mental Health.

Section 93:
Section 93. Section 17-77-306, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-308 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-30817-77-306Effective 11/06/25. Specified treatments prohibited -- Criminal penalties.(1)It is a class B misdemeanor to give shock treatment, lobotomy, or surgery to anyone without the written consent of the person'sindividual's next of kin or legal guardian. Services provided under this part are governed by Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act.(2)It is a felony to give psychiatric treatment, nonvocational mental health counseling, case-finding testing, psychoanalysis, drugs, shock treatment, lobotomy, or surgery to any individual for the purpose of changing his concept of, belief about, or faith in God.(3)Services provided under this part are governed by Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act.

Section 94:
Section 94. Section 17-77-307, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-309 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-30917-77-307Effective 11/06/25. Local mental health advisory councils -- Powers and responsibilities.(1)A county legislative body may, separately or in conjunction with one or more other counties, establish a local mental health advisory council.(2)If a county legislative body establishes a local mental health advisory council, the local mental health advisory council shall comply with this section.(3)(a)MentalLocal mental health advisory council members shall be appointed by their respective county legislative bodies.  (b)Initially one-fourth Initial appointment of the members of the local mental health advisory council shall be appointed: (i)one-fourth for one year,; (ii)one-fourth for two years,; (iii)one-fourth for three years,; and (iv)one-fourth for four years.  (c)(i)After the initial appointment described in Subsection (3)(b), the term of each local mental health advisory council member shall be for four years.  (ii)Vacancies for a local mental health advisory council member shall be filled in the same manner as for unexpired terms.  (iii)CouncilThe county legislative body may remove local mental health advisory council members may be removed for cause.(3)(4)Each local mental health advisory council shall be responsible and advisory to local mental health authorities in planning, organizing, and operating community mental health programs.(4)(5)CouncilLocal mental health advisory council members shall be selected from persons representative of interested groups in the community, including, if possible:(a)an officer or employee of the school district within the city or county;(b)one or more personsindividuals familiar with problems in mental health, as these are involved in proceedings in criminal, domestic, or juvenile courts;(c)one or more members of voluntary health, welfare, or mental health associations or agencies;(d)a member of the legislative body of each participating county; and(e)at least one personindividual: (i)licensed in this state to practice medicine and surgery in all their branches; and (ii)engaged in the private practice of medicine.(5)(6)CouncilLocal mental health advisory council members may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties, from funds made available to local mental health authorities.(6)(7)Each local mental health advisory council shall be: (a)an agent of the local mental health authority,; and (b)is subject to laws and requirements relating to the local mental health authority.

Section 95:
Section 95. Section 17-77-308, which is renumbered from Section 17-43-310 is renumbered and amended to read:17-43-31017-77-308Effective 11/06/25. Registration as a limited purpose entity.(1)Each local mental health authority shall register and maintain the local mental health authority's registration as a limited purpose entity, in accordance with Section 67-1a-15.(2)A local mental health authority that fails to comply with Subsection (1) or Section 67-1a-15 is subject to enforcement by the state auditor, in accordance with Section 67-3-1.

Section 96:
Section 96. Section 17-78-101 is enacted to read:78. County Property, Programs, and Entities1. County Property - General Provisions17-78-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Adjusted present value" means:(a)the disposition price; plus(b)the anticipated future value.(2)(a)"Anticipated future value" means the total value of all reasonably anticipated future benefits to a county from the disposal of a significant parcel of real property, including:(i)increased tax revenues; and(ii)job creation or maintenance.(b)"Anticipated future value" does not include the present fair market value of the significant parcel of real property.(3)"Dispose" means to sell or lease.(4)"Disposition price" means the price a potential purchaser or lessee offers to pay in exchange for the sale or lease of a significant parcel of real property.(5)"Federal agency" means any department of the executive branch of the federal government.(6)"Flood plain" means the land along the course of a river or stream which is periodically flooded and for which flood control protective works would normally be provided or desirable.

Section 97:
Section 97. Section 17-78-102, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-310 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-31017-78-102Effective 11/06/25. County powers regarding property, water rights, and water facilities -- Retainage.(1)A county may:(a)purchase, receive by donation, or lease any real or personal property or water rights necessary for the use of the county;(b)(i)purchase or otherwise acquire the necessary real estate upon which to sink wells to obtain water for sprinkling roads and for other county purposes;(ii) and erect thereonerect pumping apparatus, tanks, and reservoirs on county-owned property for obtaining and storing water for such purposes; and (iii)preserve, take care of, manage, and control that real estate described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) and those facilities described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii);(c)purchase, receive by donation, or lease any water rights or stock or rights in reservoirs or storage companies or associations for the use of citizens of the county;(d)construct dams and canals for the storage and distribution of waters referred todescribed in Subsection (1)(c); and(e)fix the price for and sell water, water rights, stock, or rights in reservoir or storage companies or associations, with the dams and canals, as are not required for public use to citizens of the county.(2)If any payment on a contract with a private contractor to construct dams and canals under this section is retained or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.

Section 98:
Section 98. Section 17-78-103, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-312 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-31217-78-103Effective 11/06/25. Acquisition, management, and disposal of property.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Adjusted present value" means:(i)the disposition price; plus(ii)the anticipated future value.(b)(i)"Anticipated future value" means the total value of all reasonably anticipated future benefits to a county from the disposal of a significant parcel of real property, including:(A)increased tax revenues; and(B)job creation or maintenance.(ii)"Anticipated future value" does not include the present fair market value of the significant parcel of real property.(c)"Dispose" means to sell or lease.(d)"Disposition price" means the price a potential purchaser or lessee offers to pay in exchange for the sale or lease of a significant parcel of real property.(2)(1)Subject to Subsection (5)(4), a county may purchase, receive, hold, sell, lease, convey, or otherwise acquire and dispose of any real or personal property or any interest in such property if the action is in the public interest and complies with other law.(3)(2)Any property interest acquired by the county shall be held in the name of the county unless specifically otherwise provided by law.(4)(3)The county legislative body shall provide by ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation for the manner in which property shall be acquired, managed, and disposed of.(5)(4)(a)Before a county may dispose of a significant parcel of real property, the county shall:(i)provide reasonable notice of the proposed disposition at least 14 days before the opportunity for public comment under Subsection (5)(a)(ii)(4)(a)(ii); and(ii)allow an opportunity for public comment on the proposed disposition.(b)Each county shall, by ordinance, define what constitutes:(i)a significant parcel of real property for purposes of Subsection (5)(a)(4)(a); and(ii)reasonable notice for purposes of Subsection (5)(a)(i)(4)(a)(i).(6)(5)(a)A county may dispose of a significant parcel of real property in exchange for less than the present fair market value of the significant parcel of real property if the adjusted present value of the significant parcel of real property is equal to or greater than the present fair market value of the significant parcel of real property.(b)Subsection (6)(a)(5)(a) does not affect a county's authority to dispose of a significant parcel of real property in a manner different from Subsection (6)(a)(5)(a) and in accordance with applicable law.(7)(6)Before a county agrees to dispose of a significant parcel of real property, the county may require the potential purchaser or lessee to provide evidence that:(a)the potential purchaser's or lessee's offer is bona fide;(b)the potential purchaser or lessee has the ability to pay the disposition price; or(c)any future benefits to the county from the disposal of the significant parcel of real property are reasonably anticipated.(8)(7)If a county receives an unsolicited offer to purchase or lease a significant parcel of real property:(a)the county is not required to consider the offer; and(b)a person may not consider the offer in determining the present fair market value of the significant parcel of real property, unless considering the offer is warranted under generally accepted standards of professional appraisal practice.(9)(8)A county may presume that the present fair market value of a significant parcel of real property is equal to the average of two appraised values each of which is based upon fair market value and calculated by a unique, independent appraiser who is licensed or certified in accordance with Title 61, Chapter 2g, Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act.

Section 99:
Section 99. Section 17-78-104, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-311 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-31117-78-104Effective 11/06/25. Courthouse, jail, hospital, and other public buildings -- Retainage.(1)A county may erect, repair or rebuild, and furnish a courthouse, jail, hospital, and such other public buildings as may be necessary, and join with cities and towns in the construction, ownership, and operation of hospitals.(2)If any payment on a contract with a private contractor to erect, repair, or rebuild public buildings under this section is retained or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.

Section 100:
Section 100. Section 17-78-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-316 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Development and Preservation of County Areas and Culture17-50-31617-78-201Effective 11/06/25. Development of county resources.A county may provide for the development of the county's mineral, water, manpower, industrial, historical, cultural, and other resources.

Section 101:
Section 101. Section 17-78-202, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-326 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-32617-78-202Effective 11/06/25. Preservation of historical areas and sites.A county may:(1)expend public funds to preserve, protect, or enhance an historical area or site;(2)acquire an historical area or site by direct purchase, contract, lease, trade, or gift;(3)obtain an easement or right-of-way across public or private property to ensure access or proper development of an historical area or site;(4)protect an historical area or site;(5)ensure proper development and utilization of land or an area adjacent to an historical area or site; and(6)enter into an agreement with a private individual for the right to purchase an historical area or site if and when the private individual elects to sell or dispose of the owner's property.

Section 102:
Section 102. Section 17-78-203, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-320 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-32017-78-203Effective 11/06/25. Support of the arts by counties -- Guidelines.A county may: (1)provide for and appropriate funds for the support of the arts, including music, dance, theatre, crafts and visual, folk and literary art, for the purpose of enriching the lives of itscounty residents; and (2)may establish guidelines for the county's support of the arts.

Section 103:
Section 103. Section 17-78-204, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-335 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-33517-78-204Effective 11/06/25. Energy efficiency upgrade, clean energy system, or electric vehicle charging infrastructure.A county may provide or finance an energy efficiency upgrade, a clean energy system, or electric vehicle charging infrastructure as defined in Section 11-42a-102, in a designated voluntary assessment area in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 42a, Commercial Property Assessed Clean Energy Act.

Section 104:
Section 104. Section 17-78-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-8-1 is renumbered and amended to read:3. Flood Control Projects and Drought Emergencies17-8-117-78-301Effective 11/06/25. Powers of county -- Contracts with United States -- Construction of flood control project.A county may contract with the United States of America, or any federal agency thereof, for the construction of any flood control project within the county designed to: (1)abate or control flood waters or any excessive or unusual accumulation of water in any natural or artificial basin, stream, or body of water; or (2)for the protection of life and property against the danger, menace, injury, or damage resulting from said watersany natural or artificial basin, stream, or body of water.

Section 105:
Section 105. Section 17-78-302, which is renumbered from Section 17-8-2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-8-217-78-302Effective 11/06/25. Maintenance of project -- Acquisition of property.A county may contract to: (1)maintain sucha flood control projectsproject after the construction work is completed, which maintenance may be without expense to the United States of America,; and (2)may contract to and acquire easements and rights of wayrights-of-way to relocate public roads or bridges when the replacement shall be rendered necessary by the construction of any flood control project and may give satisfactory assurance to the United States of America, or any federal agency thereof, that the location, relocation, building or rebuilding of such roads, rights of wayrights-of-way, or bridges shall be done without expense to the United States of America or any federal agency thereof.

Section 106:
Section 106. Section 17-78-303, which is renumbered from Section 17-8-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-8-317-78-303Effective 11/06/25. Distribution of waters -- Operation of projects.The duty of distributing the waters of and operating the flood control project when completed shall rest upon the state engineer of the state of Utahdescribed in Section 73-2-1, provided, that the cost of such distribution and operation of the project by the state engineer shall be borne by the county entering into the cooperative contract with the United States of America for the construction and the operation of the flood control project.

Section 107:
Section 107. Section 17-78-304, which is renumbered from Section 17-8-4 is renumbered and amended to read:17-8-417-78-304Effective 11/06/25. Joint action of two or more counties.Whenever the construction of a flood control project, as hereinabove provided, shall be  described in this part is for the mutual benefit of two or more counties, the boards of commissionersgoverning bodies of the counties may jointly enter into such co-operative contracts with the United States of America, or any federal agency thereof, for the construction of suchthe flood control project.

Section 108:
Section 108. Section 17-78-305, which is renumbered from Section 17-8-5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-8-517-78-305Effective 11/06/25. Clearing, improving, fencing, and construction of natural channels, sewers, and drains -- Enforcement of laws and regulations.(1)In anticipation of and to provide for the carrying away and the safe disposal of natural storm and flood waters, the county may: (a)remove any obstacle from any natural channels within the county and the incorporated municipalities in the county. For the same purpose the county may ; and(b)plan for and construct new channels, storm sewers, and drains to serve as though they were natural channels. (2)The county may cause such channels, storm sewers, and drains described in Subsection (1)(b) to be surveyed, and the county legislative body may, by ordinance, establish their location and dimensions. (3)(a)The county legislative body may promulgate regulations to prevent the destruction or obstruction of these channels, storm sewers, and drains, and may provide for the enforcement of those regulations. (b)The county legislative body may also provide for the maintenance, improvement, and fencing of all such channels, including covering or replacement with buried conduits. (c)To implement the establishment, clearing, protection, and continued use of such channels, storm sewers, and drains, the county may acquire, by right of eminent domain necessary easements and rights of wayrights-of-way. (4)All laws and sanitary regulations against the pollution of water in natural streams, canals, and lakes shall be enforced by: (a)the county executives in their respective counties,officers; (b)or, by the state, through the attorney general and in co-operation with the state board of health, state fish and game commission,; and (c)the several county legislative bodies.

Section 109:
Section 109. Section 17-78-306, which is renumbered from Section 17-8-5.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-8-5.517-78-306Effective 11/06/25. Protection of channels and flood plains -- Acquisition of land.(1)The county legislative body may also provide by ordinance for the protection and use of flood channels and present flood plains on rivers, streams, and canals located within the county and the incorporated municipalities in the county and may establish by ordinance the boundaries of these flood channels and present flood plains. (2)The county may acquire and hold by gift or purchase, such lands, rights of wayrights-of-way, easements, or other interests in property within the established boundaries of these flood channels and present flood plains. Flood plain as used herein means the lands along the course of the river or stream which is periodically flooded and for which flood control protective works would normally be provided or desirable.

Section 110:
Section 110. Section 17-78-307, which is renumbered from Section 17-8-7 is renumbered and amended to read:17-8-717-78-307Effective 11/06/25. Declaration of drought emergency -- Appropriation -- Tax levy.(1)The county legislative body of each county may at any regular meeting or at a special meeting called for such purpose, declare that an emergency drought exists in said county; and thereupon may .(2)(a)After a declaration of drought in a county, the county legislative body may appropriate from the money not otherwise appropriated in the county general fund such funds as shall be necessary for the gathering of information upon, and aiding in any program for increased precipitation within said county or in conjunction with any other county or counties, or that if.(b)If there are not sufficient funds available in the county general fund for suchthe purpose described in Subsection (2)(a), the county legislative body may, during any such emergency so declared by them, assess, levy, and direct the county to collect annually to aid in any program of increased precipitation.(2)(3)The provisions of Chapter 19a, County Auditor,Chapter 69, County Auditor, relating to budgeting do not apply to appropriations necessitated by such an emergency described in this section.

Section 111:
Section 111. Section 17-78-401, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-305 is renumbered and amended to read:4. Transportation17-50-30517-78-401Effective 11/06/25. County powers to acquire, construct, and control roads and other facilities -- Retainage.(1)A county may:(a)contract for, purchase, or otherwise acquire, when necessary, rights of way for county roads over private property, and may institute proceedings for acquiring such rights of way as provided by law;(b)lay out, construct, maintain, control, and manage county roads, sidewalks, ferries and bridges within the county, outside of cities and towns;(c)designate the county roads to be maintained by the county within or extending through any city or town, which may not be more than three in the same direction;(d)abolish or abandon county roads that are unnecessary for the use of the public, in the manner provided by law; and(e)lay out, construct, maintain, control, and manage landing fields and hangars for the use of airplanes or other vehicles for aerial travel.(2)If any payment on a contract with a private contractor to construct county roads, sidewalks, ferries, and bridges under this section is retained or withheld, itthe payment shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.

Section 112:
Section 112. Section 17-78-402, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-306 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-30617-78-402Effective 11/06/25. Granting franchises over public roads -- Limitation.(1)A county may grant franchises along and over the public roads and highways for all lawful purposes, upon such terms, conditions, and restrictions as in the judgment of the county legislative body are necessary and proper, to be exercised in such manner as to present the least possible obstruction and inconvenience to the traveling public.(2)A franchise under Subsection (1) may not be granted for a period longer than 50 years.

Section 113:
Section 113. Section 17-78-403, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-307 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-30717-78-403Effective 11/06/25. Franchises for toll roads.(1)Subject to Subsection (2), a county may grant, on such terms, conditions, and restrictions as in the judgment of the county executive are necessary and proper, licenses and franchises for taking tolls on public roads or highways whenever in the judgment of the county executive the expense of operating or maintaining the roads or highways as free public highways is too great to justify the county in operating or maintaining themthe public roads or highways.(2)Each license and franchise granted under Subsection (1) shall contain the condition that the roads and highways shall be kept in reasonable repair by the persons to whom such licenses or franchises are granted.

Section 114:
Section 114. Section 17-78-404, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-308 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-30817-78-404Effective 11/06/25. Franchises for ferries and bridges.(1)A county may grant licenses and franchises for: (a)constructing and keeping in repair roads, bridges, and ferries; and (b)for the taking of tolls on themroads, bridges, and ferries.(2)Each person operating any toll boat or ferry for the transportation of persons, vehicles, or livestock across any stream, river, or body of water in this state shall obtain a franchise for itsthe boat's or ferry's operation from the county executive of the county in which suchthe boat or ferry is operated.(3)If sucha boat or ferry is operated on a stream or body of water forming the boundary line between two adjoining counties, the person operating the boat or ferry shall obtain a franchise from the county executive of each county.

Section 115:
Section 115. Section 17-78-405, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-309 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-30917-78-405Effective 11/06/25. Regulation of use of roads.A county may enact ordinances and make regulations not in conflict with law for the control, construction, alteration, repair, and use of all public roads and highways in the county outside of cities and towns.

Section 116:
Section 116. Section 17-78-406, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-330 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-33017-78-406Effective 11/06/25. Prohibition against spending certain transportation funds.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Apportioned" means divided or assigned among the states based on a prescribed formula established in 23 U.S.C.(b)"Authorization act" means an act of Congress enacted after July 1, 2009, that authorizes transportation programs from the Highway Trust Fund established in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 9503.(2)A county may not spend project-specific funds that are allocated through an authorization act for a transportation-related project that is eligible for funds apportioned to the state in support of the statewide transportation improvement program unless the specified project is included on the statewide transportation improvement program.

Section 117:
Section 117. Section 17-78-407, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-322 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-32217-78-407Effective 11/06/25. County funding for a fixed guideway.(1)For purposes of this section, "fixed guideway" means a public transit facility that uses and occupies:(a)rail for the use of public transit; or(b)a separate right-of-way for the use of public transit.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a county legislative body may not levy a property tax or expend revenues from uniform fees or any tax or fee imposed in lieu of a property tax, to purchase, erect, repair, rebuild, maintain, or otherwise fund a fixed guideway.(b)Subsection (2)(a) does not apply to a property tax levy imposed by a county for the purpose of paying for bonds if:(i)before January 1, 2007, the bonds were issued or approved by voters for issuance to fund a fixed guideway; and(ii)the county does not impose a sales and use tax authorized by Section 59-12-2217.

Section 118:
Section 118. Section 17-78-501, which is renumbered from Section 17-34-1 is renumbered and amended to read:5. Provision of Municipal-Type Services to Unincorporated Areas17-34-117-78-501Effective 11/06/25. Counties may provide municipal services --  First-class counties to provide certain services -- Counties allowed to provide certain services in recreational areas.(1)For purposes of this chapter, except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3):part, "municipal-type services" means:(a)"Greater than class C radioactive waste" has the same meaning as in Section 19-3-303.(b)"High-level nuclear waste" has the same meaning as in Section 19-3-303.(c)"Municipal-type services" means:(i)(a)fire protection service;(ii)(b)waste and garbage collection and disposal;(iii)(c)planning and zoning;(iv)(d)street lighting;(v)(e)animal services;(vi)(f)storm drains;(vii)(g)traffic engineering;(viii)(h)code enforcement;(ix)(i)business licensing;(x)(j)building permits and inspections;(xi)(k)in a county of the first class:(A)(i)advanced life support and paramedic services; and(B)(ii)detective investigative services; and(xii)(l)all other services and functions that are required by law to be budgeted, appropriated, and accounted for from a municipal services fund or a municipal capital projects fund as defined under Chapter 36, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for CountiesChapter 63, Fiscal Authority and Processes.(d)"Placement" has the same meaning as in Section 19-3-303.(e)"Storage facility" has the same meaning as in Section 19-3-303.(f)"Transfer facility" has the same meaning as in Section 19-3-303.(2)A county may:(a)provide municipal-type services to areas of the county outside the limits of cities and towns without providing the same services to cities or towns; and(b)fund thosemunicipal-type services by:(i)levying a tax on taxable property in the county outside the limits of cities and towns;(ii)charging a service charge or fee to persons benefitting from the municipal-type services; or(iii)providing funds to a municipal services district in accordance with Section 17B-2a-1109.(3)A county may not:(a)provide, contract to provide, or agree in any manner to provide municipal-type services, as these services are defined in Section 19-3-303, to any area under consideration for a storage facility or transfer facility for the placement of high-level nuclear waste, or greater than class C radioactive waste; or(b)seek to fund services for these facilities by:(i)levying a tax; or(ii)charging a service charge or fee to persons benefitting from the municipal-type services.(4)(3)Each county of the first class shall provide to the area of the county outside the limits of cities and towns:(a)advanced life support and paramedic services; and(b)detective investigative services.(5)(4)(a)A county may provide fire, paramedic, and police protection services in any area of the county outside the limits of cities and towns that is designated as a recreational area in accordance with the provisions of this Subsection (5)(4).(b)A county legislative body may designate any area of the county outside the limits of cities and towns as a recreational area if:(i)the area has fewer than 1,500 residents and is primarily used for recreational purposes, including canyons, ski resorts, wilderness areas, lakes and reservoirs, campgrounds, or picnic areas; and(ii)the county legislative body makes a finding that the recreational area is used by residents of the county who live both inside and outside the limits of cities and towns.(c)Fire, paramedic, and police protection services needed to primarily serve those involved in the recreation activities in areas designated as recreational areas by the county legislative body in accordance with Subsection (5)(b)(4)(b) may be funded from the county general fund.(d)A county legislative body may determine that fire, paramedic, and police protection services within a municipality that is located in an area designated as a recreational area, in accordance with this Subsection (5)(4), may be funded with county general funds if the county legislative body makes a finding that a disproportionate share of public safety service needs within the municipality are generated by residents of the county who live both inside and outside the limits of cities and towns.(5)A county may be limited in the municipal-type services the county provides, in accordance with Section 17-60-504.

Section 119:
Section 119. Section 17-78-502, which is renumbered from Section 17-34-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-34-317-78-502Effective 11/06/25. Taxes or service charges for municipal-type services -- Budgeting, accounting for, and disbursing of funds -- Annual audit.(1)(a)If a county furnishes the municipal-type services and functions described in Section 17-34-117-78-501 to areas of the county outside the limits of incorporated cities or towns, the entire cost of the services or functions so furnished shall be defrayed from funds that the county has derived from:(i)taxes that the county may lawfully levy or impose outside the limits of incorporated towns or cities;(ii)service charges or fees the county may impose upon the persons benefited in any way by the services or functions; or(iii)a combination of these sources.(b)As the taxes or service charges or fees are levied and collected, they shall be placed in a special revenue fund of the county and shall be disbursed only for the rendering of the services or functions established in Section 17-34-117-78-501 within the unincorporated areas of the county or as provided in Subsection 10-2a-219(2).(2)(a)For the purpose of levying taxes, service charges, or fees provided in this section, the county legislative body may establish a district or districts in the unincorporated areas of the county.(b)A district established by a county as provided in Subsection (2)(a) may be reorganized as a special district in accordance with the procedures set forth in Sections 17D-1-601, 17D-1-603, and 17D-1-604.(3)Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to authorize counties to impose or levy taxes not otherwise allowed by law.(4)Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapterpart, a county providing fire, paramedic, and police protection services in a designated recreational area, as provided in Subsection 17-34-1(5)Section 17-78-501, may fund thosefire, paramedic, or police protection services from the county general fund with revenues derived from both inside and outside the limits of cities and towns, and the funding of those services is not limited to unincorporated area revenues.(5)(a)With respect to the budgeting, accounting for, and disbursing of funds to furnish the municipal-type services and functions described in Section 17-78-501 to areas of the county outside the limits of incorporated towns and cities, including levying of taxes and imposition of fees and charges under this section, each county legislative body shall separately budget and strictly account for and apportion to the costs of providing municipal-type services and functions for the following:(i)the salaries of each county commissioner and the salaries and wages of all other elected and appointed county officials and employees;(ii)the operation and maintenance costs of each municipal-type service or function provided, set forth separately as line items in the Municipal Services Fund budget;(iii)the cost of renting or otherwise using capital facilities for the purposes of providing municipal-type services or functions; and(iv)all other costs including administrative costs associated, directly or indirectly, with the costs of providing municipal-type services or functions.(b)At all times these funds and any expenditures from these funds shall be separately accounted for and utilized only for the purposes of providing municipal-type services and functions to areas of the county outside the limits of incorporated towns or cities.(6)To implement Subsection (5):(a)a budget shall be adopted and administered in the same manner as the budget for general purposes of the county which furnishes the municipal-type services and functions is adopted and administered, either as a part of the general budget or separate from it;(b)funds for the purposes of furnishing municipal-type services and functions under this chapter shall be collected, held, and administered in the same manner as other funds of the county are collected, held, and administered, but shall be segregated and separately maintained, except that where, in the judgment of the county legislative body, advantages inure to the fund from coinvestment of these funds and other funds also subject to control by the county legislative body, the county legislative body may direct this coinvestment, but in no event may the funds to furnish municipal-type services and functions or the income from their investment be used for purposes other than those described in Section 17-78-501;(c)expenditures shall be made in the same manner as other expenditures of the county are made; and(d)any taxes levied under this part shall be levied at the same time and in the same manner as other taxes of the county are levied.(7)An annual audit of the budgeting, accounting for, and disbursing of funds used to furnish municipal-type services and functions, shall be conducted by an independent certified public accountant.

Section 120:
Section 120. Section 17-78-503 is enacted to read:17-78-503Effective 11/06/25. Certain counties to establish funds or special service districts.(1)Each county of the first, second, or third class that provides municipal-type services to unincorporated areas under this part shall:(a)establish a special revenue fund, "Municipal Services Fund," and a capital projects fund, "Municipal Capital Projects Fund," or establish a special district or special service district to provide municipal services; and(b)budget appropriations for municipal services and municipal capital projects from the funds described in Subsection (1)(a).(2)The Municipal Services Fund is subject to the same budgetary requirements as the county general fund.(3)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), the county may deposit revenue derived from any taxes otherwise authorized by law, income derived from the investment of money contained within the municipal services fund and the municipal capital projects fund, the appropriate portion of federal money, and fees collected into a municipal services fund and a municipal capital projects fund.(b)The county may not deposit revenue derived from a fee, tax, or other source based upon a countywide assessment or from a countywide service or function into a municipal services fund or a municipal capital projects fund.(4)The maximum accumulated unappropriated surplus in the municipal services fund, as determined before adoption of the tentative budget, may not exceed an amount equal to the total estimated revenues of the current fiscal period.

Section 121:
Section 121. Section 17-78-504, which is renumbered from Section 17-34-4 is renumbered and amended to read:17-34-417-78-504Effective 11/06/25. Contracts under Interlocal Cooperation Act.This chapterpart may not be construed to prevent counties, cities, and towns from entering into contracts covering the furnishing by one to the other of all or any of the municipal-type services listed in Section 17-34-1 under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, except that where incorporated cities or towns perform one or more of the municipal services set forth in Section 17-34-117-78-501 for unincorporated areas of a county, payment shall be made from the special revenue fund.

Section 122:
Section 122. Section 17-78-601, which is renumbered from Section 17-25a-1 is renumbered and amended to read:6. Constables17-25a-117-78-601Effective 11/06/25. County legislative body to determine whether to appoint or contract with constables -- Authority.(1)(a)(i)The legislative governing bodies of counties and citiesbody of a county shall determine whether to appoint one or more constables to serve in the county.(ii)If a county or city decides to appoint constables, the county or city shall nominate and appoint constables in accordance with this chapter.(b)(i)Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a constable holding office on July 1, 2019, may complete the constable's term.(ii)A constable shall serve any subsequent terms the constable may serve in accordance with this chapterpart.(2)To nominate a constable, the legislative body of a county of the first or second class or the legislative body of a city of the first or second class shall establish a nominating commission.(a)The county nominating commission shall consist of:(i)one member of the county legislative governing body or the member's designee;(ii)one judge or the judge's designee;(iii)the county attorney or the county attorney's designee;(iv)the district attorney or the district attorney's designee;(v)the sheriff of the county or the sheriff's designee; and(vi)one private citizen.(b)The city nominating commission shall consist of:(i)one member of the city legislative governing body;(ii)one judge;(iii)the city attorney;(iv)the chief of police; and(v)one private citizen.(c)(b)The nominating commission described in this Subsection (2) shall review each applicant's credentials and, by majority vote, recommend to the legislative governing body of the county or city the nominees the nominating commission finds most qualified.(d)(c)The county or city legislative governing body shall either appoint or reject any nominee that the nominating commission recommends under Subsection (2)(c)(2)(b).(3)The legislative body of a county of the third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class or the legislative body of a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class may appoint a constable on a recommendation from:(a)the county sheriff and the county attorney; or(b)the chief of police.(4)A county or city legislative governing body that appoints a constable under this section may withdraw the authority of the constable for cause, including if the constable's peace officer certification is suspended or revoked under Section 53-6-211.(5)In addition to the appointment process described in Subsections (1) through (4), the legislative body of a county where a justice court exists may contract with a constable to provide services in criminal cases for the contracting governmental entity by a method and for an amount mutually agreed upon.(6)(a)A contract between a county legislative body and a constable, including a contract described in Subsection (5), may not exceed four years.(b)A contract described in Subsection (6)(a) may be renewed or extended for a period not to exceed four years.

Section 123:
Section 123. Section 17-78-602, which is renumbered from Section 17-25a-2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-25a-217-78-602Effective 11/06/25. Constable qualification  -- Duties -- Constables to serve process in certain circumstances.(1)To qualify as a constable, a personan individual shall be certified as a special function peace officer in the state.(2)A constable shall:(a)avoid all conflicts of interest; and(b)maintain a public office and be accessible to the public and to the court during the hours the court is open.(3)In cases where it appears in any court of record that the sheriff is a party, or where an affidavit is filed with the clerk of the court stating partiality, prejudice, consanguinity, or interest on the part of the sheriff, the clerk of the court shall direct process to any constable of the county, whose duty it shall be to execute it in the same manner as if the constable were sheriff.

Section 124:
Section 124. Section 17-78-603, which is renumbered from Section 17-25a-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-25a-317-78-603Effective 11/06/25. Term -- Authority -- Deputies.(1)(a)Constables appointed by a county or city are appointed for terms of six years and may serve more than one term if reappointed by the appointing body.(b)Notwithstanding the law in place at the time a constable was appointed, the term of a constable appointed on or after July 1, 2018, expires six years after the day on which the term began.(2)(a)Constables Appointed constables serving process outside the county in which they are appointed shall contact the sheriff's office or police department of the jurisdiction prior tobefore serving executions or seizing any property.(b)A constable An appointed constable or a deputy of an appointed constable shall notify the agency of jurisdiction by contacting the sheriff's office or police department of jurisdiction before serving a warrant of arrest.(3)The appointed constable may, upon approval of the appointing county or city, employ and deputize persons who are certified as special function peace officers to function as deputy constables.(4)If the county or city appointinglegislative body withdraws the authority of aan appointed constable, the authority of all deputy constables employed or deputized by the appointed constable is also withdrawn.(5)If the authority of a constable or deputy constable is withdrawn under Subsection (4), notification ofthe county shall notify the Peace Officer Standards and Training Division of the Department of Public Safety shall be made pursuant toin accordance with Section 53-6-209.(6)A constable, contracted or appointed, shall:(a)attend the justice courts within the constable's county when required by contract or court order; and(b)execute, serve, and return all process directed or delivered to the constable by a judge of the justice court serving the county, or by any competent authority within the limits of this section.(7)A constable, contracted or appointed, may:(a)serve any process throughout the state; and(b)carry out all other functions associated with a constable.(8)A constable shall serve exclusively as an agent for:(a)the government entity that has a contract with the constable;(b)the county that appointed the constable; or(c)the court authorizing or directing the constable.(9)Except as otherwise provided in this part, a constable may not serve as an agent, or be considered to be serving as an agent, for a person that is not described in Subsection (8).

Section 125:
Section 125. Section 17-78-604, which is renumbered from Section 17-25-2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-25-217-78-604Effective 11/06/25. Fees for constables -- Civil.(1)Constables may, for theirthe constable's own use, collect as compensation in civil matters the same fees as those specified for sheriffs in Section 17-22-2.517-72-304.(2)Constable fees that exceed the amounts in Section 17-22-2.517-72-304 are recoverable:(a)by the constable only if hethe constable has received prior approval for the increased fee from the party requesting the service; and(b)by prevailing party as a cost of the action only if the court finds the service and increased fee are justifiable.

Section 126:
Section 126. Section 17-78-605, which is renumbered from Section 17-25-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-25-317-78-605Effective 11/06/25. Fees for constables -- Criminal.(1)(a)InExcept as provided in Subsections (3) and (6), a constable shall be paid in criminal matters constables shall be paid for each copy of a summons, subpoena, notice, court order, or other criminal paper, except a warrant of arrest; as follows:(i)$5 for each defendant served; and(ii)mileage of $1 per mile for each mile necessarily traveled in going only, to be computed from either the courthouse, or when transmitted by mail, from the post office where received.(b)If more than one trip is necessary to serve, or diligently attempt to serve, service of process, a constable may collect mileage charges for more than two trips may be collected only if the party requesting the service of process has approved the additional mileage charges.(c)Each chargeA constable shall be individually documenteddocument each charge under this Subsection (1) on the affidavit of return of service.(2)Lower charges may be established by contract for services under this section.(3)(2)If a constable serves process in a county other than the county where the process originated, travel expenses may not exceed the fee that would be charged if served by the sheriff of that county under Chapter 72, County Sheriff.(4)(3)(a)For A constable may charge a county a fee of $1 for each mile traveled for the purpose of serving, or to diligently attempt service of, a warrant of arrest, both in going to and returning from the defendant's address, a fee of $1 may be charged.(b)If more than one trip is necessary to serve, or diligently attempt to serve, a warrant of arrest, a constable may collect no more than two additional mileage charges may be collected.(c)Each A constable shall individually document each charge shall be individually documentedunder this Subsection (3)  on the affidavit of return of service.(5)(4)For arresting eacha prisoner and bringing himthe prisoner into court, or otherwise satisfying a warrant, a constable may charge a fee of $15 may be charged.(5)(a)Accounts against the county filed by constables for services in criminal cases shall be:(i)certified as correct by the county attorney or district attorney; and(ii)presented to the auditor.(b)The county legislative body may reject constable bills in all causes or proceedings in which the county attorney or district attorney has not authorized the issuance of the warrant of arrest in writing.(6)A county may, by contract with a constable, establish lower fees for services than the fees described in this section.

Section 127:
Section 127. Section 17-78-606, which is renumbered from Section 17-25a-4 is renumbered and amended to read:17-25a-417-78-606Effective 11/06/25. Fees for constable service of process -- Exception.(1)The rates recoverable through court action for service of process by a constable are governed by Section 17-22-2.5, 17-25-3, or 17-25-517-72-304, 17-78-601, or 17-78-605, when applicable.(2)Constable fees that exceed the amounts in Section 17-22-2.517-72-304 are recoverable in court:(a)by the constable only if hethe constable has received prior approval for the increased fee from the party requesting the service; and(b)by a prevailing party as a cost of the action only if the court finds the service and increased fee are justifiable.

Section 128:
Section 128. Section 17-78-607, which is renumbered from Section 17-25-6 is renumbered and amended to read:17-25-617-78-607Effective 11/06/25. Identification of constables -- Uniform requirements.(1)While performing a duty described in Section 17-25-117-78-603, a constable shall prominently display a badge or other visible form of credentials and identification identifying:(a)a person the individual as a constable;(b)the person'sindividual's name; and(c)the county or municipality for which the constable is appointed or contracted.(2)If a constable serves process, the constable shall:(a)verbally communicate to the person being served that the constable is a constable; and(b)print on the first page of each document served:(i)the constable's name and identification as a constable;(ii)the county or municipality for which the constable is appointed; and(iii)a business phone number for the constable.(3)If a constable wears a uniform, the uniform shall be clearly marked with the word "constable" on the uniform shirt and, if applicable, the jacket.

Section 129:
Section 129. Section 17-78-701 is enacted to read:7. Establishing and Promoting Recreation, Tourism, and Conventions17-78-701Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Airport" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-10-102.(2)"Airport operator" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-10-102.(3)"Establishing and promoting" means an activity or related expense to encourage, solicit, advertise, or market in order to attract or enhance transient guest spending in a county for a purpose described in Subsection 17-78-702(2)(a).(4)"Mitigation" means activity to address the direct impacts of tourism, recreation related to tourism, or conventions in a county, specifically sanitation and solid waste disposal, emergency medical services, search and rescue services, law enforcement, road repair, and road upgrades.(5)"Transient room tax" means a tax at a rate not to exceed the relevant rate authorized by Section 59-12-301.

Section 130:
Section 130. Section 17-78-702, which is renumbered from Section 17-31-2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-31-217-78-702Effective 11/06/25. Purposes of transient room tax and expenditure of revenue -- Purchase or lease of facilities -- Mitigating impacts of recreation, tourism, or conventions -- Issuance of bonds.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Airport" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-10-102.(b)"Airport operator" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-10-102.(c)"Establishing and promoting" means an activity or related expense to encourage, solicit, advertise, or market in order to attract or enhance transient guest spending in a county for a purpose described in Subsection (3)(a).(d)"Mitigation" means activity to address the direct impacts of tourism, recreation related to tourism, or conventions in a county, specifically sanitation and solid waste disposal, emergency medical services, search and rescue services, law enforcement, road repair, and road upgrades.(e)"Transient room tax" means a tax at a rate not to exceed  the relevant rate authorized by Section 59-12-301.(2)(1)Subject to the requirements of this section, a county legislative body may impose the transient room tax for a purpose described in Subsection (3)(2).(3)(2)A county legislative body may expend revenue generated by the transient room tax imposed under this section and any revenue the county receives from the State Tax Commission under Section 59-28-103 only:(a)for the purpose of establishing and promoting:(i)tourism;(ii)recreation; (iii)film production; or (iv)conventions;(b)to pay for tourism- or recreation-related facilities in the county, including acquiring, leasing, constructing, furnishing, maintaining, or operating:(i)convention meeting rooms;(ii)exhibit halls;(iii)visitor information centers;(iv)museums;(v)sports and recreation facilities including practice fields, stadiums, arenas, and trails;(vi)the following on any route to a recreation destination within the county, as designated by the county legislative body:(A)transit service, including shuttle service; and(B)parking infrastructure; and(vii)an airport, if the county is the airport operator of the airport;(c)for the purpose of acquiring land, leasing land, or making payments for construction or infrastructure improvements required for or related to the facilities listed in Subsection (3)(b)(2)(b);(d)to pay mitigation costs, specifically:(i)solid waste disposal operations;(ii)emergency medical services;(iii)search and rescue activities;(iv)law enforcement activities; and(v)road repair and upgrade of:(A)class B roads, as defined in Section 72-3-103;(B)class C roads, as defined in Section 72-3-104; or(C)class D roads, as defined in Section 72-3-105; and(e)to make the annual payment of principal, interest, premiums, and necessary reserves for any of the aggregate of bonds authorized under Subsection (4)(3).(4)(3)The county legislative body may issue bonds or cause bonds to be issued, as permitted by law, to pay all or part of any costs incurred for the purposes set forth in Subsections (3)(b)(2)(b) through (3)(d)(2)(d) that are permitted to be paid from bond proceeds.(5)(4)(a)Activity described in Subsection (3)(a)(2)(a) is exclusive of activity described in Subsection (3)(b)(2)(b) or (c).(b)A county may not distribute revenue generated by the transient room tax imposed under this section to a large public transit district, as that term is defined in Section 17B-2a-802.(6)(5)A county that generates $1 million or more in revenue from a transient room tax imposed under this section in the preceding calendar year:(a)shall expend, at a minimum, the revenue the county generates from the first 2% of the tax rate of a transient room tax on a purpose described in Subsection (3)(a)(2)(a); and(b)may expend the remainder of the revenue the county generates from a transient room tax on any purpose described in Subsection (3)(2).(7)(6)A county that generates $500,000 or more but less than $1 million in revenue from a transient room tax imposed under this section in the preceding calendar year:(a)shall expend, at a minimum, the revenue the county generates from the first 1% of the tax rate of a transient room tax on a purpose described in Subsection (3)(a)(2)(a); and(b)may expend the remainder of the revenue the county generates from a transient room tax on any purpose described in Subsection (3)(2).(8)(7)A county that is not described in Subsection (5) or (6) or (7) may expend the revenue the county generates from a transient room tax on any purpose described in Subsection (3)(2).(9)(8)The legislative body of a county may cause revenue generated by a transient room tax to be expended by a municipality within the county if:(a)the revenue the county shares with the municipality is not required to be spent by the county for a purpose described in Subsection (3)(a)(2)(a);(b)the county and municipality enter into an interlocal agreement:(i)governing the use of the revenue; and(ii)requiring the municipality to report the municipality's expenditures of the revenue to the county; and(c)the municipality receiving revenue generated by the county's transient room tax agrees to and expends the revenue for a purpose described in Subsection (3)(2).

Section 131:
Section 131. Section 17-78-703, which is renumbered from Section 17-31-5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-31-517-78-703Effective 11/06/25. General powers and duties of a county legislative body related to the transient room tax.(1)The legislative body of each county that imposes a transient room tax in accordance with Section 17-31-217-78-702:(a)shall, except as provided in Subsection (2), at least annually consider the priorities and recommendations of the county's tourism tax advisory board created under Subsection 17-31-8(1)(a)17-78-706(1)(a) or the substantially similar body as described in Subsection 17-31-8(1)(b)17-78-706(1)(b) in one or more public meetings before finalizing decisions on expenditures of revenue from the transient room tax in each fiscal year;(b)shall prepare and provide the annual written report for each fiscal year as described in Section 17-31-5.517-78-704; and(c)may do and perform any and all other acts and things necessary, desirable, or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.(2)Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to the legislative body of a county if:(a)the legislative body of the county has entered into a written contract with a substantially similar body to a tourism tax advisory board as described in Subsection 17-31-8(1)(b)17-78-706(1)(b); and(b)the written contract described in Subsection (2)(a) clearly delineates how the expenditures of revenue from the transient room tax are to be spent.

Section 132:
Section 132. Section 17-78-704, which is renumbered from Section 17-31-5.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-31-5.517-78-704Effective 11/06/25. Report by county legislative body -- Content.(1)The legislative body of each county that imposes a transient room tax under Section 59-12-301 or a tourism, recreation, cultural, convention, and airport facilities tax under Section 59-12-603 shall:(a)ensure that the annual financial report required by Section 17-36-3717-63-603 includes a breakdown of expenditures:(i)for revenue generated by the transient room tax, according to the allowable expenditure categories described in Subsection 17-31-2(3)17-78-702(2); and(ii)for revenue generated by the tourism, recreation, cultural, convention, and airport facilities tax, according to the allowable expenditure categories described in Sections 59-12-602 and 59-12-603; and(b) prepare annually a written report in accordance with Subsection (2).(2)(a)For the transient room tax, the written report described in Subsection (1)(b) shall include:(i)a breakdown of promotion expenditures;(ii)if the county caused revenue generated by the transient room tax to be expended by a municipality within the county, as described in Subsection 17-31-2(9)17-78-702(8), a description:(A)of each interlocal agreement the county entered into with a municipality; and(B)the amount of revenue the county shared with a municipality pursuant toin accordance with an interlocal agreement;(iii)the number of search and rescue efforts conducted by the county in the previous fiscal year;(iv)the total cost of search and rescue efforts and emergency medical services that were related to tourism or recreation within the eligible county in the previous fiscal year;(v)a description of any factors that made a search and rescue effort or emergency medical service more expensive or difficult, including the condition of roads within the county;(vi)what money, if any, the county was able to recover in the previous fiscal year from an individual on whose behalf the county incurred the cost of search and rescue or emergency medical services; and(vii)(A)data on the percentages of individuals on whose behalf the county incurred the cost of search and rescue or emergency medical services who were in-state visitors to the county, out-of-state visitors to the county, or residents of the county; and(B)if data described in Subsection (2)(a)(vii)(A) is unavailable regarding an individual on whose behalf the county incurred the cost of search and rescue or emergency medical services, the number of individuals whose data described in Subsection (2)(a)(vii)(A) is unavailable.(b)A county legislative body preparing a report required under this section shall utilize the form created by the state auditor under Section 17E-2-406.(b)The state auditor, in consultation with the Utah Office of Tourism created in Section 63N-7-102, shall:(i)create a form for a financial report and a form for a written report required under this section;(ii)designate at least one employee within the state auditor's office to serve as the point of contact for counties preparing a financial report or written report under this section; and(iii)if the state auditor's office determines it is advisable, create written guidance to assist counties in preparing a financial report or written report under this section.(3)On or before October 1, the county legislative body shall provide a copy of the annual written report described in Subsection (1)(b) for the previous fiscal year to the state auditor and the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst.(4)(a)On or before December 1 of each year, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall:(i)analyze each written report received under Subsection (3) to determine if the information in the report sufficiently demonstrates that the county is expending revenue in accordance with the requirements of Sections 17-31-217-78-702, 59-12-301, and 59-12-603; and(ii)provide a summary of the analysis and determination described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) to:(A)the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee;(B)the Political Subdivisions Interim Committee; and(C)the state auditor.(b)If the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst determines a county written report does not sufficiently demonstrate that a county is expending revenue in accordance with the requirements of Section 17-31-2Sections 17-78-702, 59-12-301, and 59-12-603, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall include a copy of the county's written report with the summary described in Subsection (4)(a)(ii) to the entities described in Subsections (4)(a)(ii)(A) through (C).

Section 133:
Section 133. Section 17-78-705, which is renumbered from Section 17-31-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-31-317-78-705Effective 11/06/25. Reserve fund authorized -- Use of collected funds -- Limitation on surplus in fund.(1)The county legislative body may create a reserve fund.(2)(a)Subject to Subsections (2)(b) and (c), a county legislative body shall retain any transient room tax funds collected but not expended during any fiscal year in the reserve fund to be used in accordance with Sections 17-31-2 through 17-31-5Sections 17-78-702, 17-78-703, and 17-78-705.(b)Except as described in Subsection (2)(c), accumulated unappropriated surplus in the reserve fund, as determined before the county's adoption of a tentative budget, may not exceed 50% of the total transient room tax revenue for the current fiscal year.(c)For a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2019, and ending on or before July 1, 2023:(i)if a county receives more than 150% of total transient room tax revenue in the fiscal year compared to the total transient room tax revenue received in the previous fiscal year, accumulated unappropriated surplus in the reserve fund, as determined before the county's adoption of a tentative budget, may not exceed 50% of the total transient room tax revenue for the previous fiscal year plus an amount equal to the total transient room tax revenue that is more than 100% of total transient room tax revenue from the previous fiscal year; and(ii)if a county adds to the county's reserve fund an amount equal to the total transient room tax revenue that is more than 100% of total transient room tax revenue from the previous fiscal year as authorized in Subsection (2)(c)(i), the county may expend that additional reserve fund money for visitor management and destination development subject to the requirements described in Subsections 17-31-2(6)(a)(ii)(A) and (B)Section 17-78-702.

Section 134:
Section 134. Section 17-78-706, which is renumbered from Section 17-31-8 is renumbered and amended to read:17-31-817-78-706Effective 11/06/25. Tourism tax advisory boards.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), any county that collects the following taxes shall operate a tourism tax advisory board:(i)the tax allowed under Section 59-12-301; or(ii)the tax allowed under Section 59-12-603.(b)Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a county is exempt from Subsection (1)(a) if the county has an existing board, council, committee, convention visitor's bureau, or body that substantially conforms with Subsections (2), (3), and (4).(2)A tourism tax advisory board created under Subsection (1) shall consist of at least five members.(3)(a)A tourism tax advisory board shall be composed of the following members that are residents of the county:(i)a majority of the members shall be current employees of entities in the county that are subject to the taxes referred to in Section 59-12-301 or 59-12-603; and(ii)at least two of the board's membership shall be employees of recreational facilities, convention facilities, museums, cultural attractions, or other tourism related industries located within the county.(b)A tourism tax advisory board may add additional members to the board, including board members who represent the interests of municipalities in the county.(c)If a county generates 50% or more of the county's revenue generated by the imposition of a tax described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) within one municipality in the county, the tourism tax advisory board for that county shall include a board member to represent the interests of the municipality.(4)(a)Each tourism tax advisory board shall advise the county legislative body on the best use of revenues collected from the tax allowed under Section 59-12-301 by providing the legislative body with a priority listing for proposed expenditures based on projected available tax revenues supplied to the board by the county legislative body on an annual basis.(b)Each tourism tax advisory board in a county operating under the county commission form of government under Section 17-52a-20117-62-201 or the expanded county commission form under Section 17-52a-20217-62-202 shall advise the county legislative body on the best use of revenues collected from the tax allowed under Section 59-12-603 by providing the legislative body with a priority listing for proposed expenditures based on projected available tax revenues supplied to the board by the county legislative body on an annual basis.(5)A member of any county tourism tax advisory board:(a)may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's services; and(b)may receive per diem and travel expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties, in accordance with Section 11-55-103.

Section 135:
Section 135. Section 17-78-707, which is renumbered from Section 17-31-9 is renumbered and amended to read:17-31-917-78-707Effective 11/06/25. Payment to Stay Another Day and Bounce Back Fund and Hotel Impact Mitigation Fund.A county in which a qualified hotel, as defined in Section 63N-2-502, is located shall:(1)make an annual payment to the Division of Finance:(a)for deposit into the Stay Another Day and Bounce Back Fund, established in Section 63N-2-511;(b)for any year in which the Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity provides a convention incentive, as defined in Section 63N-2-502; and(c)in the amount of 5% of the state portion, as defined in Section 63N-2-502; and(2)make payments to the Division of Finance:(a)for deposit into the Hotel Impact Mitigation Fund, created in Section 63N-2-512;(b)for each year described in Subsection 63N-2-512(5)(a)(ii)63N-2-512(5) during which the balance of the Hotel Impact Mitigation Fund, defined in Section 63N-2-512, is less than $2,100,000 before any payment for that year under Subsection 63N-2-512(5)(a)63N-2-512(5); and(c)in the amount of the difference between $2,100,000 and the balance of the Hotel Impact Mitigation Fund, defined in Section 63N-2-512, before any payment for that year under Subsection 63N-2-512(5)(a)63N-2-512(5).

Section 136:
Section 136. Section 17-78-801, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-1 is renumbered and amended to read:8. Planetariums17-37-117-78-801Effective 11/06/25. County tax for public planetarium.(1)ForA county may annually levy a tax, not to exceed 0.00004 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property in the county, for: (a)the acquisition, construction, establishment, maintenance, and operation of a public planetarium; (b)or for the purpose of funding a contract or a lease agreement for the operation and management of a county planetarium,; (c)the provision of planetarium facilities and equipment,; and (d)for other planetarium services, any county may levy annually a tax not to exceed .00004 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property in the county.  (2)The tax described in Subsection (1) is in addition to all taxes levied by counties and is not limited by the levy limitation imposed on counties by law.   (3)The taxes described in this section shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other general taxes of the county and shall constitutethe revenue generated by the tax shall be deposited to a fund to be known as the County Planetarium Fund.

Section 137:
Section 137. Section 17-78-802, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-37-217-78-802Effective 11/06/25. Planetarium board of directors -- Establishment -- Expenses.(1)Upon the establishment of a county planetarium under the provisions of this chapterpart, or upon the determination of the county executive to contract for planetarium facilities and equipment and other planetarium services, the county executive shall:(a)with the advice and consent of the county legislative body, appoint a planetarium board of directors, chosen at large based upon fitness for the office; and(b)determine the number of people to serve as the board of directors.(2)Members of the county legislative body may serve on the board of directors, but not more than one member of the county legislative body may be a member of the board at any one time.(3)(a)Directors A director shall serve without compensation, but their .(b)A director's actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of theirthe director's official duties may be paid from the county planetarium fund.

Section 138:
Section 138. Section 17-78-803, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-37-317-78-803Effective 11/06/25. Appointment of directors -- Terms -- Removal of directors -- Vacancies.(1)Directors A planetarium director shall be appointed for three year termsa three-year term, or until their successors arethe director's successor is appointed. (2)Initially, appointments shall be made for one-, two-, and three -year terms. (3)Annually thereafter, the county executive, with the advice and consent of the county legislative body shall, before the first day of July of each year, appoint for a three-year term, directors to take the place of the retiring directors. (4)Directors shall serve not more than two full terms in succession. (5)Following such appointments, the directors shall meet and select a chairmanchair and suchany other officers, as they deemthe directors determine necessary, for one-year terms. (6)The county executive may remove any director for misconduct or neglect of duty. (7)Vacancies in the board of directors, occasioned by removals, resignations, or otherwise, shall be filled for the unexpired terms in the same manner as original appointments.

Section 139:
Section 139. Section 17-78-804, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-4 is renumbered and amended to read:17-37-417-78-804Effective 11/06/25. Delegation of management and control authority to directors by county executive body -- Contract or lease with private entity for management -- Deposit of money collected -- Expenditures -- Recommendations by directors to county executive body.(1)(a)Upon the appointment of a planetarium board of directors, the county executive may delegate to the board of directors the authority to manage and control the functions, activities, operations, maintenance, and repair of any county planetarium, and shall include in its delegation the authority to approve and control all expenditures from the county planetarium fund.  (b)Any delegation of authority made to the board of directors under this section shall at all times be subject to the ultimate authority and responsibility of the county executive for the management and control of all county funds and properties as conferred upon that board by general law applicable to counties.(2)(a)Upon the recommendation of the board of directors, the county may enter into a contract or lease agreement with a private organization or entity for partial or full management, operation and maintenance of any county planetarium and for other planetarium services, which may include providing the physical facilities and equipment for the operation of a planetarium.(b)A contract or lease for the purposes described in Subsection (2)(a) may not extend for more than a four-year period and shall be subject to annual review by the board of directors to determine if performance is in conformance with the terms of the contract or lease and to establish the level of the subsequent funding pursuant toin accordance with the contract or lease.(3)(a)All money collected from a county planetarium tax levy shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the county planetarium fund.  (b)All money collected from operations of or from donations to any planetarium owned and operated by the county shall also be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the planetarium fund.  (c)Any money collected from operations of a planetarium by a contracting party or lessee shall be used or deposited as the contract or lease may provide.  (d)Income or proceeds from any investment by the county treasurer of county planetarium funds shall be credited to the county planetarium fund and used only for planetarium purposes.(4)(a)Expenditures from the county planetarium fund shall be drawn upon by the authorized officers of the county upon presentation of properly authenticated vouchers or documentation of the board of directors or other appropriate planetarium official.  (b)The county planetarium fund may not be used for any purpose other than to pay the costs of acquiring, constructing, operating, managing, equipping, furnishing, maintaining or repairing a planetarium, including appropriate, reasonable and proportionate costs allocated by the county for support of the planetarium, or to pay the cost of financing and funding a contract or lease agreement for facilities, equipment, management, operation, and maintenance of a planetarium.(5)The planetarium board of directors shall provide recommendations to the county executive with respect to the purchase, lease, exchange, construction, erection, or other acquisition of land, real property improvements, and fixtures or the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of land, real property improvements, and fixtures for the use or benefit of a county planetarium.

Section 140:
Section 140. Section 17-78-805, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-37-517-78-805Effective 11/06/25. Budget prepared by directors -- Fiscal year -- Tax levy.(1)The planetarium board of directors shall prepare an annual budget and estimate of expenditures and in all other respects comply with the requirements of the Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Counties and all other general laws relating to budgeting, accounting, disbursing of funds, and other financial matters applicable to countiesChapter 63, Fiscal Authority and Processes. (2)A county planetarium shall operate on the same fiscal year as the county and upon approval by the county legislative body of a final fiscal year budget submitted by the board of directors, the county legislative body may, at the time and in the manner prescribed by law for levying general county taxes, levy a tax for planetarium purposes, as provided in this chapter, which shall be sufficient to provide funds for the approved annual budget; but the tax levy imposed may not exceed in any one year .00004 of taxable value of taxable property in the county.

Section 141:
Section 141. Section 17-78-806, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-6 is renumbered and amended to read:17-37-617-78-806Effective 11/06/25. Rules and regulations -- Use of planetarium by nonresidents.(1)The planetarium board of directors shall adopt rules and regulations for the use and operations of any planetarium acquired and established by the county.  (2)All persons A person visiting or using the planetarium shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the board.  (3)The board may exclude from the use of the planetarium any and all persons who willfully violate the rulesregulations.  (4)The board may extend the privileges and use of the planetarium to persons residing outside of the county upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by itsthe board's regulations.

Section 142:
Section 142. Section 17-78-807, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-7 is renumbered and amended to read:17-37-717-78-807Effective 11/06/25. Annual report -- Financial statement.(1)To the extent that independent accounting records are prepared and maintained by the planetarium, the planetarium board of directors shall make, or in the case of a contracting entity, require that there be made, an annual report to the county executive and the county legislative body on the condition and operation of the planetarium, including a financial statement.  (2)The financial statement described in Subsection (1) shall be: (a)prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and(b)consistently applied and shall be reviewed by the county auditor.  (3)The planetarium shall be included in the annual audit of the county conducted by an independent public accountant as required by Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act.

Section 143:
Section 143. Section 17-78-808, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-8 is renumbered and amended to read:17-37-817-78-808Effective 11/06/25. Director to be appointed -- Duties and compensation -- Other personnel.(1)(a)Subject to Subsection (1)(b), the county executive shall appoint a competent personindividual as planetarium director to have immediate charge of:(i)planetarium facilities and activities not contracted to an outside entity; and(ii)overseeing the performance of the terms of any contract or lease entered into with a contracting entity.(b)In a county with a form of government that has a county executive that is separate from the county legislative body, the appointment under Subsection (1)(a) shall be with the advice and consent of the county legislative body.(2)The planetarium director shall:(a)have such duties and receive such compensation for the director's services as the county executive shall determine; and(b)act as the executive officer for the planetarium board and implement the policies of the board.(3)(a)The county executive may appoint, upon the recommendation of the planetarium director, other planetarium personnel.(b)Each county employee working at the planetarium shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 33, County Personnel Management Act, and other general laws relating to county personnel mattersChapter 75, General County Personnel Management.

Section 144:
Section 144. Section 17-78-809, which is renumbered from Section 17-37-9 is renumbered and amended to read:17-37-917-78-809Effective 11/06/25. Donations permitted -- Use.(1)If a person desires to make donations of money, personal property, or real estate specifically for the benefit of a county planetarium, the board of directors may, with the consent of the county legislative body, accept those donations or other contributions. (2)The board of directors shall manage and administer the donations or contributions in accordance with the terms and conditions of the donating or contributing instrument. (3)All real property and improvements acquired by or specifically for a county planetarium by any means whatsoever, including gift, devise or donation, shall be deeded to and held in the name of the county.

Section 145:
Section 145. Section 17-78-901, which is renumbered from Section 17-38-1 is renumbered and amended to read:9. Zoos17-38-117-78-901Effective 11/06/25. Tax levy for establishment of zoo.(1)For the establishment and maintenance of a public zoo counties A county may levy annually a tax not exceeding .0002 of taxable value of taxable property in the county for the establishment and maintenance of a public zoo.  (2)The tax described in Subsection (1) is in addition to all taxes levied by counties and is not limited by the levy limitation imposed on counties by law.  (3)The taxes described in this section shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other general taxes of the county and shall be deposited in a fund to be known as a County Zoo Fund.

Section 146:
Section 146. Section 17-78-902, which is renumbered from Section 17-38-2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-38-217-78-902Effective 11/06/25. Operation and maintenance of zoo -- Advisory board -- Contract for services.(1)Upon the establishment of a county zoo under this actpart, the county legislative body may provide rules and regulations for itsthe zoo's governance and operation, including the establishment of an advisory board. (2)The county executive may contract with an agency or vendor to supply all or part of the services necessary for the operation and maintenance of a county zoo.

Section 147:
Section 147. Section 17-78-903, which is renumbered from Section 17-38-3 is renumbered and amended to read:17-38-317-78-903Effective 11/06/25. Donations.The county may, for the benefit of the zoo, accept donations of money, personal property, or real estate upon such terms and conditions as itthe county sees fit.

Section 148:
Section 148. Section 17-78-1001, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-323 is renumbered and amended to read:10. Counties and Certain Business17-50-32317-78-1001Effective 11/06/25. Indemnification of farmers markets.A county may:(1)operate a farmers market, as defined in Section 4-5-102, on county-owned property in order to promote economic development;(2)indemnify a food producer participating in the farmers market; and(3)define the scope of the indemnification in an agreement with the food producer.

Section 149:
Section 149. Section 17-78-1002, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-329.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-329.517-78-1002Effective 11/06/25. Regulation of drive-through facilities.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Business" means a private enterprise carried on for the purpose of gain or economic profit.(b)(i)"Business lobby" means a public area, including a lobby, dining area, or other area accessible to the public where business is conducted within a place of business.(ii)"Business lobby" does not include the area of a business where drive-through service is conducted.(c)"Land use application" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-27a-103.(d)(i)"Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle, including a motorcycle, intended primarily for use and operation on the highways.(ii)"Motor vehicle" does not include an off-highway vehicle.(e)"Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle having a saddle for the use of the operator and designed to travel on not more than two tires.(f)"Off-highway vehicle" means any snowmobile, all-terrain type I vehicle, all-terrain type II vehicle, or all-terrain type III vehicle.(2)A county may not withhold a business license, deny a land use application, or otherwise require a business that has a drive-through service as a component of its business operations to:(a)allow a person other than a person in a motorized vehicle to use the drive-through service; or(b)offer designated hours of the day that a customer is accommodated and business is conducted in the business lobby that are the same as or exceed the hours of the day that a customer is accommodated and business is conducted in the drive-through service.

Section 150:
Section 150. Section 17-78-1003, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-331 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-33117-78-1003Effective 11/06/25. Regulation of sexually oriented business.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Adult service" means dancing, serving food or beverages, modeling, posing, wrestling, singing, reading, talking, listening, or other performances or activities conducted by a nude or partially denuded individual for compensation.(b)"Compensation" means:(i)a salary;(ii)a fee;(iii)a commission;(iv)employment;(v)a profit; or(vi)other pecuniary gain.(c)(i)"Escort" means a person who, for compensation, dates, socializes with, visits, consorts with, or accompanies another, or offers to date, consort with, socialize with, visit, or accompany another:(A)to a social affair, entertainment, or a place of amusement; or(B)within:(I)a place of public or private resort;(II)a business or commercial establishment; or(III)a private quarter.(ii)"Escort" does not mean a person who provides business or personal services, including:(A)a licensed private nurse;(B)an aide for the elderly or a person with a disability;(C)a social secretary or similar service personnel:(I)whose relationship with a patron is characterized by a contractual relationship having a duration of 12 hours or more; and(II)who provides a service not principally characterized as dating or socializing; or(D)a person who provides services such as singing telegrams, birthday greetings, or similar activities:(I)characterized by an appearance in a public place;(II)contracted for by a party other than the person for whom the service is being performed; and(III)of a duration not to exceed one hour.(d)"Escort service" means any person who furnishes or arranges for an escort to accompany another individual for compensation.(e)"Nude or partially denuded individual" means an individual with any of the following less than completely and opaquely covered:(i)genitals;(ii)the pubic region; or(iii)a female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola.(f)(i)"Sexually oriented business" means a business at which any nude or partially denuded individual, regardless of whether the nude or partially denuded individual is an employee of the sexually oriented business or an independent contractor, performs any service for compensation.(ii)"Sexually oriented business" includes:(A)an escort service; or(B)an adult service.(2)A person employed in a sexually oriented business may not work in the unincorporated area of a county:(a)if the county requires that a person employed in a sexually oriented business be licensed individually; and(b)if the person is not licensed by the county.(3)A business entity that conducts a sexually oriented business may not conduct business in an unincorporated area of a county:(a)if the county requires that a sexually oriented business be licensed; and(b)if the business entity is not licensed by the county.

Section 151:
Section 151. Section 17-78-1004, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-333 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-33317-78-1004Effective 11/06/25. Regulation of retail tobacco specialty business.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Community location" means:(i)a public or private kindergarten, elementary, middle, junior high, or high school;(ii)a licensed child-care facility or preschool;(iii)a trade or technical school;(iv)a church;(v)a public library;(vi)a public playground;(vii)a public park;(viii)a youth center or other space used primarily for youth oriented activities;(ix)a public recreational facility;(x)a public arcade; or(xi)for a new license issued on or after July 1, 2018, a homeless shelter.(b)"Department" means the Department of Health and Human Services created in Section 26B-1-201.(c)"Electronic cigarette product" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-9-1101.(d)"Licensee" means a person licensed under this section to conduct business as a retail tobacco specialty business.(e)"Local health department" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26A-1-102.(f)"Nicotine product" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-9-1101.(g)"Retail tobacco specialty business" means a commercial establishment in which:(i)sales of tobacco products, electronic cigarette products, and nicotine products account for more than 35% of the total quarterly gross receipts for the establishment;(ii)20% or more of the public retail floor space is allocated to the offer, display, or storage of tobacco products, electronic cigarette products, or nicotine products;(iii)20% or more of the total shelf space is allocated to the offer, display, or storage of tobacco products, electronic cigarette products, or nicotine products;(iv)the commercial establishment:(A)holds itself out as a retail tobacco specialty business; and(B)causes a reasonable person to believe the commercial establishment is a retail tobacco specialty business; or(v)the retail space features a self-service display for tobacco products, electronic cigarette products, or nicotine products.(h)"Self-service display" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-9-1107.(i)"Tobacco product" means:(i)the same as that term is defined in Section 76-9-1101; or(ii)tobacco paraphernalia as defined in Section 76-9-1101.(2)The regulation of a retail tobacco specialty business is an exercise of the police powers of the state by the state or by the delegation of the state's police power to other governmental entities.(3)(a)A person may not operate a retail tobacco specialty business in a county unless the person obtains a license from the county in which the retail tobacco specialty business is located.(b)A county may only issue a retail tobacco specialty business license to a person if the person complies with the provisions of Subsections (4) and (5).(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (7), a county may not issue a license for a person to conduct business as a retail tobacco specialty business if the retail tobacco specialty business is located within:(i)1,000 feet of a community location;(ii)600 feet of another retail tobacco specialty business; or(iii)600 feet from property used or zoned for:(A)agriculture use; or(B)residential use.(b)For purposes of Subsection (4)(a), the proximity requirements shall be measured in a straight line from the nearest entrance of the retail tobacco specialty business to the nearest property boundary of a location described in Subsections (4)(a)(i) through (iii), without regard to intervening structures or zoning districts.(5)A county may not issue or renew a license for a person to conduct business as a retail tobacco specialty business until the person provides the county with proof that the retail tobacco specialty business has:(a)a valid permit for a retail tobacco specialty business issued under Title 26B, Chapter 7, Part 5, Regulation of Smoking, Tobacco Products, and Nicotine Products, by the local health department having jurisdiction over the area in which the retail tobacco specialty business is located; and(b)(i)for a retailer that sells a tobacco product, a valid license issued by the State Tax Commission in accordance with Section 59-14-201 or 59-14-301 to sell a tobacco product; or(ii)for a retailer that sells an electronic cigarette product or a nicotine product, a valid license issued by the State Tax Commission in accordance with Section 59-14-803 to sell an electronic cigarette product or a nicotine product.(6)(a)Nothing in this section:(i)requires a county to issue a retail tobacco specialty business license; or(ii)prohibits a county from adopting more restrictive requirements on a person seeking a license or renewal of a license to conduct business as a retail tobacco specialty business.(b)A county may suspend or revoke a retail tobacco specialty business license issued under this section:(i)if a licensee engages in a pattern of unlawful activity under Title 76, Chapter 17, Part 4, Offenses Concerning a Pattern of Unlawful Activity;(ii)if a licensee violates federal law or federal regulations restricting the sale and distribution of tobacco products or electronic cigarette products to protect children and adolescents;(iii)upon the recommendation of the department or a local health department under Title 26B, Chapter 7, Part 5, Regulation of Smoking, Tobacco Products, and Nicotine Products; or(iv)under any other provision of state law or local ordinance.(7)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (7)(e), a retail tobacco specialty business is exempt from Subsection (4) if:(i)on or before December 31, 2018, the retail tobacco specialty business was issued a license to conduct business as a retail tobacco specialty business;(ii)the retail tobacco specialty business is operating in a county in accordance with all applicable laws except for the requirement in Subsection (4); and(iii)beginning July 1, 2022, the retail tobacco specialty business is not located within 1,000 feet of a public or private kindergarten, elementary, middle, junior high, or high school.(b)A retail tobacco specialty business may maintain an exemption under Subsection (7)(a) if:(i)the license described in Subsection (7)(a)(i) is renewed continuously without lapse or permanent revocation;(ii)the retail tobacco specialty business does not close for business or otherwise suspend the sale of tobacco products, electronic cigarette products, or nicotine products for more than 60 consecutive days;(iii)the retail tobacco specialty business does not substantially change the business premises or business operation; and(iv)the retail tobacco specialty business maintains the right to operate under the terms of other applicable laws, including:(A)Title 26, Chapter 38, Section 26B-7-503, Utah Indoor Clean Air Act;(B)zoning ordinances;(C)building codes; and(D)the requirements of the license described in Subsection (7)(a)(i).(c)A retail tobacco specialty business that does not qualify for an exemption under Subsection (7)(a) is exempt from Subsection (4) if:(i)on or before December 31, 2018, the retail tobacco specialty business was issued a general tobacco retailer permit or a retail tobacco specialty business permit under Title 26, Chapter 62, Tobacco, Electronic Cigarette, and Nicotine Product Retail PermitTitle 26B, Chapter 7, Part 5, Regulation of Smoking, Tobacco Products, and Nicotine Products, by the local health department having jurisdiction over the area in which the retail tobacco specialty business is located;(ii)the retail tobacco specialty business is operating in the county in accordance with all applicable laws except for the requirement in Subsection (4); and(iii)beginning July 1, 2022, the retail tobacco specialty business is not located within 1,000 feet of a public or private kindergarten, elementary, middle, junior high, or high school.(d)A retail tobacco specialty business may maintain an exemption under Subsection (7)(c) if:(i)on or before December 31, 2020, the retail tobacco specialty business receives a retail tobacco specialty business permit from the local health department having jurisdiction over the area in which the retail tobacco specialty business is located;(ii)the permit described in Subsection (7)(d)(i) is renewed continuously without lapse or permanent revocation;(iii)the retail tobacco specialty business does not close for business or otherwise suspend the sale of tobacco products, electronic cigarette products, or nicotine products for more than 60 consecutive days;(iv)the retail tobacco specialty business does not substantially change the business premises or business operation as the business existed when the retail tobacco specialty business received a permit under Subsection (7)(d)(i); and(v)the retail tobacco specialty business maintains the right to operate under the terms of other applicable laws, including:(A)Title 26, Chapter 38,Section 26B-7-503, Utah Indoor Clean Air Act;(B)zoning ordinances;(C)building codes; and(D)the requirements of the retail tobacco permit described in Subsection (7)(d)(i).(e)A retail tobacco specialty business described in Subsection (7)(a) or (b) that is located within 1,000 feet of a public or private kindergarten, elementary, middle, junior high, or high school before July 1, 2022, is exempt from Subsection (4)(a)(iii)(B) if the retail tobacco specialty business:(i)relocates, before July 1, 2022, to a property that is used or zoned for commercial use and located within a group of architecturally unified commercial establishments built on a site that is planned, developed, owned, and managed as an operating unit; and(ii)continues to meet the requirements described in Subsection (7)(b) that are not directly related to the relocation described in this Subsection (7)(e).

Section 152:
Section 152. Section 17-78-1005, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-339 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-33917-78-1005Effective 11/06/25. Prohibition on licensing or certification of child care programs.(1)(a)As used in this section, "child care program" means a child care facility or program operated by a person who holds a license or certificate from the Department of Health and Human Services under Title 26B, Chapter 2, Part 4, Child Care Licensing.(b)"Child care program" does not include a child care program for which a county provides oversight, as described in Subsection 26B-2-405(2)(e).(2)A county may not enact or enforce an ordinance that:(a)imposes licensing or certification requirements for a child care program; or(b)governs the manner in which care is provided in a child care program.(3)This section does not prohibit a county from:(a)requiring a business license to operate a business within the county; or(b)imposing requirements related to building, health, and fire codes.

Section 153:
Section 153. Section 17-78-1101, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-341 is renumbered and amended to read:11. County Regulation of Particular Non-County Property17-50-34117-78-1101Effective 11/06/25. Ordinances regarding co-ownership -- Prohibition on county ordinances restricting co-ownership models.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Co-owned home" means any residential unit that is jointly owned, in any manner or form, by any combination of individuals or entities.(b)"Residential unit" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-50-33817-78-1102.(2)Notwithstanding Section 17-27a-50117-79-501 or Subsection 17-27a-503(1)17-79-503(1), a county legislative body may not:(a)adopt or enforce a land use regulation that governs co-owned homes differently than other residential units; or(b)use a land use regulation that regulates co-owned homes to fine, charge, prosecute, or otherwise punish an individual solely for the act of owning or using a co-owned home.(3)Notwithstanding Subsection (2), a legislative body may adopt and enforce land use regulations, if the regulations are applied equally to all residential units, including co-owned homes.(4)This section does not limit homeowners' associations or condominium associations from adopting rules or regulations governing co-owned homes.(5)Nothing in this section limits a county's authority to adopt or enforce regulations regarding:(a)accessory dwelling units, as defined in Section 17-27a-10317-79-102;(b)internal accessory dwelling units, as defined in Section 17-27a-510.517-79-611; or(c)the rental of a residential unit for fewer than 30 days consistent with Section 17-50-33817-78-1102.

Section 154:
Section 154. Section 17-78-1102, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-338 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-33817-78-1102Effective 11/06/25. Ordinances regarding short-term rentals -- Prohibition on ordinances restricting speech on short-term rental websites -- Evidence of short-term rental -- Removing a listing.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Internal accessory dwelling unit" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-511.5.(b)"Permit number" means a unique identifier issued by a county and may include a business license number.(c)"Request" means a formal inquiry made by a county to a short-term rental website that is not a legal requirement.(d)"Residential unit" means a residential structure or any portion of a residential structure that is occupied as a residence.(e)"Short-term rental" means a residential unit or any portion of a residential unit that the owner of record or the lessee of the residential unit offers for occupancy for fewer than 30 consecutive days.(f)"Short-term rental website" means a website or other digital platform that:(i)allows a person to offer a short-term rental to one or more prospective renters; and(ii)facilitates the renting of, and payment for, a short-term rental.(g)"URL" means uniform resource locater.(2)Notwithstanding Section 17-27a-50117-79-501 or Subsection 17-27a-503(1)17-79-503(1), a legislative body may not:(a)enact or enforce an ordinance that prohibits an individual from listing or offering a short-term rental on a short-term rental website; or(b)use an ordinance that prohibits the act of renting a short-term rental to fine, charge, prosecute, or otherwise punish an individual solely for the act of listing or offering a short-term rental on a short-term rental website.(3)If a county regulates short-term rentals, Subsection (2)(b) does not prevent the county from using a listing or offering of a short-term rental on a short-term rental website as evidence that a short-term rental took place so long as the county has additional information to support the position that a property owner or lessee violated a county ordinance.(4)A county may adopt an ordinance requiring the owner or lessee of a short-term rental to obtain a business license or other permit from the county before operating a short-term rental within an unincorporated area of the county.(5)(a)A county may not regulate a short-term rental website.(b)If a county allows short-term rentals within a portion of or all residential or commercial unincorporated zones in the county, the legislative body of a county may only request a short-term rental website to remove a short-term rental listing or offering from the short-term rental website after notice from the county, as described in Subsection (5), only if the short-term rental is operating in violation of business license requirements or zoning requirements.(6)A county that provides a notice to a short-term rental website that a short-term rental within the unincorporated county is in violation of the county's business licensing requirements or zoning requirements shall identify in the notice:(a)the listing or offering to be removed by the listing's or offering's URL; and(b)the reason for the requested removal.(7)If a legislative body imposes transient room tax on the rental of rooms in hotels, motels, inns, trailer courts, campgrounds, tourist homes, and similar accommodations for stays of less than 30 consecutive days as authorized by Section 59-12-301:(a)the county may utilize a listing or offering of a short-term rental on a short-term rental website as evidence that the owner or lessee of a short-term rental may be subject to the transient room tax; and(b)the county auditor may utilize the listing or offering of a short-term rental on a short-term rental website when making a referral to the State Tax Commission, as described in Section 59-12-302.(8)Subsection (2) does not apply to an individual who lists or offers an internal accessory dwelling unit as a short-term rental on a short-term rental website if the county records a notice for the internal accessory dwelling unit under Subsection 17-27a-526(6)Section 17-78-303.

Section 155:
Section 155. Section 17-78-1103, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-327 is renumbered and amended to read:17-50-32717-78-1103Effective 11/06/25. Regulation of carbon monoxide detectors -- Enforcement against occupant only.(1)Subject to Subsection (2), a county may not enforce an ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring the installation or maintenance of a carbon monoxide detector in a residential dwelling against anyone other than the occupant of the dwelling.(2)Subsection (1) may not be construed to affect:(a)a building permit applicant's obligation to comply with a building code that requires the installation of a carbon monoxide detector as part of new construction; or(b)a county's ability to require a building permit applicant to comply with a building code that requires the installation of a carbon monoxide detector as part of new construction.

Section 156:
Section 156. Section 17-78-1104, which is renumbered from Section 17-15-29 is renumbered and amended to read:17-15-2917-78-1104Effective 11/06/25. Easement for utility use -- Realignment at property owner's expense.(1)As used in this section, "utility easement" means an easement acquired by a county through the use of eminent domain to provide utility services to the county's residents.(2)The owner of a servient estate subject to a utility easement may realign the easement at the servient estate owner's expense unless the alignment cannot be reasonably changed because of engineering or safety requirements.

Section 157:
Section 157. Section 17-79-101, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-102 is renumbered and amended to read:79. County Land Use, Development, and Management Act1. General Provisions17-27a-10217-79-101Effective 11/06/25. Purposes -- General land use authority -- Limitations.(1)(a)The purposes of this chapter are to:(i)provide for the health, safety, and welfare;(ii)promote the prosperity;(iii)improve the morals, peace, good order, comfort, convenience, and aesthetics of each county and each county's present and future inhabitants and businesses;(iv)protect the tax base;(v)secure economy in governmental expenditures;(vi)foster the state's agricultural and other industries;(vii)protect both urban and nonurban development;(viii)protect and ensure access to sunlight for solar energy devices;(ix)provide fundamental fairness in land use regulation;(x)facilitate orderly growth, allow growth in a variety of housing types, and contribute toward housing affordability; and(xi)protect property values.(b)Subject to Subsection (4) and Section 11-41-103, to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, a county may enact all ordinances, resolutions, and rules and may enter into other forms of land use controls and development agreements that the county considers necessary or appropriate for the use and development of land within the unincorporated area of the county or a designated mountainous planning district, including ordinances, resolutions, rules, restrictive covenants, easements, and development agreements governing:(i)uses;(ii)density;(iii)open spaces;(iv)structures;(v)buildings;(vi)energy-efficiency;(vii)light and air;(viii)air quality;(ix)transportation and public or alternative transportation;(x)infrastructure;(xi)street and building orientation and width requirements;(xii)public facilities;(xiii)fundamental fairness in land use regulation; and(xiv)considerations of surrounding land uses to balance the foregoing purposes with a landowner's private property interests and associated statutory and constitutional protections.(2)Each county shall comply with the mandatory provisions of this part before any agreement or contract to provide goods, services, or municipal-type services to any storage facility or transfer facility for high-level nuclear waste, or greater than class C radioactive waste, may be executed or implemented.(3)(a)Any ordinance, resolution, or rule enacted by a county pursuant to itsin accordance with the county's authority under this chapter shall comply with the state's exclusive jurisdiction to regulate oil and gas activity, as described in Section 40-6-2.5.(b)A county may enact an ordinance, resolution, or rule that regulates surface activity incident to an oil and gas activity if the county demonstrates that the regulation:(i)is necessary for the purposes of this chapter;(ii)does not effectively or unduly limit, ban, or prohibit an oil and gas activity; and(iii)does not interfere with the state's exclusive jurisdiction to regulate oil and gas activity, as described in Section 40-6-2.5.(4)(a)This Subsection (4) applies to development agreements entered into on or after May 5, 2021.(b)A provision in a county development agreement is unenforceable if the provision requires an individual or an entity, as a condition for issuing building permits or otherwise regulating development activities within an unincorporated area of the county, to initiate a process for a municipality to annex the unincorporated area in accordance with Title 10, Chapter 2, Part 8, Annexation.(c)Subsection (4)(b) does not affect or impair the enforceability of any other provision in the development agreement.

Section 158:
Section 158. Section 17-79-102, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-103 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-10317-79-102Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Accessory dwelling unit" means a habitable living unit added to, created within, or detached from a primary single-family dwelling and contained on one lot.(2)"Adversely affected party" means a person other than a land use applicant who:(a)owns real property adjoining the property that is the subject of a land use application or land use decision; or(b)will suffer a damage different in kind than, or an injury distinct from, that of the general community as a result of the land use decision.(3)"Affected entity" means a county, municipality, special district, special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, school district, interlocal cooperation entity established under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, specified property owner, property owner's association, public utility, or the Department of Transportation, if:(a)the entity's services or facilities are likely to require expansion or significant modification because of an intended use of land;(b)the entity has filed with the county a copy of the entity's general or long-range plan; or(c)the entity has filed with the county a request for notice during the same calendar year and before the county provides notice to an affected entity in compliance with a requirement imposed under this chapter.(4)"Affected owner" means the owner of real property that is:(a)a single project;(b)the subject of a land use approval that sponsors of a referendum timely challenged in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-601(6); and(c)determined to be legally referable under Section 20A-7-602.8.(5)"Appeal authority" means the person, board, commission, agency, or other body designated by ordinance to decide an appeal of a decision of a land use application or a variance.(6)"Billboard" means a freestanding ground sign located on industrial, commercial, or residential property if the sign is designed or intended to direct attention to a business, product, or service that is not sold, offered, or existing on the property where the sign is located.(7)"Building code adoption cycle" means the period of time beginning the day on which a specific edition of a construction code from a nationally recognized code authority is adopted and effective in Title 15A, State Construction and Fire Codes Act, until the day before a new edition of a construction code is adopted and effective in Title 15A, State Construction and Fire Codes Act.(8)(a)"Boundary adjustment" means an agreement between adjoining property owners to relocate a common boundary that results in a conveyance of property between the adjoining lots, adjoining parcels, or adjoining lots and parcels.(b)"Boundary adjustment" does not mean a modification of a lot or parcel boundary that:(i)creates an additional lot or parcel; or(ii)is made by the Department of Transportation.(9)(a)"Boundary establishment" means an agreement between adjoining property owners to clarify the location of an ambiguous, uncertain, or disputed common boundary.(b)"Boundary establishment" does not mean a modification of a lot or parcel boundary that:(i)creates an additional lot or parcel; or(ii)is made by the Department of Transportation.(10)(a)"Charter school" means:(i)an operating charter school;(ii)a charter school applicant that a charter school authorizer approves in accordance with Title 53G, Chapter 5, Part 3, Charter School Authorization; or(iii)an entity that is working on behalf of a charter school or approved charter applicant to develop or construct a charter school building.(b)"Charter school" does not include a therapeutic school.(11)"Chief executive officer" means the person or body that exercises the executive powers of the county.(12)"Conditional use" means a land use that, because of the unique characteristics or potential impact of the land use on the county, surrounding neighbors, or adjacent land uses, may not be compatible in some areas or may be compatible only if certain conditions are required that mitigate or eliminate the detrimental impacts.(13)"Constitutional taking" means a governmental action that results in a taking of private property so that compensation to the owner of the property is required by the:(a)Fifth or Fourteenth Amendment of the Constitution of the United States; or(b)Utah Constitution, Article I, Section 22.(14)"Conveyance document" means an instrument that:(a)meets the definition of "document" in Section 57-1-1; and(b)meets the requirements of Section 57-1-45.5.(15)"Conveyance of property" means the transfer of ownership of any portion of real property from one person to another person.(16)"County utility easement" means an easement that:(a)a plat recorded in a county recorder's office described as a county utility easement or otherwise as a utility easement;(b)is not a protected utility easement or a public utility easement as defined in Section 54-3-27;(c)the county or the county's affiliated governmental entity owns or creates; and(d)(i)either:(A)no person uses or occupies; or(B)the county or the county's affiliated governmental entity uses and occupies to provide a utility service, including sanitary sewer, culinary water, electrical, storm water, or communications or data lines; or(ii)a person uses or occupies with or without an authorized franchise or other agreement with the county.(17)"Culinary water authority" means the department, agency, or public entity with responsibility to review and approve the feasibility of the culinary water system and sources for the subject property.(18)"Department of Transportation" means the entity created in Section 72-1-201.(19)"Development activity" means:(a)any construction or expansion of a building, structure, or use that creates additional demand and need for public facilities;(b)any change in use of a building or structure that creates additional demand and need for public facilities; or(c)any change in the use of land that creates additional demand and need for public facilities.(20)(a)"Development agreement" means a written agreement or amendment to a written agreement between a county and one or more parties that regulates or controls the use or development of a specific area of land.(b)"Development agreement" does not include an improvement completion assurance.(21)(a)"Disability" means a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of a person's major life activities, including a person having a record of such an impairment or being regarded as having such an impairment.(b)"Disability" does not include current illegal use of, or addiction to, any federally controlled substance, as defined in Section 102 of the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 802.(22)"Document" means the same as that term is defined in Section 57-1-1.(23)"Educational facility":(a)means:(i)a school district's building at which pupils assemble to receive instruction in a program for any combination of grades from preschool through grade 12, including kindergarten and a program for children with disabilities;(ii)a structure or facility:(A)located on the same property as a building described in Subsection (23)(a)(i); and(B)used in support of the use of that building; and(iii)a building to provide office and related space to a school district's administrative personnel; and(b)does not include:(i)land or a structure, including land or a structure for inventory storage, equipment storage, food processing or preparing, vehicle storage or maintenance, or similar use that is:(A)not located on the same property as a building described in Subsection (23)(a)(i); and(B)used in support of the purposes of a building described in Subsection (23)(a)(i); or(ii)a therapeutic school.(24)"Establishment document" means an instrument that:(a)meets the definition of "document" in Section 57-1-1; and(b)meets the requirements of Section 57-1-45.(25)"Full boundary adjustment" means a boundary adjustment that is not a simple boundary adjustment.(26)"Fire authority" means the department, agency, or public entity with responsibility to review and approve the feasibility of fire protection and suppression services for the subject property.(27)"Flood plain" means land that:(a)is within the 100-year flood plain designated by the Federal Emergency Management Agency; or(b)has not been studied or designated by the Federal Emergency Management Agency but presents a likelihood of experiencing chronic flooding or a catastrophic flood event because the land has characteristics that are similar to those of a 100-year flood plain designated by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.(28)"Gas corporation" has the same meaning as defined in Section 54-2-1.(29)"General plan" means a document that a county adopts that sets forth general guidelines for proposed future development of:(a)the unincorporated land within the county; or(b)for a mountainous planning district, the land within the mountainous planning district.(30)"Geologic hazard" means:(a)a surface fault rupture;(b)shallow groundwater;(c)liquefaction;(d)a landslide;(e)a debris flow;(f)unstable soil;(g)a rock fall; or(h)any other geologic condition that presents a risk:(i)to life;(ii)of substantial loss of real property; or(iii)of substantial damage to real property.(31)"Home-based microschool" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-6-201.(32)"Hookup fee" means a fee for the installation and inspection of any pipe, line, meter, or appurtenance to connect to a county water, sewer, storm water, power, or other utility system.(33)(a)"Identical plans" means floor plans submitted to a county that:(i)are submitted within the same building code adoption cycle as floor plans that were previously approved by the county;(ii)have no structural differences from floor plans that were previously approved by the county; and(iii)describe a building that:(A)is located on land zoned the same as the land on which the building described in the previously approved plans is located;(B)has a substantially identical floor plan to a floor plan previously approved by the county; and(C)does not require any engineering or analysis beyond a review to confirm the submitted floor plans are substantially identical to a floor plan previously approved by the county or a review of the site plan and associated geotechnical reports for the site.(b)"Identical plans" include floor plans that are oriented differently as the floor plan that was previously approved by the county.(34)"Impact fee" means a payment of money imposed under Title 11, Chapter 36a, Impact Fees Act.(35)"Improvement completion assurance" means a surety bond, letter of credit, financial institution bond, cash, assignment of rights, lien, or other equivalent security required by a county to guaranty the proper completion of landscaping or an infrastructure improvement required as a condition precedent to:(a)recording a subdivision plat; or(b)development of a commercial, industrial, mixed use, or multifamily project.(36)"Improvement warranty" means an applicant's unconditional warranty that the applicant's installed and accepted landscaping or infrastructure improvement:(a)complies with the county's written standards for design, materials, and workmanship; and(b)will not fail in any material respect, as a result of poor workmanship or materials, within the improvement warranty period.(37)"Improvement warranty period" means a period:(a)no later than one year after a county's acceptance of required public landscaping; or(b)no later than one year after a county's acceptance of required infrastructure, unless the county:(i)determines, based on accepted industry standards and for good cause, that a one-year period would be inadequate to protect the public health, safety, and welfare; and(ii)has substantial evidence, on record:(A)of prior poor performance by the applicant; or(B)that the area upon which the infrastructure will be constructed contains suspect soil and the county has not otherwise required the applicant to mitigate the suspect soil.(38)"Infrastructure improvement" means permanent infrastructure that is essential for the public health and safety or that:(a)is required for human consumption; and(b)an applicant mustshall install:(i)in accordance with published installation and inspection specifications for public improvements; and(ii)as a condition of:(A)recording a subdivision plat;(B)obtaining a building permit; or(C)developing a commercial, industrial, mixed use, condominium, or multifamily project.(39)"Internal lot restriction" means a platted note, platted demarcation, or platted designation that:(a)runs with the land; and(b)(i)creates a restriction that is enclosed within the perimeter of a lot described on the plat; or(ii)designates a development condition that is enclosed within the perimeter of a lot described on the plat.(40)"Interstate pipeline company" means a person or entity engaged in natural gas transportation subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission under the Natural Gas Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 717 et seq.(41)"Intrastate pipeline company" means a person or entity engaged in natural gas transportation that is not subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission under the Natural Gas Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 717 et seq.(42)"Land use applicant" means a property owner, or the property owner's designee, who submits a land use application regarding the property owner's land.(43)"Land use application":(a)means an application that is:(i)required by a county; and(ii)submitted by a land use applicant to obtain a land use decision; and(b)does not mean an application to enact, amend, or repeal a land use regulation.(44)"Land use authority" means:(a)a person, board, commission, agency, or body, including the local legislative body, designated by the local legislative body to act upon a land use application; or(b)if the local legislative body has not designated a person, board, commission, agency, or body, the local legislative body.(45)"Land use decision" means an administrative decision of a land use authority or appeal authority regarding:(a)a land use permit;(b)a land use application; or(c)the enforcement of a land use regulation, land use permit, or development agreement.(46)"Land use permit" means a permit issued by a land use authority.(47)"Land use regulation":(a)means a legislative decision enacted by ordinance, law, code, map, resolution, engineering or development standard, specification for public improvement, fee, or rule that governs the use or development of land;(b)includes the adoption or amendment of a zoning map or the text of the zoning code; and(c)does not include:(i)a land use decision of the legislative body acting as the land use authority, even if the decision is expressed in a resolution or ordinance; or(ii)a temporary revision to an engineering specification that does not materially:(A)increase a land use applicant's cost of development compared to the existing specification; or(B)impact a land use applicant's use of land.(48)"Legislative body" means the county legislative body, or for a county that has adopted an alternative form of government, the body exercising legislative powers.(49)"Lot" means a tract of land, regardless of any label, that is created by and shown on a subdivision plat that has been recorded in the office of the county recorder.(50)"Major transit investment corridor" means public transit service that uses or occupies:(a)public transit rail right-of-way;(b)dedicated road right-of-way for the use of public transit, such as bus rapid transit; or(c)fixed-route bus corridors subject to an interlocal agreement or contract between a municipality or county and:(i)a public transit district as defined in Section 17B-2a-802; or(ii)an eligible political subdivision as defined in Section 59-12-2202.(51)"Micro-education entity" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-6-201.(52)"Moderate income housing" means housing occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to or less than 80% of the median gross income for households of the same size in the county in which the housing is located.(53)"Mountainous planning district" means an area designated by a county legislative body in accordance with Section 17-27a-90117-79-408.(54)"Nominal fee" means a fee that reasonably reimburses a county only for time spent and expenses incurred in:(a)verifying that building plans are identical plans; and(b)reviewing and approving those minor aspects of identical plans that differ from the previously reviewed and approved building plans.(55)"Noncomplying structure" means a structure that:(a)legally existed before the structure's current land use designation; and(b)because of one or more subsequent land use ordinance changes, does not conform to the setback, height restrictions, or other regulations, excluding those regulations that govern the use of land.(56)"Nonconforming use" means a use of land that:(a)legally existed before the current land use designation;(b)has been maintained continuously since the time the land use ordinance regulation governing the land changed; and(c)because of one or more subsequent land use ordinance changes, does not conform to the regulations that now govern the use of the land.(57)"Official map" means a map drawn by county authorities and recorded in the county recorder's office that:(a)shows actual and proposed rights-of-way, centerline alignments, and setbacks for highways and other transportation facilities;(b)provides a basis for restricting development in designated rights-of-way or between designated setbacks to allow the government authorities time to purchase or otherwise reserve the land; and(c)has been adopted as an element of the county's general plan.(58)"Parcel" means any real property that is not a lot.(59)"Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, organization, association, trust, governmental agency, or any other legal entity.(60)"Plan for moderate income housing" means a written document adopted by a county legislative body that includes:(a)an estimate of the existing supply of moderate income housing located within the county;(b)an estimate of the need for moderate income housing in the county for the next five years;(c)a survey of total residential land use;(d)an evaluation of how existing land uses and zones affect opportunities for moderate income housing; and(e)a description of the county's program to encourage an adequate supply of moderate income housing.(61)"Planning advisory area" means a contiguous, geographically defined portion of the unincorporated area of a county established under this part with planning and zoning functions as exercised through the planning advisory area planning commission, as provided in this chapter, but with no legal or political identity separate from the county and no taxing authority.(62)"Plat" means an instrument subdividing property into lots as depicted on a map or other graphical representation of lands that a licensed professional land surveyor makes and prepares in accordance with Section 17-27a-60317-79-703 or 57-8-13.(63)"Potential geologic hazard area" means an area that:(a)is designated by a Utah Geological Survey map, county geologist map, or other relevant map or report as needing further study to determine the area's potential for geologic hazard; or(b)has not been studied by the Utah Geological Survey or a county geologist but presents the potential of geologic hazard because the area has characteristics similar to those of a designated geologic hazard area.(64)"Public agency" means:(a)the federal government;(b)the state;(c)a county, municipality, school district, special district, special service district, or other political subdivision of the state; or(d)a charter school.(65)"Public hearing" means a hearing at which members of the public are provided a reasonable opportunity to comment on the subject of the hearing.(66)"Public meeting" means a meeting that is required to be open to the public under Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(67)"Public street" means a public right-of-way, including a public highway, public avenue, public boulevard, public parkway, public road, public lane, public alley, public viaduct, public subway, public tunnel, public bridge, public byway, other public transportation easement, or other public way.(68)"Receiving zone" means an unincorporated area that a county designates, by ordinance, as an area in which an owner of land may receive a transferable development right.(69)"Record of survey map" means a map of a survey of land prepared in accordance with Section 17-23-1717-73-504.(70)"Residential facility for persons with a disability" means a residence:(a)in which more than one person with a disability resides; and(b)which is licensed or certified by the Department of Health and Human Services under:(i)Title 26B, Chapter 2, Part 1, Human Services Programs and Facilities; or(ii)Title 26B, Chapter 2, Part 2, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection.(71)"Residential roadway" means a public local residential road that:(a)will serve primarily to provide access to adjacent primarily residential areas and property;(b)is designed to accommodate minimal traffic volumes or vehicular traffic;(c)is not identified as a supplementary to a collector or other higher system classified street in an approved municipal street or transportation master plan;(d)has a posted speed limit of 25 miles per hour or less;(e)does not have higher traffic volumes resulting from connecting previously separated areas of the municipal road network;(f)cannot have a primary access, but can have a secondary access, and does not abut lots intended for high volume traffic or community centers, including schools, recreation centers, sports complexes, or libraries; and(g)primarily serves traffic within a neighborhood or limited residential area and is not necessarily continuous through several residential areas.(72)"Rules of order and procedure" means a set of rules that govern and prescribe in a public meeting:(a)parliamentary order and procedure;(b)ethical behavior; and(c)civil discourse.(73)"Sanitary sewer authority" means the department, agency, or public entity with responsibility to review and approve the feasibility of sanitary sewer services or onsite wastewater systems.(74)"Sending zone" means an unincorporated area that a county designates, by ordinance, as an area from which an owner of land may transfer a transferable development right.(75)"Simple boundary adjustment" means a boundary adjustment that does not:(a)affect a public right-of-way, county utility easement, or other public property;(b)affect an existing easement, onsite wastewater system, or an internal lot restriction; or(c)result in a lot or parcel out of conformity with land use regulations.(76)"Site plan" means a document or map that may be required by a county during a preliminary review precedingbefore the issuance of a building permit to demonstrate that an owner's or developer's proposed development activity meets a land use requirement.(77)(a)"Special district" means an entity under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Special Districts.(b)"Special district" includes a governmental or quasi-governmental entity that is not a county, municipality, school district, or the state.(78)"Specified public agency" means:(a)the state;(b)a school district; or(c)a charter school.(79)"Specified public utility" means an electrical corporation, gas corporation, or telephone corporation, as those terms are defined in Section 54-2-1.(80)"State" includes any department, division, or agency of the state.(81)(a)"Subdivision" means any land that is divided, resubdivided, or proposed to be divided into two or more lots or other division of land for the purpose, whether immediate or future, for offer, sale, lease, or development either on the installment plan or upon any and all other plans, terms, and conditions.(b)"Subdivision" includes:(i)the division or development of land, whether by deed, metes and bounds description, devise and testacy, map, plat, or other recorded instrument, regardless of whether the division includes all or a portion of a parcel or lot; and(ii)except as provided in Subsection (81)(c), divisions of land for residential and nonresidential uses, including land used or to be used for commercial, agricultural, and industrial purposes.(c)"Subdivision" does not include:(i)a bona fide division or partition of agricultural land for agricultural purposes;(ii)a recorded conveyance document:(A)consolidating multiple lots or parcels into one legal description encompassing all lots by reference to a recorded plat and all parcels by metes and bounds description; or(B)joining a lot to a parcel;(iii)a bona fide division or partition of land in a county other than a first class county for the purpose of siting, on one or more of the resulting separate parcels:(A)an electrical transmission line or a substation;(B)a natural gas pipeline or a regulation station; or(C)an unmanned telecommunications, microwave, fiber optic, electrical, or other utility service regeneration, transformation, retransmission, or amplification facility;(iv)a bona fide division of land by deed or other instrument if the deed or other instrument states in writing that the division:(A)is in anticipation of future land use approvals on the parcel or parcels;(B)does not confer any land use approvals; and(C)has not been approved by the land use authority;(v)a boundary adjustment;(vi)a boundary establishment;(vii)a road, street, or highway dedication plat;(viii)a deed or easement for a road, street, or highway purpose; or(ix)any other division of land authorized by law.(82)(a)"Subdivision amendment" means an amendment to a recorded subdivision in accordance with Section 17-27a-60817-79-711 that:(i)vacates all or a portion of the subdivision;(ii)increases the number of lots within the subdivision;(iii)alters a public right-of-way, a public easement, or public infrastructure within the subdivision; or(iv)alters a common area or other common amenity within the subdivision.(b)"Subdivision amendment" does not include a simple boundary adjustment.(83)"Substantial evidence" means evidence that:(a)is beyond a scintilla; and(b)a reasonable mind would accept as adequate to support a conclusion.(84)"Suspect soil" means soil that has:(a)a high susceptibility for volumetric change, typically clay rich, having more than a 3% swell potential;(b)bedrock units with high shrink or swell susceptibility; or(c)gypsiferous silt and clay, gypsum, or bedrock units containing abundant gypsum commonly associated with dissolution and collapse features.(85)"Therapeutic school" means a residential group living facility:(a)for four or more individuals who are not related to:(i)the owner of the facility; or(ii)the primary service provider of the facility;(b)that serves students who have a history of failing to function:(i)at home;(ii)in a public school; or(iii)in a nonresidential private school; and(c)that offers:(i)room and board; and(ii)an academic education integrated with:(A)specialized structure and supervision; or(B)services or treatment related to a disability, an emotional development, a behavioral development, a familial development, or a social development.(86)"Transferable development right" means a right to develop and use land that originates by an ordinance that authorizes a land owner in a designated sending zone to transfer land use rights from a designated sending zone to a designated receiving zone.(87)"Unincorporated" means the area outside of the incorporated area of a municipality.(88)"Water interest" means any right to the beneficial use of water, including:(a)each of the rights listed in Section 73-1-11; and(b)an ownership interest in the right to the beneficial use of water represented by:(i)a contract; or(ii)a share in a water company, as defined in Section 73-3-3.5.(89)"Zoning map" means a map, adopted as part of a land use ordinance, that depicts land use zones, overlays, or districts.

Section 159:
Section 159. Section 17-79-103, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-104 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-10417-79-103Effective 11/06/25. County standards.(1)This chapter does not prohibit a county from adopting the county's own land use standards.(2)Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a county may not impose a requirement, regulation, condition, or standard that conflicts with a provision of this chapter, Chapter 80, Counties and Housing Supply, other state law, or federal law.

Section 160:
Section 160. Section 17-79-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-201 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Notice17-27a-20117-79-201Effective 11/06/25. Required notice.(1)At a minimum, each county shall provide actual notice or the notice required by this part.(2)A county may by ordinance require greater notice than required under this part.

Section 161:
Section 161. Section 17-79-202, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-202 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-20217-79-202Effective 11/06/25. Applicant notice -- Waiver of requirements.(1)For each land use application, the county shall:(a)notify the applicant of the date, time, and place of each public hearing and public meeting to consider the application;(b)provide to each applicant a copy of each staff report regarding the applicant or the pending application at least three business days before the public hearing or public meeting; and(c)notify the applicant of any final action on a pending application.(2)If a county fails to comply with the requirements of Subsection (1)(a) or (b) or both, an applicant may waive the failure so that the application may stay on the public hearing or public meeting agenda and be considered as if the requirements had been met.

Section 162:
Section 162. Section 17-79-203, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-203 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-20317-79-203Effective 11/06/25. Notice of intent to prepare a general plan or comprehensive general plan amendments in certain counties.(1)Before preparing a proposed general plan or a comprehensive general plan amendment, each county of the first or second class shall provide 10 calendar days notice of the county's intent to prepare a proposed general plan or a comprehensive general plan amendment:(a)to each affected entity;(b)to the Utah Geospatial Resource Center created in Section 63A-16-505;(c)to the association of governments, established pursuant toin accordance with an interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, of which the county is a member; and(d)for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 10 days.(2)Each notice under Subsection (1) shall:(a)indicate that the county intends to prepare a general plan or a comprehensive general plan amendment, as the case may be;(b)describe or provide a map of the geographic area that will be affected by the general plan or amendment;(c)be sent by mail, e-mail, or other effective means;(d)invite the affected entities to provide information for the county to consider in the process of preparing, adopting, and implementing a general plan or amendment concerning:(i)impacts that the use of land proposed in the proposed general plan or amendment may have; and(ii)uses of land within the county that the affected entity is considering that may conflict with the proposed general plan or amendment; and(e)include the address of an Internet website, if the county has one, and the name and telephone number of an individual where more information can be obtained concerning the county's proposed general plan or amendment.

Section 163:
Section 163. Section 17-79-204, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-204 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-20417-79-204Effective 11/06/25. Notice of public hearings and public meetings to consider general plan or modifications.(1)A county shall provide:(a)notice of the date, time, and place of the first public hearing to consider the original adoption or any modification of all or any portion of a general plan; and(b)notice of each public meeting on the subject.(2)Each notice of a public hearing under Subsection (1)(a) shall be at least 10 calendar days before the public hearing and shall be:(a)published for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 10 days; and(b)mailed to each affected entity.(3)Each notice of a public meeting under Subsection (1)(b) shall be at least 24 hours before the meeting and shall be published for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 24 hours.

Section 164:
Section 164. Section 17-79-205, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-205 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-20517-79-205Effective 11/06/25. Notice of public hearings and public meetings on adoption or modification of land use regulation.(1)Each county shall give:(a)notice of the date, time, and place of the first public hearing to consider the adoption or modification of a land use regulation; and(b)notice of each public meeting on the subject.(2)Each notice of a public hearing under Subsection (1)(a) shall be:(a)mailed to each affected entity at least 10 calendar days before the public hearing; and(b)(i)provided for the area affected by the land use ordinance changes, as a class B notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 10 calendar days before the day of the public hearing; or(ii)if the proposed land use ordinance adoption or modification is ministerial in nature, as described in Subsections (6)(a) and (b), provided as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102 for at least 10 calendar days before the day of the public hearing.(3)In addition to the notice requirements described in Subsections (1) and (2), for any proposed modification to the text of a zoning code, the notice posted in accordance with Subsection (2) shall:(a)include: (i)a summary of the effect of the proposed modifications to the text of the zoning code designed to be understood by a lay person; or(ii)a direct link to the county's webpage where a person can find a summary of the effect of the proposed modifications to the text of the zoning code designed to be understood by a lay person; and(b)be provided to any person upon written request.(4)Each notice of a public meeting under Subsection (1)(b) shall be at least 24 hours before the hearing and shall be published for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 24 hours.(5)(a)A county shall send a courtesy notice to each owner of private real property whose property is located entirely or partially within the proposed zoning map enactment or amendment at least 10 days before the scheduled day of the public hearing.(b)The notice shall:(i)identify with specificity each owner of record of real property that will be affected by the proposed zoning map or map amendments;(ii)state the current zone in which the real property is located;(iii)state the proposed new zone for the real property;(iv)provide information regarding or a reference to the proposed regulations, prohibitions, and permitted uses that the property will be subject to if the zoning map or map amendment is adopted;(v)state that the owner of real property may no later than 10 days after the day of the first public hearing file a written objection to the inclusion of the owner's property in the proposed zoning map or map amendment;(vi)state the address where the property owner should file the protest;(vii)notify the property owner that each written objection filed with the county will be provided to the county legislative body; and(viii)state the location, date, and time of the public hearing described in Section 17-27a-50217-79-502.(c)If a county mails notice to a property owner under Subsection (2)(b)(i) for a public hearing on a zoning map or map amendment, the notice required in this Subsection (5) may be included in or part of the notice described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) rather than sent separately.(6)(a)A proposed land use ordinance is ministerial in nature if the proposed land use ordinance change is to:(i)bring the county's land use ordinances into compliance with a state or federal law;(ii)adopt a county land use update that affects:(A)an entire zoning district; or(B)multiple zoning districts;(iii)adopt a non-substantive, clerical text amendment to an existing land use ordinance;(iv)recodify the county's existing land use ordinances; or(v)designate or define an affected area for purposes of a boundary adjustment or annexation.(b)A proposed land use ordinance may include more than one of the purposes described in Subsection (6)(a) and remain ministerial in nature.(c)If a proposed land use ordinance includes an adoption or modification not described in Subsection (6)(a):(i)the proposed land use ordinance is not ministerial in nature, even if the proposed land use ordinance also includes a change or modification described in Subsection (6)(a); and(ii)the notice requirements of Subsection (2)(b)(i) apply.

Section 165:
Section 165. Section 17-79-206, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-206 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-20617-79-206Effective 11/06/25. Third party notice -- High priority transportation corridor notice.(1)(a)If a county requires notice to adjacent property owners, the county shall:(i)mail notice to the record owner of each parcel within parameters specified by county ordinance; or(ii)post notice on the property with a sign of sufficient size, durability, print quality, and location that is reasonably calculated to give notice to passers-by.(b)If a county mails notice to third party property owners under Subsection (1), it shall mail equivalent notice to property owners within an adjacent jurisdiction.(2)(a)As used in this Subsection (2), "high priority transportation corridor" means a transportation corridor identified as a high priority transportation corridor under Section 72-5-403.(b)The Department of Transportation may request, in writing, that a county provide the department with electronic notice of each land use application received by the county that may adversely impact the development of a high priority transportation corridor.(c)If the county receives a written request as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the county shall provide the Department of Transportation with timely electronic notice of each land use application that the request specifies.(3)(a)A large public transit district, as defined in Section 17B-2a-802, may request, in writing, that a county provide the large public transit district with electronic notice of each land use application received by the county that may impact the development of a major transit investment corridor.(b)If the county receives a written request as provided in Subsection (3)(a), the county shall provide the large public transit district with timely electronic notice of each land use application that the request specifies.

Section 166:
Section 166. Section 17-79-207, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-207 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-20717-79-207Effective 11/06/25. Notice for an amendment to a subdivision -- Notice for vacation of or change to street.(1)(a)For an amendment to a subdivision, each county shall provide notice of the date, time, and place of at least one public meeting, as provided in Subsection (1)(b).(b)At least 10 calendar days before the public meeting, the notice required under Subsection (1)(a) shall be:(i)mailed and addressed to the record owner of each parcel within specified parameters of that property; or(ii)posted on the property proposed for subdivision, in a visible location, with a sign of sufficient size, durability, and print quality that is reasonably calculated to give notice to passers-by.(2)Each county shall provide notice as required by Section 17-27a-20817-79-208 for a subdivision that involves a vacation, alteration, or amendment of a street.

Section 167:
Section 167. Section 17-79-208, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-208 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-20817-79-208Effective 11/06/25. Hearing and notice for petition to vacate a public street.(1)For any petition to vacate some or all of a public street or county utility easement, the legislative body shall:(a)hold a public hearing; and(b)give notice of the date, place, and time of the hearing, as provided in Subsection (2).(2)At least 10 days before the public hearing under Subsection (1)(a), the legislative body shall ensure that the notice required under Subsection (1)(b) is:(a)published for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 10 days;(b)provided to the owner of each parcel that is accessed by the public street or county utility easement; and(c)mailed to each affected entity.

Section 168:
Section 168. Section 17-79-209, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-209 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-20917-79-209Effective 11/06/25. Notice challenge.If notice given under authority of this part is not challenged under Section 17-27a-80117-79-1009 within 30 days after the meeting or action for which notice is given, the notice is considered adequate and proper.

Section 169:
Section 169. Section 17-79-210, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-210 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-21017-79-210Effective 11/06/25. Notice to county when a private institution of higher education is constructing student housing.(1)Each private institution of higher education that intends to construct student housing on property owned by the institution shall provide written notice of the intended construction, as provided in Subsection (2), before any funds are committed to the construction, if any of the proposed student housing buildings is within 300 feet of privately owned residential property.(2)Each notice under Subsection (1) shall be provided to the legislative body and, if applicable, the mayor of:(a)the county in whose unincorporated area or the mountainous planning district area the privately owned residential property is located; or(b)the municipality in whose boundaries the privately owned residential property is located.(3)At the request of a county or municipality that is entitled to notice under this section, the institution and the legislative body of the affected county or municipality shall jointly hold a public hearing to provide information to the public and receive input from the public about the proposed construction.

Section 170:
Section 170. Section 17-79-211, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-211 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-21117-79-211Effective 11/06/25. Canal owner or operator -- Notice to county.(1)A canal company or a canal operator shall ensure that each county in which the canal company or canal operator owns or operates a canal has on file, regarding the canal company or canal operator:(a)a current mailing address and phone number;(b)a contact name; and(c)a general description of the location of each canal owned or operated by the canal owner or canal operator.(2)If the information described in Subsection (1) changes after a canal company or a canal operator has provided the information to the county, the canal company or canal operator shall provide the correct information to the county within 30 days of the day on which the information changes.

Section 171:
Section 171. Section 17-79-212, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-212 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-21217-79-212Effective 11/06/25. Notice for an amendment to public improvements in a subdivision or development.Before implementing an amendment to adopted specifications for public improvements that apply to a subdivision or a development, a county shall:(1)hold a public hearing;(2)mail a notice 30 days or more before the date of the public hearing to:(a)each person who has submitted a land use application for which the land use authority has not issued a land use decision; and(b)each person who makes a written request to receive a copy of the notice; and(3)allow each person who receives a notice in accordance with Subsection (2) to provide public comment in writing before the public hearing or in person during the public hearing.

Section 172:
Section 172. Section 17-79-213, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-213 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-21317-79-213Effective 11/06/25. Hearing and notice procedures for modifying sign regulations.(1)(a)Prior to Before any hearing or public meeting to consider a proposed land use regulation or land use application modifying sign regulations for an illuminated sign within any unified commercial development, as defined in Section 72-7-504.6, or within any planned unit development, a county shall give written notice of the proposed illuminated sign to:(i)each property owner within a 500 foot radius of the sign site;(ii)a municipality or county within a 500 foot radius of the sign site; and(iii)any outdoor advertising permit holder described in Subsection 72-7-506(2)(b).(b)The notice described in Subsection (1)(a) shall include the schedule of public meetings at which the proposed changes to land use regulations or land use application will be discussed.(2)A county shall require the property owner or applicant to commence in good faith the construction of the commercial or industrial development within one year after the installation of the illuminated sign.

Section 173:
Section 173. Section 17-79-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-301 is renumbered and amended to read:3. General Land Use Provisions17-27a-30117-79-301Effective 11/06/25. Ordinance establishing planning commission required -- Exception -- Ordinance requirements -- Planning advisory area planning commission -- Compensation.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), each county shall enact an ordinance establishing a countywide planning commission for the unincorporated areas of the county not within a planning advisory area.(b)Subsection (1)(a) does not apply if all of the county is included within any combination of:(i)municipalities;(ii)planning advisory areas each with a separate planning commission; and(iii)mountainous planning districts.(c)(i)Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a county that designates a mountainous planning district shall enact an ordinance, subject to Subsection (1)(c)(ii), establishing a planning commission that has jurisdiction over the entire mountainous planning district.(ii)A planning commission described in Subsection (1)(c)(i) has jurisdiction subject to a local health department exercising the local health department's authority in accordance with Title 26A, Chapter 1, Local Health Departments, and a municipality exercising the municipality's authority in accordance with Section 10-8-15.(iii)The ordinance shall require that members of the planning commission be appointed by the county executive with the advice and consent of the county legislative body.(2)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(b), the county legislative body of a county of the first or second class that includes more than one planning advisory area each with a separate planning commission may enact an ordinance that:(i)dissolves each planning commission within the county; and(ii)establishes a countywide planning commission that has jurisdiction over:(A)each planning advisory area within the county; and(B)the unincorporated areas of the county not within a planning advisory area.(b)A countywide planning commission established under Subsection (2)(a) shall assume the duties of each dissolved planning commission.(3)(a)The ordinance described in Subsection (1)(a) or (c), (1)(c), or (2)(a) shall define:(i)the number and terms of the members and, if the county chooses, alternate members;(ii)the mode of appointment;(iii)the procedures for filling vacancies and removal from office;(iv)the authority of the planning commission;(v)subject to Subsection (3)(b), the rules of order and procedure for use by the planning commission in a public meeting; and(vi)other details relating to the organization and procedures of the planning commission.(b)Subsection (3)(a)(v) does not affect the planning commission's duty to comply with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(4)(a)(i)If the county establishes a planning advisory area planning commission, the county legislative body shall enact an ordinance that defines:(A)appointment procedures;(B)procedures for filling vacancies and removing members from office;(C)subject to Subsection (4)(a)(ii), the rules of order and procedure for use by the planning advisory area planning commission in a public meeting; and(D)details relating to the organization and procedures of each planning advisory area planning commission.(ii)Subsection (4)(a)(i)(C) does not affect the planning advisory area planning commission's duty to comply with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(b)The planning commission for each planning advisory area shall consist of seven members who shall be appointed by:(i)in a county operating under a form of government in which the executive and legislative functions of the governing body are separated, the county executive with the advice and consent of the county legislative body; or(ii)in a county operating under a form of government in which the executive and legislative functions of the governing body are not separated, the county legislative body.(c)(i)Members shall serve four-year terms and until their successors are appointed and qualified.(ii)Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (4)(c)(i), members of the first planning commissions shall be appointed so that, for each commission, the terms of at least one member and no more than two members expire each year.(d)(i)Each member of a planning advisory area planning commission shall be a registered voter residing within the planning advisory area.(ii)Subsection (4)(d)(i) does not apply to a member described in Subsection (5)(a) if that member was, prior tobefore May 12, 2015, authorized to reside outside of the planning advisory area.(5)(a)A member of a planning commission who was elected to and served on a planning commission on May 12, 2015, shall serve out the term to which the member was elected.(b)Upon the expiration of an elected term described in Subsection (5)(a), the vacant seat shall be filled by appointment in accordance with this section.(6)Upon the appointment of all members of a planning advisory area planning commission, each planning advisory area planning commission under this section shall begin to exercise the powers and perform the duties provided in Section 17-27a-30217-79-302 with respect to all matters then pending that previously had been under the jurisdiction of the countywide planning commission or planning advisory area planning and zoning board.(7)The legislative body may authorize a member of a planning commission to receive per diem and travel expenses for meetings actually attended, in accordance with Section 11-55-103.

Section 174:
Section 174. Section 17-79-302, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-302 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-30217-79-302Effective 11/06/25. Planning commission powers and duties -- Training requirements.(1)Each countywide, planning advisory area, or mountainous planning district planning commission shall, with respect to the unincorporated area of the county, the planning advisory area, or the mountainous planning district, review and make a recommendation to the county legislative body for:(a)a general plan and amendments to the general plan;(b)land use regulations, including:(i)ordinances regarding the subdivision of land within the county; and(ii)amendments to existing land use regulations;(c)an appropriate delegation of power to at least one designated land use authority to hear and act on a land use application;(d)an appropriate delegation of power to at least one appeal authority to hear and act on an appeal from a decision of the land use authority; and(e)application processes that:(i)may include a designation of routine land use matters that, upon application and proper notice, will receive informal streamlined review and action if the application is uncontested; and(ii)shall protect the right of each:(A)land use applicant and adversely affected party to require formal consideration of any application by a land use authority;(B)land use applicant or adversely affected party to appeal a land use authority's decision to a separate appeal authority; and(C)participant to be heard in each public hearing on a contested application.(2)Before making a recommendation to a legislative body on an item described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b), the planning commission shall hold a public hearing in accordance with Section 17-27a-40417-79-404.(3)A legislative body may adopt, modify, or reject a planning commission's recommendation to the legislative body under this section.(4)A legislative body may consider a planning commission's failure to make a timely recommendation as a negative recommendation.(5)Nothing in this section limits the right of a county to initiate or propose the actions described in this section.(6)(a)(i)This Subsection (6) applies to a county that:(A)is a county of the first, second, or third class; and(B)has a population in the county's unincorporated areas of 5,000 or more.(ii)The population for each county described in Subsection (6)(a)(i) shall be derived from:(A)an estimate of the Utah Population Committee created in Section 63C-20-103; or(B)if the Utah Population Committee estimate is not available, the most recent official census or census estimate of the United States Bureau of the Census.(b)A county described in Subsection (6)(a)(i) shall ensure that each member of the county's planning commission completes four hours of annual land use training as follows:(i)one hour of annual training on general powers and duties under Title 17, Chapter 27a, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act; and(ii)three hours of annual training on land use, which may include:(A)appeals and variances;(B)conditional use permits;(C)exactions;(D)impact fees;(E)vested rights;(F)subdivision regulations and improvement guarantees;(G)land use referenda;(H)property rights;(I)real estate procedures and financing;(J)zoning, including use-based and form-based; and(K)drafting ordinances and code that complies with statute.(c)A newly appointed planning commission member may not participate in a public meeting as an appointed member until the member completes the training described in Subsection (6)(b)(i).(d)A planning commission member may qualify for one completed hour of training required under Subsection (6)(b)(ii) if the member attends, as an appointed member, 12 public meetings of the planning commission within a calendar year.(e)A county shall provide the training described in Subsection (6)(b) through:(i)county staff;(ii)the Utah Association of Counties; or(iii)a list of training courses selected by:(A)the Utah Association of Counties; or(B)the Division of Real Estate created in Section 61-2-201.(f)A county shall, for each planning commission member:(i)monitor compliance with the training requirements in Subsection (6)(b); and(ii)maintain a record of training completion at the end of each calendar year.

Section 175:
Section 175. Section 17-79-303, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-306 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-30617-79-303Effective 11/06/25. Planning advisory areas -- Notice of hearings.(1)(a)A planning advisory area may be established as provided in this Subsection (1).(b)A planning advisory area may not be established unless the area to be included within the proposed planning advisory area:(i)is unincorporated;(ii)is contiguous; and(iii)(A)contains:(I)at least 20% but not more than 80% of:(Aa)the total private land area in the unincorporated county; or(Bb)the total value of locally assessed taxable property in the unincorporated county; or(II)(Aa)in a county of the second or third class, at least 5% of the total population of the unincorporated county, but not less than 300 residents; or(Bb)in a county of the fourth, fifth, or sixth class, at least 25% of the total population of the unincorporated county; or(B)has been declared by the United States Census Bureau as a census designated place.(c)(i)The process to establish a planning advisory area is initiated by the filing of a petition with the clerk of the county in which the proposed planning advisory area is located.(ii)A petition to establish a planning advisory area may not be filed if it proposes the establishment of a planning advisory area that includes an area within a proposed planning advisory area in a petition that has previously been certified under Subsection (1)(g), until after the canvass of an election on the proposed planning advisory area under Subsection (1)(j).(d)A petition under Subsection (1)(c) to establish a planning advisory area shall:(i)be signed by the owners of private real property that:(A)is located within the proposed planning advisory area;(B)covers at least 10% of the total private land area within the proposed planning advisory area; and(C)is equal in value to at least 10% of the value of all private real property within the proposed planning advisory area;(ii)be accompanied by an accurate plat or map showing the boundary of the contiguous area proposed to be established as a planning advisory area;(iii)indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each owner signing the petition;(iv)designate up to five signers of the petition as petition sponsors, one of whom shall be designated as the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and telephone number of each petition sponsor;(v)authorize the petition sponsor or sponsors to act on behalf of all owners signing the petition for purposes of the petition; and(vi)request the county legislative body to provide notice of the petition and of a public hearing, hold a public hearing, and conduct an election on the proposal to establish a planning advisory area.(e)Subsection 10-2a-102(3) applies to a petition to establish a planning advisory area to the same extent as if it were an incorporation petition under Title 10, Chapter 2a, Municipal Incorporation.(f)(i)Within seven days after the filing of a petition under Subsection (1)(c) proposing the establishment of a planning advisory area in a county of the second class, the county clerk shall provide notice of the filing of the petition to:(A)each owner of real property owning more than 1% of the assessed value of all real property within the proposed planning advisory area; and(B)each owner of real property owning more than 850 acres of real property within the proposed planning advisory area.(ii)A property owner may exclude all or part of the property owner's property from a proposed planning advisory area in a county of the second class:(A)if:(I)(Aa)(Ii)the property owner owns more than 1% of the assessed value of all property within the proposed planning advisory area;(IIii)the property is nonurban; and(IIIiii)the property does not or will not require municipal provision of municipal-type services; or(Bb)the property owner owns more than 850 acres of real property within the proposed planning advisory area; and(II)exclusion of the property will not leave within the planning advisory area an island of property that is not part of the planning advisory area; and(B)by filing a notice of exclusion within 10 days after receiving the clerk's notice under Subsection (1)(f)(i).(iii)(A)The county legislative body shall exclude from the proposed planning advisory area the property identified in a notice of exclusion timely filed under Subsection (1)(f)(ii)(B) if the property meets the applicable requirements of Subsection (1)(f)(ii)(A).(B)If the county legislative body excludes property from a proposed planning advisory area under Subsection (1)(f)(iii), the county legislative body shall, within five days after the exclusion, send written notice of its action to the contact sponsor.(g)(i)Within 45 days after the filing of a petition under Subsection (1)(c), the county clerk shall:(A)with the assistance of other county officers from whom the clerk requests assistance, determine whether the petition complies with the requirements of Subsection (1)(d); and(B)(I)if the clerk determines that the petition complies with the requirements of Subsection (1)(d):(Aa)certify the petition and deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body; and(Bb)mail or deliver written notification of the certification to the contact sponsor; or(II)if the clerk determines that the petition fails to comply with any of the requirements of Subsection (1)(d), reject the petition and notify the contact sponsor in writing of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection.(ii)If the county clerk rejects a petition under Subsection (1)(g)(i)(B)(II), the petition may be amended to correct the deficiencies for which it was rejected and then refiled with the county clerk.(h)(i)Within 90 days after a petition to establish a planning advisory area is certified, the county legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the proposal to establish a planning advisory area.(ii)A public hearing under Subsection (1)(h)(i) shall be:(A)within the boundary of the proposed planning advisory area; or(B)if holding a public hearing in that area is not practicable, as close to that area as practicable.(iii)At least one week before holding a public hearing under Subsection (1)(h)(i), the county legislative body shall publish notice of the petition and the time, date, and place of the public hearing for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least one week.(i)Following the public hearing under Subsection (1)(h)(i), the county legislative body shall arrange for the proposal to establish a planning advisory area to be submitted to voters residing within the proposed planning advisory area at the next regular general election that is more than 90 days after the public hearing.(j)A planning advisory area is established at the time of the canvass of the results of an election under Subsection (1)(i) if the canvass indicates that a majority of voters voting on the proposal to establish a planning advisory area voted in favor of the proposal.(k)An area that is an established township before May 12, 2015:(i)is, as of May 12, 2015, a planning advisory area; and(ii)(A)shall change its name, if applicable, to no longer include the word "township"; and(B)may use the word "planning advisory area" in its name.(2)The county legislative body may:(a)assign to the countywide planning commission the duties established in this part that would have been assumed by a planning advisory area planning commission designated under Subsection (2)(b); or(b)designate and appoint a planning commission for the planning advisory area.(3)(a)An area within the boundary of a planning advisory area may be withdrawn from the planning advisory area as provided in this Subsection (3) or in accordance with Subsection (5)(a).(b)The process to withdraw an area from a planning advisory area is initiated by the filing of a petition with the clerk of the county in which the planning advisory area is located.(c)A petition under Subsection (3)(b) shall:(i)be signed by the owners of private real property that:(A)is located within the area proposed to be withdrawn from the planning advisory area;(B)covers at least 50% of the total private land area within the area proposed to be withdrawn from the planning advisory area; and(C)is equal in value to at least 33% of the value of all private real property within the area proposed to be withdrawn from the planning advisory area;(ii)state the reason or reasons for the proposed withdrawal;(iii)be accompanied by an accurate plat or map showing the boundary of the contiguous area proposed to be withdrawn from the planning advisory area;(iv)indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each owner signing the petition;(v)designate up to five signers of the petition as petition sponsors, one of whom shall be designated as the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and telephone number of each petition sponsor;(vi)authorize the petition sponsor or sponsors to act on behalf of all owners signing the petition for purposes of the petition; and(vii)request the county legislative body to withdraw the area from the planning advisory area.(d)Subsection 10-2a-102(3) applies to a petition to withdraw an area from a planning advisory area to the same extent as if it were an incorporation petition under Title 10, Chapter 2a, Municipal Incorporation.(e)(i)Within 45 days after the filing of a petition under Subsection (3)(b), the county clerk shall:(A)with the assistance of other county officers from whom the clerk requests assistance, determine whether the petition complies with the requirements of Subsection (3)(c); and(B)(I)if the clerk determines that the petition complies with the requirements of Subsection (3)(c):(Aa)certify the petition and deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body; and(Bb)mail or deliver written notification of the certification to the contact sponsor; or(II)if the clerk determines that the petition fails to comply with any of the requirements of Subsection (3)(c), reject the petition and notify the contact sponsor in writing of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection.(ii)If the county clerk rejects a petition under Subsection (3)(e)(i)(B)(II), the petition may be amended to correct the deficiencies for which it was rejected and then refiled with the county clerk.(f)(i)Within 60 days after a petition to withdraw an area from a planning advisory area is certified, the county legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the proposal to withdraw the area from the planning advisory area.(ii)A public hearing under Subsection (3)(f)(i) shall be held:(A)within the area proposed to be withdrawn from the planning advisory area; or(B)if holding a public hearing in that area is not practicable, as close to that area as practicable.(iii)Before holding a public hearing under Subsection (3)(f)(i), the county legislative body shall publish notice of the petition and the time, date, and place of the public hearing for the area proposed to be withdrawn, as a class B notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least three weeks before the date of the hearing.(g)(i)Within 45 days after the public hearing under Subsection (3)(f)(i), the county legislative body shall make a written decision on the proposal to withdraw the area from the planning advisory area.(ii)In making its decision as to whether to withdraw the area from the planning advisory area, the county legislative body shall consider:(A)whether the withdrawal would leave the remaining planning advisory area in a situation where the future incorporation of an area within the planning advisory area or the annexation of an area within the planning advisory area to an adjoining municipality would be economically or practically not feasible;(B)if the withdrawal is a precursor to the incorporation or annexation of the withdrawn area:(I)whether the proposed subsequent incorporation or withdrawal:(Aa)will leave or create an unincorporated island or peninsula; or(Bb)will leave the county with an area within its unincorporated area for which the cost, requirements, or other burdens of providing municipal services would materially increase over previous years; and(II)whether the municipality to be created or the municipality into which the withdrawn area is expected to annex would be or is capable, in a cost effective manner, of providing service to the withdrawn area that the county will no longer provide due to the incorporation or annexation;(C)the effects of a withdrawal on adjoining property owners, existing or projected county streets or other public improvements, law enforcement, and zoning and other municipal services provided by the county; and(D)whether justice and equity favor the withdrawal.(h)Upon the written decision of the county legislative body approving the withdrawal of an area from a planning advisory area, the area is withdrawn from the planning advisory area and the planning advisory area continues as a planning advisory area with a boundary that excludes the withdrawn area.(4)(a)A planning advisory area may be dissolved as provided in this Subsection (4).(b)The process to dissolve a planning advisory area is initiated by the filing of a petition with the clerk of the county in which the planning advisory area is located.(c)A petition under Subsection (4)(b) shall:(i)be signed by registered voters within the planning advisory area equal in number to at least 25% of all votes cast by voters within the planning advisory area at the last congressional election;(ii)state the reason or reasons for the proposed dissolution;(iii)indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each person signing the petition;(iv)designate up to five signers of the petition as petition sponsors, one of whom shall be designated as the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and telephone number of each petition sponsor;(v)authorize the petition sponsors to act on behalf of all persons signing the petition for purposes of the petition; and(vi)request the county legislative body to provide notice of the petition and of a public hearing, hold a public hearing, and conduct an election on the proposal to dissolve the planning advisory area.(d)(i)Within 45 days after the filing of a petition under Subsection (4)(b), the county clerk shall:(A)with the assistance of other county officers from whom the clerk requests assistance, determine whether the petition complies with the requirements of Subsection (4)(c); and(B)(I)if the clerk determines that the petition complies with the requirements of Subsection (4)(c):(Aa)certify the petition and deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body; and(Bb)mail or deliver written notification of the certification to the contact sponsor; or(II)if the clerk determines that the petition fails to comply with any of the requirements of Subsection (4)(c), reject the petition and notify the contact sponsor in writing of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection.(ii)If the county clerk rejects a petition under Subsection (4)(d)(i)(B)(II), the petition may be amended to correct the deficiencies for which it was rejected and then refiled with the county clerk.(e)(i)Within 60 days after a petition to dissolve the planning advisory area is certified, the county legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the proposal to dissolve the planning advisory area.(ii)A public hearing under Subsection (4)(e)(i) shall be held:(A)within the boundary of the planning advisory area; or(B)if holding a public hearing in that area is not practicable, as close to that area as practicable.(iii)Before holding a public hearing under Subsection (4)(e)(i), the county legislative body shall publish notice of the petition and the time, date, and place of the public hearing for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for three consecutive weeks immediately before the public hearing.(f)Following the public hearing under Subsection (4)(e)(i), the county legislative body shall arrange for the proposal to dissolve the planning advisory area to be submitted to voters residing within the planning advisory area at the next regular general election that is more than 90 days after the public hearing.(g)A planning advisory area is dissolved at the time of the canvass of the results of an election under Subsection (4)(f) if the canvass indicates that a majority of voters voting on the proposal to dissolve the planning advisory area voted in favor of the proposal.(5)(a)If a portion of an area located within a planning advisory area is annexed by a municipality or incorporates, that portion is withdrawn from the planning advisory area.(b)If a planning advisory area in whole is annexed by a municipality or incorporates, the planning advisory area is dissolved.

Section 176:
Section 176. Section 17-79-304, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-303 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-30317-79-304Effective 11/06/25. Entrance upon land.A county may enter upon any land at reasonable times to make examinations and surveys pertinent to the:(1)preparation of its general plan; or(2)preparation or enforcement of its land use ordinances.

Section 177:
Section 177. Section 17-79-305, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-305 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-30517-79-305Effective 11/06/25. Other entities required to conform to county's land use ordinances -- Exceptions -- School districts, charter schools, home-based microschools, and micro-education entities -- Submission of development plan and schedule.(1)(a)Each county, municipality, school district, charter school, special district, special service district, and political subdivision of the state shall conform to any applicable land use ordinance of any county when installing, constructing, operating, or otherwise using any area, land, or building situated within a mountainous planning district or the unincorporated portion of the county, as applicable.(b)In addition to any other remedies provided by law, when a county's land use ordinance is violated or about to be violated by another political subdivision, that county may institute an injunction, mandamus, abatement, or other appropriate action or proceeding to prevent, enjoin, abate, or remove the improper installation, improvement, or use.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a school district or charter school is subject to a county's land use ordinances.(b)(i)Notwithstanding Subsection (3), a county may:(A)subject a charter school to standards within each zone pertaining to setback, height, bulk and massing regulations, off-site parking, curb cut, traffic circulation, and construction staging; and(B)impose regulations upon the location of a project that are necessary to avoid unreasonable risks to health or safety, as provided in Subsection (3)(f).(ii)The standards to which a county may subject a charter school under Subsection (2)(b)(i) shall be objective standards only and may not be subjective.(iii)Except as provided in Subsection (7)(d), the only basis upon which a county may deny or withhold approval of a charter school's land use application is the charter school's failure to comply with a standard imposed under Subsection (2)(b)(i).(iv)Nothing in Subsection (2)(b)(iii) may be construed to relieve a charter school of an obligation to comply with a requirement of an applicable building or safety code to which it is otherwise obligated to comply.(3)A county may not:(a)impose requirements for landscaping, fencing, aesthetic considerations, construction methods or materials, additional building inspections, county building codes, building use for educational purposes, or the placement or use of temporary classroom facilities on school property;(b)except as otherwise provided in this section, require a school district or charter school to participate in the cost of any roadway or sidewalk, or a study on the impact of a school on a roadway or sidewalk, that is not reasonably necessary for the safety of school children and not located on or contiguous to school property, unless the roadway or sidewalk is required to connect an otherwise isolated school site to an existing roadway;(c)require a district or charter school to pay fees not authorized by this section;(d)provide for inspection of school construction or assess a fee or other charges for inspection, unless the school district or charter school is unable to provide for inspection by an inspector, other than the project architect or contractor, who is qualified under criteria established by the state superintendent;(e)require a school district or charter school to pay any impact fee for an improvement project unless the impact fee is imposed as provided in Title 11, Chapter 36a, Impact Fees Act;(f)impose regulations upon the location of an educational facility except as necessary to avoid unreasonable risks to health or safety; or(g)for a land use or a structure owned or operated by a school district or charter school that is not an educational facility but is used in support of providing instruction to pupils, impose a regulation that:(i)is not imposed on a similar land use or structure in the zone in which the land use or structure is approved; or(ii)uses the tax exempt status of the school district or charter school as criteria for prohibiting or regulating the land use or location of the structure.(4)Subject to Section 53E-3-710, a school district or charter school shall coordinate the siting of a new school with the county in which the school is to be located, to:(a)avoid or mitigate existing and potential traffic hazards, including consideration of the impacts between the new school and future highways; and(b)maximize school, student, and site safety.(5)Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(d), a county may, at its discretion:(a)provide a walk-through of school construction at no cost and at a time convenient to the district or charter school; and(b)provide recommendations based upon the walk-through.(6)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(d), a school district or charter school shall use:(i)a county building inspector;(ii)(A)for a school district, a school district building inspector from that school district; or(B)for a charter school, a school district building inspector from the school district in which the charter school is located; or(iii)an independent, certified building inspector who is not an employee of the contractor, licensed to perform the inspection that the inspector is requested to perform, and approved by a county building inspector or:(A)for a school district, a school district building inspector from that school district; or(B)for a charter school, a school district building inspector from the school district in which the charter school is located.(b)The approval under Subsection (6)(a)(iii) may not be unreasonably withheld.(c)If a school district or charter school uses a school district or independent building inspector under Subsection (6)(a)(ii) or (iii), the school district or charter school shall submit to the state superintendent of public instruction and county building official, on a monthly basis during construction of the school building, a copy of each inspection certificate regarding the school building.(7)(a)A charter school, home-based microschool, or micro-education entity shall be considered a permitted use in all zoning districts within a county.(b)Each land use application for any approval required for a charter school, home-based microschool, or micro-education entity, including an application for a building permit, shall be processed on a first priority basis.(c)Parking requirements for a charter school or micro-education entity may not exceed the minimum parking requirements for schools or other institutional public uses throughout the county.(d)If a county has designated zones for a sexually oriented business, or a business which sells alcohol, a charter school or micro-education entity may be prohibited from a location which would otherwise defeat the purpose for the zone unless the charter school or micro-education entity provides a waiver.(e)(i)A school district , charter school, or micro-education entity may seek a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of a school building from:(A)the state superintendent of public instruction, as provided in Subsection 53E-3-706(3), if the school district, charter school, or micro-education entity used an independent building inspector for inspection of the school building; or(B)a county official with authority to issue the certificate, if the school district, charter school, or micro-education entity used a county building inspector for inspection of the school building.(ii)A school district may issue its own certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of a school building if it used its own building inspector for inspection of the school building, subject to the notification requirement of Subsection 53E-3-706(3)(a)(ii)53E-3-706(3)(d)(ii).(iii)A charter school or micro-education entity may seek a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of a school building from a school district official with authority to issue the certificate, if the charter school or micro-education entity used a school district building inspector for inspection of the school building.(iv)A certificate authorizing permanent occupancy issued by the state superintendent of public instruction under Subsection 53E-3-706(3) or a school district official with authority to issue the certificate shall be considered to satisfy any county requirement for an inspection or a certificate of occupancy.(f)(i)A micro-education entity may operate a facility that meets Group E Occupancy requirements as defined by the International Building Code, as incorporated by Subsection 15A-2-103(1)(a).(ii)A micro-education entity operating in a facility described in Subsection (7)(f)(i) may have up to 100 students in the facility.(g)A micro-education entity may operate a facility that is subject to and complies with the same occupancy requirements as a Class A-1, A-3, B, or M Occupancy as defined by the International Building Code, as incorporated by Subsection 15A-2-103(1)(a), if:(i)the facility has a code compliant fire alarm system and carbon monoxide detection system;(ii)(A)each classroom in the facility has an exit directly to the outside at the level of exit discharge; or(B)the structure has a code compliant fire sprinkler system; and(iii)the facility has an automatic fire sprinkler system in fire areas of the facility that are greater than 12,000 square feet.(h)(i)A home-based microschool is not subject to additional occupancy requirements beyond occupancy requirements that apply to a primary dwelling.(ii)If a floor that is below grade in a home-based microschool is used for home-based microschool purposes, the below grade floor of the home-based microschool shall have at least one emergency escape or rescue window that complies with the requirements for emergency escape and rescue windows as defined by the International Residential Code, as incorporated in Section 15A-1-210.(8)(a)A specified public agency intending to develop its land shall submit to the land use authority a development plan and schedule:(i)as early as practicable in the development process, but no later than the commencement of construction; and(ii)with sufficient detail to enable the land use authority to assess:(A)the specified public agency's compliance with applicable land use ordinances;(B)the demand for public facilities listed in Subsections 11-36a-102(17)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (g) caused by the development;(C)the amount of any applicable fee described in Section 17-27a-50917-79-804;(D)any credit against an impact fee; and(E)the potential for waiving an impact fee.(b)The land use authority shall respond to a specified public agency's submission under Subsection (8)(a) with reasonable promptness in order to allow the specified public agency to consider information the municipality provides under Subsection (8)(a)(ii) in the process of preparing the budget for the development.(9)Nothing in this section may be construed to:(a)modify or supersede Section 17-27a-30417-79-306; or(b)authorize a county to enforce an ordinance in a way, or enact an ordinance, that fails to comply with Title 57, Chapter 21, Utah Fair Housing Act, the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq., the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12102, or any other provision of federal law.(10)Nothing in Subsection (7) prevents a political subdivision from:(a)requiring a home-based microschool or micro-education entity to comply with local zoning and land use regulations that do not conflict with this section, including:(i)parking;(ii)traffic; and(iii)hours of operation;(b)requiring a home-based microschool or micro-education entity to obtain a business license;(c)enacting county ordinances and regulations consistent with this section;(d)subjecting a micro-education entity to standards within each zone pertaining to setback, height, bulk and massing regulations, off-site parking, curb cut, traffic circulation, and construction staging; and(e)imposing regulations on the location of a project that are necessary to avoid risks to health or safety.(11)Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the proximity restrictions that apply to community locations do not apply to a micro-education entity.

Section 178:
Section 178. Section 17-79-306, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-304 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-30417-79-306Effective 11/06/25. State and federal property.Unless otherwise provided by law, nothing contained in this chapter or Chapter 80, Counties and Housing Supply, may be construed as giving a county jurisdiction over property owned by the state or the United States.

Section 179:
Section 179. Section 17-79-401, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-401 is renumbered and amended to read:4. General Plan17-27a-40117-79-401Effective 11/06/25. General plan required -- Content -- Resource management plan -- Provisions related to radioactive waste facility.(1)To accomplish the purposes of this chapter, a county shall prepare and adopt a comprehensive, long-range general plan:(a)for present and future needs of the county;(b)(i)for growth and development of all or any part of the land within the unincorporated portions of the county; or(ii)if a county has designated a mountainous planning district, for growth and development of all or any part of the land within the mountainous planning district; and(c)as a basis for communicating and coordinating with the federal government on land and resource management issues.(2)To promote health, safety, and welfare, the  general plan may provide for:(a)health, general welfare, safety, energy conservation, transportation, prosperity, civic activities, aesthetics, and recreational, educational, and cultural opportunities;(b)the reduction of the waste of physical, financial, or human resources that result from either excessive congestion or excessive scattering of population;(c)the efficient and economical use, conservation, and production of the supply of:(i)food and water; and(ii)drainage, sanitary, and other facilities and resources;(d)the use of energy conservation and solar and clean energy resources;(e)the protection of urban development;(f)the protection and promotion of air quality;(g)historic preservation;(h)identifying future uses of land that are likely to require an expansion or significant modification of services or facilities provided by an affected entity; and(i)an official map.(3)(a)(i)The general plan of a specified county, as defined in Section 17-27a-408, shall include a moderate income housing element that meets the requirements of Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(a)(iii).(ii)(A)This Subsection (3)(a)(ii) applies to a county that does not qualify as a specified county as of January 1, 2023.(B)As of January 1, if a county described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(A) changes from one class to another or grows in population to qualify as a specified county as defined in Section 17-27a-408, the county shall amend the county's general plan to comply with Subsection (3)(a)(i) on or before August 1 of the first calendar year beginning on January 1 in which the county qualifies as a specified county.(iii)A county described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B) shall send a copy of the county's amended general plan to the association of governments, established pursuant to an interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, of which the county is a member.(b)The general plan shall contain a resource management plan for the public lands, as defined in Section 63L-6-102, within the county.(c)The resource management plan described in Subsection (3)(b) shall address:(i)mining;(ii)land use;(iii)livestock and grazing;(iv)irrigation;(v)agriculture;(vi)fire management;(vii)noxious weeds;(viii)forest management;(ix)water rights;(x)ditches and canals;(xi)water quality and hydrology;(xii)flood plains and river terraces;(xiii)wetlands;(xiv)riparian areas;(xv)predator control;(xvi)wildlife;(xvii)fisheries;(xviii)recreation and tourism;(xix)energy resources;(xx)mineral resources;(xxi)cultural, historical, geological, and paleontological resources;(xxii)wilderness;(xxiii)wild and scenic rivers;(xxiv)threatened, endangered, and sensitive species;(xxv)land access;(xxvi)law enforcement;(xxvii)economic considerations; and(xxviii)air.(d)For each item listed under Subsection (3)(c), a county's resource management plan shall:(i)establish findings pertaining to the item;(ii)establish defined objectives; and(iii)outline general policies and guidelines on how the objectives described in Subsection (3)(d)(ii) are to be accomplished.(4)(a)(i)The general plan shall include specific provisions related to an area within, or partially within, the exterior boundaries of the county, or contiguous to the boundaries of a county, which are proposed for the siting of a storage facility or transfer facility for the placement of high-level nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive nuclear waste, as these wastes are defined in Section 19-3-303.(ii)The provisions described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) shall address the effects of the proposed site upon the health and general welfare of citizens of the state, and shall provide:(A)the information identified in Section 19-3-305;(B)information supported by credible studies that demonstrates that Subsection 19-3-307(2) has been satisfied; and(C)specific measures to mitigate the effects of high-level nuclear waste and greater than class C radioactive waste and guarantee the health and safety of the citizens of the state.(b)A county may, in lieu of complying with Subsection (4)(a), adopt an ordinance indicating that all proposals for the siting of a storage facility or transfer facility for the placement of high-level nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive waste wholly or partially within the county are rejected.(c)A county may adopt the ordinance listed in Subsection (4)(b) at any time.(d)The county shall send a certified copy of the ordinance described in Subsection (4)(b) to the executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality by certified mail within 30 days of enactment.(e)If a county repeals an ordinance adopted under Subsection (4)(b) the county shall:(i)comply with Subsection (4)(a) as soon as reasonably possible; and(ii)send a certified copy of the repeal to the executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality by certified mail within 30 days after the repeal.(5)(3)The general plan may define the county's local customs, local culture, and the components necessary for the county's economic stability.(6)(4)Subject to Subsection 17-27a-403(2)Section 17-79-403, the county may determine the comprehensiveness, extent, and format of the general plan.(7)If a county has designated a mountainous planning district, the general plan for the mountainous planning district is the controlling plan.(8)(5)Nothing in this part may be construed to limit the authority of the state to manage and protect wildlife under Title 23A, Wildlife Resources Act.(9)(6)On or before December 31, 2025, a county that has a general plan that does not include a water use and preservation element that complies with Section 17-27a-40317-79-403 shall amend the county's general plan to comply with Section 17-27a-40317-79-403.

Section 180:
Section 180. Section 17-79-402 is enacted to read:17-79-402Effective 11/06/25. Specific provisions for general plan.(1)(a)The general plan of a specified county, as defined in Section 17-80-101, shall include a moderate income housing element that meets the requirements of Section 17-80-201.(b)(i)This Subsection (1)(b) applies to a county that does not qualify as a specified county as of January 1, 2023.(ii)As of January 1, if a county changes from one class to another or grows in population to qualify as a specified county, the county shall amend the county's general plan to include a moderate income housing element that meets the requirements of Section 17-80-201 on or before August 1 of the first calendar year beginning on January 1 in which the county qualifies as a specified county.(iii)A county described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii) shall send a copy of the county's amended general plan to the association of governments, established in accordance with an interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, of which the county is a member.(2)(a)All county general plans shall contain a resource management plan for the public lands, as defined in Section 63L-6-102, within the county.(b)The resource management plan described in Subsection (2)(a) shall address:(i)mining;(ii)land use;(iii)livestock and grazing;(iv)irrigation;(v)agriculture;(vi)fire management;(vii)noxious weeds;(viii)forest management;(ix)water rights;(x)ditches and canals;(xi)water quality and hydrology;(xii)flood plains and river terraces;(xiii)wetlands;(xiv)riparian areas;(xv)predator control;(xvi)wildlife;(xvii)fisheries;(xviii)recreation and tourism;(xix)energy resources;(xx)mineral resources;(xxi)cultural, historical, geological, and paleontological resources;(xxii)wilderness;(xxiii)wild and scenic rivers;(xxiv)threatened, endangered, and sensitive species;(xxv)land access;(xxvi)law enforcement;(xxvii)economic considerations; and(xxviii)air.(c)For each item listed under Subsection (2)(b), a county's resource management plan shall:(i)establish findings pertaining to the item;(ii)establish defined objectives; and(iii)outline general policies and guidelines on how the objectives described in Subsection (2)(c)(ii) are to be accomplished.(3)(a)(i)All county general plans shall include specific provisions related to an area within, or partially within, the exterior boundaries of the county, or contiguous to the boundaries of a county, which are proposed for the siting of a storage facility or transfer facility for the placement of high-level nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive nuclear waste, as these wastes are defined in Section 19-3-303.(ii)The provisions described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) shall address the effects of the proposed site upon the health and general welfare of citizens of the state, and shall provide:(A)the information identified in Section 19-3-305;(B)information supported by credible studies that demonstrates that Subsection 19-3-307(2) has been satisfied; and(C)specific measures to mitigate the effects of high-level nuclear waste and greater than class C radioactive waste and guarantee the health and safety of the citizens of the state.(b)A county may, in lieu of complying with Subsection (3)(a), adopt an ordinance indicating that all proposals for the siting of a storage facility or transfer facility for the placement of high-level nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive waste wholly or partially within the county are rejected.(c)A county may adopt the ordinance listed in Subsection (3)(b) at any time.(d)The county shall send a certified copy of the ordinance described in Subsection (3)(b) to the executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality by certified mail within 30 days of enactment.(e)If a county repeals an ordinance adopted under Subsection (3)(b), the county shall:(i)comply with Subsection (3)(a) as soon as reasonably possible; and(ii)send a certified copy of the repeal to the executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality by certified mail within 30 days after the repeal.(4)If a county has designated a mountainous planning district, the general plan for the mountainous planning district is the controlling plan.

Section 181:
Section 181. Section 17-79-403, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-403 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-40317-79-403Effective 11/06/25. General plan preparation. (1)(a)The planning commission shall provide notice, as provided in Section 17-27a-20317-79-203, of the planning commission's intent to make a recommendation to the county legislative body for a general plan or a comprehensive general plan amendment when the planning commission initiates the process of preparing the planning commission's recommendation.(b)The planning commission shall make and recommend to the legislative body a proposed general plan for:(i)the unincorporated area within the county; or(ii)if the planning commission is a planning commission for a mountainous planning district, the mountainous planning district.(c)(i)The plan may include planning for incorporated areas if, in the planning commission's judgment, they are related to the planning of the unincorporated territory or of the county as a whole.(ii)Elements of the county plan that address incorporated areas are not an official plan or part of a municipal plan for any municipality, unless the county plan is recommended by the municipal planning commission and adopted by the governing body of the municipality.(2)(a)At a minimum, the proposed general plan, with the accompanying maps, charts, and descriptive and explanatory matter, shall include the planning commission's recommendations for the following plan elements:(i)a land use element that:(A)designates the long-term goals and the proposed extent, general distribution, and location of land for housing for residents of various income levels, business, industry, agriculture, recreation, education, public buildings and grounds, open space, and other categories of public and private uses of land as appropriate;(B)includes a statement of the projections for and standards of population density and building intensity recommended for the various land use categories covered by the plan;(C)is coordinated to integrate the land use element with the water use and preservation element; and(D)accounts for the effect of land use categories and land uses on water demand;(ii)a transportation and traffic circulation element that:(A)provides the general location and extent of existing and proposed freeways, arterial and collector streets, public transit, active transportation facilities, and other modes of transportation that the planning commission considers appropriate;(B)addresses the county's plan for residential and commercial development around major transit investment corridors to maintain and improve the connections between housing, employment, education, recreation, and commerce; and(C)correlates with the population projections, the employment projections, and the proposed land use element of the general plan;(iii)for a specified county as defined in Section 17-27a-40817-80-101, a moderate income housing element that:meets the requirements of Section 17-80-202;(A)provides a realistic opportunity to meet the need for additional moderate income housing within the next five years;(B)selects three or more moderate income housing strategies described in Subsections (2)(b)(ii)(A) through (V), or one moderate income housing strategy described in Subsections (2)(b)(ii)(W) through (BB), for implementation; and(C)includes an implementation plan as provided in Subsection (2)(f);(iv)a resource management plan detailing the findings, objectives, and policies required by Subsection 17-27a-401(3)Section 17-79-402; and(v)a water use and preservation element that addresses:(A)the effect of permitted development or patterns of development on water demand and water infrastructure;(B)methods of reducing water demand and per capita consumption for future development;(C)methods of reducing water demand and per capita consumption for existing development; and(D)opportunities for the county to modify the county's operations to eliminate practices or conditions that waste water.(b)In drafting the moderate income housing element, the planning commission:(i)shall consider the Legislature's determination that counties should facilitate a reasonable opportunity for a variety of housing, including moderate income housing:(A)to meet the needs of people of various income levels living, working, or desiring to live or work in the community; and(B)to allow people with various incomes to benefit from and fully participate in all aspects of neighborhood and community life; and(ii)shall include an analysis of how the county will provide a realistic opportunity for the development of moderate income housing within the planning horizon, including a recommendation to implement three or more of the following moderate income housing strategies:(A)rezone for densities necessary to facilitate the production of moderate income housing;(B)demonstrate investment in the rehabilitation or expansion of infrastructure that facilitates the construction of moderate income housing;(C)demonstrate investment in the rehabilitation of existing uninhabitable housing stock into moderate income housing;(D)identify and utilize county general fund subsidies or other sources of revenue to waive construction related fees that are otherwise generally imposed by the county for the construction or rehabilitation of moderate income housing;(E)create or allow for, and reduce regulations related to, internal or detached accessory dwelling units in residential zones;(F)zone or rezone for higher density or moderate income residential development in commercial or mixed-use zones, commercial centers, or employment centers;(G)amend land use regulations to allow for higher density or new moderate income residential development in commercial or mixed-use zones near major transit investment corridors;(H)amend land use regulations to eliminate or reduce parking requirements for residential development where a resident is less likely to rely on the resident's own vehicle, such as residential development near major transit investment corridors or senior living facilities;(I)amend land use regulations to allow for single room occupancy developments;(J)implement zoning incentives for moderate income units in new developments;(K)preserve existing and new moderate income housing and subsidized units by utilizing a landlord incentive program, providing for deed restricted units through a grant program, or establishing a housing loss mitigation fund;(L)reduce, waive, or eliminate impact fees related to moderate income housing;(M)demonstrate creation of, or participation in, a community land trust program for moderate income housing;(N)implement a mortgage assistance program for employees of the county, an employer that provides contracted services for the county, or any other public employer that operates within the county;(O)apply for or partner with an entity that applies for state or federal funds or tax incentives to promote the construction of moderate income housing, an entity that applies for programs offered by the Utah Housing Corporation within that agency's funding capacity, an entity that applies for affordable housing programs administered by the Department of Workforce Services, an entity that applies for services provided by a public housing authority to preserve and create moderate income housing, or any other entity that applies for programs or services that promote the construction or preservation of moderate income housing;(P)demonstrate utilization of a moderate income housing set aside from a community reinvestment agency, redevelopment agency, or community development and renewal agency to create or subsidize moderate income housing;(Q)eliminate impact fees for any accessory dwelling unit that is not an internal accessory dwelling unit as defined in Section 10-9a-530;(R)create a program to transfer development rights for moderate income housing;(S)ratify a joint acquisition agreement with another local political subdivision for the purpose of combining resources to acquire property for moderate income housing;(T)develop a moderate income housing project for residents who are disabled or 55 years old or older;(U)create or allow for, and reduce regulations related to, multifamily residential dwellings compatible in scale and form with detached single-family residential dwellings and located in walkable communities within residential or mixed-use zones;(V)demonstrate implementation of any other program or strategy to address the housing needs of residents of the county who earn less than 80% of the area median income, including the dedication of a local funding source to moderate income housing or the adoption of a land use ordinance that requires 10% or more of new residential development in a residential zone be dedicated to moderate income housing;(W)create a housing and transit reinvestment zone pursuant to Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 6, Housing and Transit Reinvestment Zone Act;(X)create a home ownership investment zone in accordance with Part 12, Home Ownership Promotion Zone for Counties;(Y)create a first home investment zone in accordance with Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 16, First Home Investment Zone Act;(Z)approve a project that receives funding from, or qualifies to receive funding from, the Utah Homes Investment Program created in Title 51, Chapter 12, Utah Homes Investment Program;(AA)adopt or approve an affordable home ownership density bonus for single-family residential units, as described in Section 17-27a-403.1; and(BB)adopt or approve an affordable home ownership density bonus for multi-family residential units, as described in Section 17-27a-403.2.(c)The planning commission shall identify each moderate income housing strategy recommended to the legislative body for implementation by restating the exact language used to describe the strategy in Subsection (2)(b)(ii).(d)(b)In drafting the land use element, the planning commission shall:(i)identify and consider each agriculture protection area within the unincorporated area of the county or mountainous planning district;(ii)avoid proposing a use of land within an agriculture protection area that is inconsistent with or detrimental to the use of the land for agriculture; and(iii)consider and coordinate with any station area plans adopted by municipalities located within the county under Section 10-9a-403.1.(e)(c)In drafting the transportation and traffic circulation element, the planning commission shall:(i)(A)consider and coordinate with the regional transportation plan developed by the county's region's metropolitan planning organization, if the relevant areas of the county are within the boundaries of a metropolitan planning organization; or(B)consider and coordinate with the long-range transportation plan developed by the Department of Transportation, if the relevant areas of the county are not within the boundaries of a metropolitan planning organization; and(ii)consider and coordinate with any station area plans adopted by municipalities located within the county under Section 10-9a-403.1.(f)(i)In drafting the implementation plan portion of the moderate income housing element as described in Subsection (2)(a)(iii)(C), the planning commission shall recommend to the legislative body the establishment of a five-year timeline for implementing each of the moderate income housing strategies selected by the county for implementation.(ii)The timeline described in Subsection (2)(f)(i) shall:(A)identify specific measures and benchmarks for implementing each moderate income housing strategy selected by the county; and(B)provide flexibility for the county to make adjustments as needed.(g)(d)In drafting the water use and preservation element, the planning commission:(i)shall consider applicable regional water conservation goals recommended by the Division of Water Resources;(ii)shall consult with the Division of Water Resources for information and technical resources regarding regional water conservation goals, including how implementation of the land use element and water use and preservation element may affect the Great Salt Lake;(iii)shall notify the community water systems serving drinking water within the unincorporated portion of the county and request feedback from the community water systems about how implementation of the land use element and water use and preservation element may affect:(A)water supply planning, including drinking water source and storage capacity consistent with Section 19-4-114; and(B)water distribution planning, including master plans, infrastructure asset management programs and plans, infrastructure replacement plans, and impact fee facilities plans;(iv)shall consider the potential opportunities and benefits of planning for regionalization of public water systems;(v)shall consult with the Department of Agriculture and Food for information and technical resources regarding the potential benefits of agriculture conservation easements and potential implementation of agriculture water optimization projects that would support regional water conservation goals;(vi)shall notify an irrigation or canal company located in the county so that the irrigation or canal company can be involved in the protection and integrity of the irrigation or canal company's delivery systems;(vii)shall include a recommendation for:(A)water conservation policies to be determined by the county; and(B)landscaping options within a public street for current and future development that do not require the use of lawn or turf in a parkstrip;(viii)shall review the county's land use ordinances and include a recommendation for changes to an ordinance that promotes the inefficient use of water;(ix)shall consider principles of sustainable landscaping, including the:(A)reduction or limitation of the use of lawn or turf;(B)promotion of site-specific landscape design that decreases stormwater runoff or runoff of water used for irrigation;(C)preservation and use of healthy trees that have a reasonable water requirement or are resistant to dry soil conditions;(D)elimination or regulation of ponds, pools, and other features that promote unnecessary water evaporation;(E)reduction of yard waste; and(F)use of an irrigation system, including drip irrigation, best adapted to provide the optimal amount of water to the plants being irrigated;(x)may include recommendations for additional water demand reduction strategies, including:(A)creating a water budget associated with a particular type of development;(B)adopting new or modified lot size, configuration, and landscaping standards that will reduce water demand for new single family development;(C)providing one or more water reduction incentives for existing landscapes and irrigation systems and installation of water fixtures or systems that minimize water demand;(D)discouraging incentives for economic development activities that do not adequately account for water use or do not include strategies for reducing water demand; and(E)adopting water concurrency standards requiring that adequate water supplies and facilities are or will be in place for new development; and(xi)shall include a recommendation for low water use landscaping standards for a new:(A)commercial, industrial, or institutional development;(B)common interest community, as defined in Section 57-25-102; or(C)multifamily housing project.(3)The proposed general plan may include:(a)an environmental element that addresses:(i)to the extent not covered by the county's resource management plan, the protection, conservation, development, and use of natural resources, including the quality of:(A)air;(B)forests;(C)soils;(D)rivers;(E)groundwater and other waters;(F)harbors;(G)fisheries;(H)wildlife;(I)minerals; and(J)other natural resources; and(ii)(A)the reclamation of land, flood control, prevention and control of the pollution of streams and other waters;(B)the regulation of the use of land on hillsides, stream channels and other environmentally sensitive areas;(C)the prevention, control, and correction of the erosion of soils;(D)the preservation and enhancement of watersheds and wetlands; and(E)the mapping of known geologic hazards;(b)a public services and facilities element showing general plans for sewage, water, waste disposal, drainage, public utilities, rights-of-way, easements, and facilities for them, police and fire protection, and other public services;(c)a rehabilitation, redevelopment, and conservation element consisting of plans and programs for:(i)historic preservation;(ii)the diminution or elimination of a development impediment as defined in Section 17C-1-102; and(iii)redevelopment of land, including housing sites, business and industrial sites, and public building sites;(d)an economic element composed of appropriate studies and forecasts, as well as an economic development plan, which may include review of existing and projected county revenue and expenditures, revenue sources, identification of basic and secondary industry, primary and secondary market areas, employment, and retail sales activity;(e)recommendations for implementing all or any portion of the general plan, including the adoption of land and water use ordinances, capital improvement plans, community development and promotion, and any other appropriate action;(f)provisions addressing any of the matters listed in Subsection 17-27a-401(2)17-79-401(2) or (3)(a)(i)17-79-402(1); and(g)any other element the county considers appropriate.

Section 182:
Section 182. Section 17-79-404, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-404 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-40417-79-404Effective 11/06/25. Public hearing by planning commission on proposed general plan or amendment -- Notice -- Revisions to general plan or amendment -- Adoption or rejection by legislative body.(1)(a)After completing the planning commission's recommendation for a proposed general plan, or proposal to amend the general plan, the planning commission shall schedule and hold a public hearing on the proposed plan or amendment.(b)The planning commission shall provide notice of the public hearing for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 10 calendar days before the day of the public hearing.(c)After the public hearing, the planning commission may modify the proposed general plan or amendment.(2)The planning commission shall forward the proposed general plan or amendment to the legislative body.(3)(a)As provided by local ordinance and by Section 17-27a-20417-79-204, the legislative body shall provide notice of the legislative body's intent to consider the general plan proposal.(b)(i)(A)In addition to the requirements of Subsections (1), (2), and (3)(a), the legislative body shall hold a public hearing in Salt Lake City on provisions of the proposed county plan regarding Subsection 17-27a-401(4)17-79-402(3).  (B)The public hearing procedure shall comply with this Subsection (3)(b).(ii)The public hearing format shall allow: (A)adequate time for public comment at the actual public hearing,; and shall also allow (B)for public comment in writing to be submitted to the legislative body for not fewer than 90 days after the date of the public hearing.(c)(i)The legislative body shall give notice of the hearing in accordance with this Subsection (3) when the proposed plan provisions required by Subsection 17-27a-401(4)17-79-402(3) are complete.(ii)Direct notice of the public hearing shall be given, in writing, to: (A)the governor,; (B)members of the state Legislature,; (C)the executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality,;(D) the state planning coordinator,; (E)the Resource Development Coordinating Committee, created in Section 63L-11-401; and (F)any other citizens or entities who specifically request notice of the public hearing in writing.(iii)Public notice shall be given for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 180 days.(iv)The notice shall be published to allow reasonable time for interested parties and the state to evaluate the information regarding Subsection 17-27a-401(4)17-79-402(3), including publication described in Subsection (3)(c)(iii) for 180 days before the date of the hearing to be held under this Subsection (3).(4)(a)After the public hearing required under this section, the legislative body may adopt, reject, or make any revisions to the proposed general plan that the legislative body considers appropriate.(b)The legislative body shall respond in writing and in a substantive manner to all those providing comments as a result of the hearing required by Subsection (3).(c)If the county legislative body rejects the proposed general plan or amendment, the legislative body may provide suggestions to the planning commission for the planning commission's review and recommendation.(5)The legislative body shall adopt the following elements and plans in conformity with the requirements of Section 17-79-403:(a)a land use element as provided in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(a)(i);(b)a transportation and traffic circulation element as provided in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(a)(ii);(c)for a specified county as defined in Section 17-27a-40817-80-101, a moderate income housing element as provided in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(a)(iii);(d)a resource management plan as provided by Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(a)(iv); and(e)on or before December 31, 2025, a water use and preservation element as provided in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(a)(v).

Section 183:
Section 183. Section 17-79-405, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-405 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-40517-79-405Effective 11/06/25. Effect of general plan -- Coordination with federal government.(1)Except for the mandatory provisions in Subsection 17-27a-401(4)(b)17-79-402(3)(b) and Section 17-27a-40617-79-406, and except as provided in Subsection (3), the general plan is an advisory guide for land use decisions, the impact of which shall be determined by ordinance.(2)The legislative body may adopt an ordinance mandating compliance with the general plan, and shall adopt an ordinance requiring compliance with all provisions of Subsection 17-27a-401(4)(b)17-79-402(3)(b).(3)(a)As used in this Subsection (3), "coordinate with" means an action taken by the federal government on a given matter, pursuant toin accordance with a federal law, rule, policy, or regulation, to:(i)work with a county on the matter to achieve a consistent outcome;(ii)make resource management plans in conjunction with a county on the matter;(iii)make resource management plans consistent with a county's plans on the matter;(iv)integrate a county's plans on the matter into the federal government's plans; or(v)follow a county's plans when contemplating any action on the matter.(b)If the federal government is required to coordinate with a county or a local government on a matter, the county's general plan is the principle document through which the coordination shall take place.(c)The federal government is not considered to have coordinated with a county or a local government on a matter unless the federal government has:(i)kept the county apprised of the federal government's proposed plans, amendments, policy changes, and management actions with regard to the matter;(ii)worked with the county in developing and implementing plans, policies, and management actions on the matter;(iii)treated the county as an equal partner in negotiations related to the matter;(iv)listened to and understood the county's position on the matter to determine whether a conflict exists between the federal government's proposed plan, policy, rule, or action and the county's general plan;(v)worked with the county in an amicable manner to reconcile any differences or disagreements, to the greatest extent possible under federal law, between the federal government and the county with regards to plans, policies, rules, or proposed management actions that relate to the matter;(vi)engaged in a good-faith effort to reconcile any conflicts discovered under Subsection (3)(c)(iv) to achieve, to the greatest extent possible under federal law, consistency between the federal government's proposed plan, policy, rule, or action and the county's general plan; and(vii)given full consideration to a county's general plan to the extent that the general plan addresses the matter.

Section 184:
Section 184. Section 17-79-406, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-406 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-40617-79-406Effective 11/06/25. Public uses to conform to general plan.After the legislative body has adopted a general plan, the following public properties may not be constructed or authorized unless the public property conforms to the current county general plan:(1) noa street, park, or other public way, ground, place, or space, no; (2)a publicly owned building or structure,; and no(3)a public utility, whether publicly or privately owned, may be constructed or authorized until and unless it conforms to the current general plan.

Section 185:
Section 185. Section 17-79-407, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-407 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-40717-79-407Effective 11/06/25. Effect of official maps.(1)Counties may adopt an official map.(2)(a)An official map does not:(i)require a landowner to dedicate and construct a street as a condition of development approval, except under circumstances provided in Subsection (2)(b)(iii); or(ii)require a county to immediately acquire property it has designated for eventual use as a public street.(b)This section does not prohibit a county from:(i)recommending that an applicant consider and accommodate the location of the proposed streets in the planning of a development proposal in a manner that is consistent with Section 17-27a-50717-79-812;(ii)acquiring the property through purchase, gift, voluntary dedication, or eminent domain; or(iii)requiring the dedication and improvement of a street if the street is found necessary by the county because of a proposed development and if the dedication and improvement is consistent with Section 17-27a-50717-79-812.

Section 186:
Section 186. Section 17-79-408, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-901 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-90117-79-408Effective 11/06/25. Mountainous planning district.(1)(a)The legislative body of a county of the first class may adopt an ordinance designating an area located within the county as a mountainous planning district if the legislative body determines that:(i)the area is primarily used for recreational purposes, including canyons, foothills, ski resorts, wilderness areas, lakes and reservoirs, campgrounds, or picnic areas within the Wasatch Range;(ii)the area is used by residents of the county who live inside and outside the limits of a municipality;(iii)the total resident population in the proposed mountainous planning district is equal to or less than 5% of the population of the county;(iv)the area is within the unincorporated area of the county or was within the unincorporated area of the county before May 12, 2015; and(v)the area includes land designated as part of a national forest on or before May 9, 2017.(b)The population figure under Subsection (1)(a)(iii) shall be derived from a population estimate by the Utah Population Committee created in Section 63C-20-103.(2)(a)A county may adopt a general plan and adopt a zoning or subdivision ordinance for a property that is located within a mountainous planning district.(b)A county plan or zoning or subdivision ordinance governs a property described in Subsection (2)(a).

Section 187:
Section 187. Section 17-79-501, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-501 is renumbered and amended to read:5. Land Use Regulations - General Processes17-27a-50117-79-501Effective 11/06/25. Enactment of land use regulation.(1)Only a legislative body, as the body authorized to weigh policy considerations, may enact a land use regulation.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a legislative body may enact a land use regulation only by ordinance.(b)A legislative body may, by ordinance or resolution, enact a land use regulation that imposes a fee.(3)A land use regulation shall be consistent with the purposes set forth in this chapter.(4)(a)A legislative body shall adopt a land use regulation to:(i)create or amend a zoning district under Subsection 17-27a-503(1)(a)17-79-503(1)(a); and(ii)designate general uses allowed in each zoning district.(b)A land use authority may establish or modify other restrictions or requirements other than those described in Subsection (4)(a), including the configuration or modification of uses or density, through a land use decision that applies criteria or policy elements that a land use regulation establishes or describes.(5)A county may not adopt a land use regulation, development agreement, or land use decision that restricts the type of crop that may be grown in an area that is:(a)zoned agricultural; or(b)assessed under Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 5, Farmland Assessment Act.(6)A county land use regulation pertaining to an airport or an airport influence area, as that term is defined in Section 72-10-401, is subject to Title 72, Chapter 10, Part 4, Airport Zoning Act.

Section 188:
Section 188. Section 17-79-502, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-502 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-50217-79-502Effective 11/06/25. Preparation and adoption of land use regulation.(1)A planning commission shall:(a)provide notice as required by Subsection 17-27a-205(1)(a)17-79-205(1)(a) and, if applicable, Subsection 17-27a-205(4)17-79-205(4);(b)hold a public hearing on a proposed land use regulation;(c)if applicable, consider each written objection filed in accordance with Subsection 17-27a-205(4) prior to17-79-205(4) before the public hearing; and(d)(i)review and recommend to the legislative body a proposed land use regulation that represents the planning commission's recommendation for regulating the use and development of land within:(A)all or any part of the unincorporated area of the county; or(B)for a mountainous planning district, all or any part of the area in the mountainous planning district; and(ii)forward to the legislative body all objections filed in accordance with Subsection 17-27a-205(4)17-79-205(4).(2)(a)The legislative body shall consider each proposed land use regulation that the planning commission recommends to the legislative body.(b)After providing notice as required by Subsection 17-27a-205(1)(b)17-79-205(1)(b) and holding a public meeting, the legislative body may adopt or reject the proposed land use regulation described in Subsection (2)(a):(i)as proposed by the planning commission; or(ii)after making any revision the legislative body considers appropriate.(c)A legislative body may consider a planning commission's failure to make a timely recommendation as a negative recommendation if the legislative body has provided for that consideration by ordinance.

Section 189:
Section 189. Section 17-79-503, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-503 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-50317-79-503Effective 11/06/25. Zoning district or land use regulation amendments.(1)Only a legislative body may amend:(a)the number, shape, boundaries, area, or general uses of any zoning district;(b)any regulation of or within the zoning district; or(c)any other provision of a land use regulation.(2)A legislative body may not make any amendment authorized by this section unless the legislative body first submits the amendment to the planning commission for the planning commission's recommendation.(3)A legislative body shall comply with the procedure specified in Section 17-27a-50217-79-502 in preparing and adopting an amendment to a land use regulation.

Section 190:
Section 190. Section 17-79-504, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-504 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-50417-79-504Effective 11/06/25. Temporary land use regulations.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a county legislative body may, without prior consideration of or recommendation from the planning commission, enact an ordinance establishing a temporary land use regulation for any part or all of the area within the county if:(i)the legislative body makes a finding of compelling, countervailing public interest; or(ii)the area is unregulated.(b)A temporary land use regulation under Subsection (1)(a) may prohibit or regulate the erection, construction, reconstruction, or alteration of any building or structure or any subdivision approval.(c)A temporary land use regulation under Subsection (1)(a) may not impose an impact fee or other financial requirement on building or development.(2)(a)The legislative body shall establish a period of limited effect for the ordinance not to exceed 180 days.(b)A county legislative body may not apply the provisions of a temporary land use regulation to the review of a specific land use application if the land use application is impaired or prohibited by proceedings initiated under Subsection 17-27a-508(1)(a)(ii)(B)17-79-803(1)(a)(ii)(B).(3)(a)A legislative body may, without prior planning commission consideration or recommendation, enact an ordinance establishing a temporary land use regulation prohibiting construction, subdivision approval, and other development activities within an area that is the subject of an Environmental Impact Statement or a Major Investment Study examining the area as a proposed highway or transportation corridor.(b)A regulation under Subsection (3)(a):(i)may not exceed 180 days in duration;(ii)may be renewed, if requested by the Transportation Commission created under Section 72-1-301, for up to two additional 180-day periods by ordinance enacted before the expiration of the previous regulation; and(iii)notwithstanding Subsections (3)(b)(i) and (ii), is effective only as long as the Environmental Impact Statement or Major Investment Study is in progress.

Section 191:
Section 191. Section 17-79-505, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-505 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-50517-79-505Effective 11/06/25. Zoning districts.(1)(a)The legislative body may divide the territory over which it has jurisdiction into zoning districts of a number, shape, and area that it considers appropriate to carry out the purposes of this chapter.(b)Within those zoning districts, the legislative body may regulate and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, or use of buildings and structures, and the use of land.(c)A county may enact an ordinance regulating land use and development in a flood plain or potential geologic hazard area to:(i)protect life; and(ii)prevent:(A)the substantial loss of real property; or(B)substantial damage to real property.(d)A county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class may not adopt a land use ordinance requiring a property owner to revegetate or landscape a single family dwelling disturbance area unless the property is located in a flood zone or geologic hazard except as required in Title 19, Chapter 5, Water Quality Act, to comply with federal law related to water pollution.(2)The legislative body shall ensure that the regulations are uniform for each class or kind of buildings throughout each zone, but the regulations in one zone may differ from those in other zones.(3)(a)There is no minimum area or diversity of ownership requirement for a zone designation.(b)Neither the size of a zoning district nor the number of landowners within the district may be used as evidence of the illegality of a zoning district or of the invalidity of a county decision.(4)A county may by ordinance exempt from specific zoning district standards a subdivision of land to accommodate the siting of a public utility infrastructure.

Section 192:
Section 192. Section 17-79-506, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-506 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-50617-79-506Effective 11/06/25. Conditional uses.(1)(a)A county may adopt a land use ordinance that includes conditional uses and provisions for conditional uses that require compliance with objective standards set forth in an applicable ordinance.(b)A county may not impose a requirement or standard on a conditional use that conflicts with a provision of this chapter or other state or federal law.(2)(a)(i)A land use authority shall approve a conditional use if reasonable conditions are proposed, or can be imposed, to mitigate the reasonably anticipated detrimental effects of the proposed use in accordance with applicable standards.(ii)The requirement described in Subsection (2)(a)(i) to reasonably mitigate anticipated detrimental effects of the proposed conditional use does not require elimination of the detrimental effects.(b)If a land use authority proposes reasonable conditions on a proposed conditional use, the land use authority shall ensure that the conditions are stated on the record and reasonably relate to mitigating the anticipated detrimental effects of the proposed use.(c)If the reasonably anticipated detrimental effects of a proposed conditional use cannot be substantially mitigated by the proposal or the imposition of reasonable conditions to achieve compliance with applicable standards, the land use authority may deny the conditional use.(3)A land use authority's decision to approve or deny a conditional use is an administrative land use decision.(4)A legislative body shall classify any use that a land use regulation allows in a zoning district as either a permitted or conditional use under this chapter.

Section 193:
Section 193. Section 17-79-507, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-506.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-506.517-79-507Effective 11/06/25. Classification of new and unlisted business uses.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Classification request" means a request to determine whether a proposed business use aligns with an existing land use specified in a county's land use ordinances.(b)"New or unlisted business use" means a business activity that does not align with an existing land use specified in a county's land use ordinances.(2)(a)Each county shall incorporate into the county's land use ordinances a process for reviewing and approving a new or unlisted business use and designating an appropriate zone or zones for an approved use.(b)The process described in Subsection (2)(a) shall:(i)detail how an applicant may submit a classification request;(ii)establish a procedure for the county to review a classification request, including:(A)providing a land use authority with criteria to determine whether a proposed use aligns with an existing use; and(B)allowing an applicant to proceed under the regulations of an existing use if a land use authority determines a proposed use aligns with that existing use;(iii)provide that if a use is determined to be a new or unlisted business use:(A)the applicant shall submit an application for approval of the new or unlisted business use to the legislative body for review;(B)the legislative body shall consider and determine whether to approve or deny the new or unlisted business use; and(C)the legislative body shall approve or deny the new or unlisted business use, within a time frame the legislative body establishes by ordinance, if the applicant responds to requests for additional information within a time frame established by the county and appears at required hearings;(iv)provide that if the legislative body approves a proposed new or unlisted business use, the legislative body shall designate an appropriate zone or zones for the approved use; and(v)provide that if the legislative body denies a proposed new or unlisted business use, or if an applicant disagrees with a land use authority's classification of the proposed use, the legislative body shall:(A)notify the applicant in writing of each reason for the classification or denial; and(B)offer the applicant an opportunity to challenge the classification or denial through an administrative appeal process established by the county.(3)Each county shall amend each land use ordinance that contains a list of approved or prohibited business uses to include a reference to the process for petitioning to approve a new or unlisted business use, as described in Subsection (2).

Section 194:
Section 194. Section 17-79-508, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-528 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52817-79-508Effective 11/06/25. Development agreements.(1)Subject to Subsection (2), a county may enter into a development agreement containing any term that the county considers necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, including a term relating to:(a)a master planned development;(b)a planned unit development;(c)an annexation;(d)affordable or moderate income housing with development incentives;(e)a public-private partnership; or(f)a density transfer or bonus within a development project or between development projects.(2)(a)A development agreement may not:(i)limit a county's authority in the future to:(A)enact a land use regulation; or(B)take any action allowed under Section 17-53-22317-64-501;(ii)require a county to change the zoning designation of an area of land within the county in the future; or(iii)allow a use or development of land that applicable land use regulations governing the area subject to the development agreement would otherwise prohibit, unless the legislative body approves the development agreement in accordance with the same procedures for enacting a land use regulation under Section 17-27a-50217-79-502, including a review and recommendation from the planning commission and a public hearing.(b)A development agreement that requires the implementation of an existing land use regulation as an administrative act does not require a legislative body's approval under Section 17-27a-50217-79-502.(c)Subject to Subsection (2)(d), a county may require a development agreement for developing land within the unincorporated area of the county if the applicant has applied for a legislative or discretionary approval, including an approval relating to:(i)the height of a structure;(ii)a parking or setback exception;(iii)a density transfer or bonus;(iv)a development incentive;(v)a zone change; or(vi)an amendment to a prior development agreement.(d)A county may not require a development agreement as a condition for developing land within the unincorporated area of the county if:(i)the development otherwise complies with applicable statute and county ordinances;(ii)the development is an allowed or permitted use; or(iii)the county's land use regulations otherwise establish all applicable standards for development on the land.(e)A county may submit to a county recorder's office for recording:(i)a fully executed agreement; or(ii)a document related to:(A)code enforcement;(B)a special assessment area;(C)a local historic district boundary; or(D)the memorializing or enforcement of an agreed upon restriction, incentive, or covenant.(f)Subject to Subsection (2)(e), a county may not cause to be recorded against private real property a document that imposes development requirements, development regulations, or development controls on the property.(g)To the extent that a development agreement does not specifically address a matter or concern related to land use or development, the matter or concern is governed by:(i)this chapter; and(ii)any applicable land use regulations.

Section 195:
Section 195. Section 17-79-601, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-505.5 is renumbered and amended to read:6. Land Use Regulations - Particular Situations17-27a-505.517-79-601Effective 11/06/25. Limit on single family designation.(1)As used in this section, "single-family limit" means the number of individuals allowed to occupy each residential unit that is recognized by a land use authority in a zone permitting occupancy by a single family.(2)A county may not adopt a single-family limit that is less than:(a)three, if the county has within its unincorporated area:(i)a state university;(ii)a private university with a student population of at least 20,000; or(iii)a mountainous planning district; or(b)four, for each other county.

Section 196:
Section 196. Section 17-79-602, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-508.1 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-508.117-79-602Effective 11/06/25. Private maintenance of public access amenities prohibited.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Public access amenity" means a physical feature like a trail or recreation area that a municipality designates for public access and use.(b)"Retail water line" means the same as that term is defined in Section 11-8-4.(c)"Sewer lateral" means the same as that term is defined in Section 11-8-4.(d)(i)"Water utility" means a main line or other integral part of a sewer or water utility service.(ii)"Water utility" does not include a retail water line or sewer lateral.(2)A county may not require a private individual or entity, including a community association or homeowners association, to maintain and be responsible for a public access amenity or water utility in perpetuity unless:(a)the public access amenity is the property located adjacent to the private property owned by the private individual or entity to the curb line of the street, including park strips and sidewalks; or(b)the private individual or entity agreed to maintain or be responsible for the public access amenity or water utility in perpetuity in a covenant, utility service agreement, development agreement, or other agreement between the county and the private individual or entity.

Section 197:
Section 197. Section 17-79-603, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-509.7 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-509.717-79-603Effective 11/06/25. Transferable development rights.(1)A county may adopt an ordinance:(a)designating sending zones and receiving zones located wholly within the unincorporated area of the county;(b)designating a sending zone if the area described in the sending zone is located, at least in part, within the unincorporated county, and the area described in the sending zone that is located outside the county complies with Subsection (2);(c)designating a receiving zone if the area described in the receiving zone is located, at least in part, within the unincorporated county, and the area described in the receiving zone that is located outside the county complies with Subsection (2); and(d)allowing the transfer of a transferable development right from a sending zone to a receiving zone.(2)A county may adopt an ordinance designating a sending zone or receiving zone that is located, in part, in a municipality or unincorporated area of another county, if the legislative body of every municipality or county with land inside the sending zone or receiving zone adopts an ordinance designating the sending zone or receiving zone.(3)A county may not allow the use of a transferable development right unless the county adopts an ordinance described in Subsection (1).

Section 198:
Section 198. Section 17-79-604, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-511 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-51117-79-604Effective 11/06/25. Termination of a billboard and associated rights.(1)A county may only require termination of a billboard and associated rights through:(a)gift;(b)purchase;(c)agreement;(d)exchange; or(e)eminent domain.(2)A termination under Subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), or (d) requires the voluntary consent of the billboard owner.(3)A termination under Subsection (1)(e) requires the county to:(a)acquire the billboard and associated rights through eminent domain, in accordance with Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain, except as provided in Subsections 17-27a-512(2)(f)17-79-605(2)(f) and (h); and(b)after acquiring the rights under Subsection (3)(a), terminate the billboard and associated rights.

Section 199:
Section 199. Section 17-79-605, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-512 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-51217-79-605Effective 11/06/25. County's acquisition of billboard by eminent domain -- Removal without providing compensation -- Limit on allowing nonconforming billboard to be rebuilt or replaced -- Validity of county permit after issuance of state permit.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Clearly visible" means capable of being read without obstruction by an occupant of a vehicle traveling on a street or highway within the visibility area.(b)"Highest allowable height" means:(i)if the height allowed by the county, by ordinance or consent, is higher than the height under Subsection (1)(b)(ii), the height allowed by the county; or(ii)(A)for a noninterstate billboard:(I)if the height of the previous use or structure is 45 feet or higher, the height of the previous use or structure; or(II)if the height of the previous use or structure is less than 45 feet, the height of the previous use or structure or the height to make the entire advertising content of the billboard clearly visible, whichever is higher, but no higher than 45 feet; and(B)for an interstate billboard:(I)if the height of the previous use or structure is at or above the interstate height, the height of the previous use or structure; or(II)if the height of the previous use or structure is less than the interstate height, the height of the previous use or structure or the height to make the entire advertising content of the billboard clearly visible, whichever is higher, but no higher than the interstate height.(c)"Interstate billboard" means a billboard that is intended to be viewed from a highway that is an interstate.(d)"Interstate height" means a height that is the higher of:(i)65 feet above the ground; and(ii)25 feet above the grade of the interstate.(e)"Noninterstate billboard" means a billboard that is intended to be viewed from a street or highway that is not an interstate.(f)"Visibility area" means the area on a street or highway that is:(i)defined at one end by a line extending from the base of the billboard across all lanes of traffic of the street or highway in a plane that is perpendicular to the street or highway; and(ii)defined on the other end by a line extending across all lanes of traffic of the street or highway in a plane that is:(A)perpendicular to the street or highway; and(B)(I)for an interstate billboard, 500 feet from the base of the billboard; or(II)for a noninterstate billboard, 300 feet from the base of the billboard.(2)(a)If a billboard owner makes a written request to the county with jurisdiction over the billboard to take an action described in Subsection (2)(b), the billboard owner may take the requested action, without further county land use approval, 180 days after the day on which the billboard owner makes the written request, unless within the 180-day period the county:(i)in an attempt to acquire the billboard and associated rights through eminent domain under Section 17-27a-51117-79-604 for the purpose of terminating the billboard and associated rights:(A)completes the procedural steps required under Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain, before the filing of an eminent domain action; and(B)files an eminent domain action in accordance with Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain;(ii)denies the request in accordance with Subsection (2)(d); or(iii)requires the billboard owner to remove the billboard in accordance with Subsection (3).(b)Subject to Subsection (2)(a), a billboard owner may:(i)rebuild, maintain, repair, or restore a billboard structure that is damaged by casualty, an act of God, or vandalism;(ii)relocate or rebuild a billboard structure, or take another measure, to correct a mistake in the placement or erection of a billboard for which the county issued a permit, if the proposed relocation, rebuilding, or other measure is consistent with the intent of that permit;(iii)structurally modify or upgrade a billboard;(iv)relocate a billboard into any commercial, industrial, or manufacturing zone within the unincorporated area of the county, if the relocated billboard is:(A)within 5,280 feet of the billboard's previous location; and(B)no closer than 300 feet from an off-premise sign existing on the same side of the street or highway, or if the street or highway is an interstate or limited access highway that is subject to Title 72, Chapter 7, Part 5, Utah Outdoor Advertising Act, the distance allowed under that act between the relocated billboard and an off-premise sign existing on the same side of the interstate or limited access highway; or(v)make one or more of the following modifications, as the billboard owner determines, to a billboard that is structurally  altered by modification or upgrade under Subsection (2)(b)(iii), by relocation under Subsection (2)(b)(iv), or by any combination of these alterations:(A)erect the billboard:(I)to the highest allowable height; and(II)as the owner determines, to an angle that makes the entire advertising content of the billboard clearly visible; or(B)install a sign face on the billboard that is at least the same size as, but no larger than, the sign face on the billboard before the billboard's relocation.(c)A modification under Subsection (2)(b)(v) shall comply with Title 72, Chapter 7, Part 5, Utah Outdoor Advertising Act, to the extent applicable.(d)A county may deny a billboard owner's request to relocate or rebuild a billboard structure, or to take other measures, in order to correct a mistake in the placement or erection of a billboard without acquiring the billboard and associated rights through eminent domain under Section 17-27a-51117-79-604, if the mistake in placement or erection of the billboard is determined by clear and convincing evidence, in a proceeding that protects the billboard owner's due process rights, to have resulted from an intentionally false or misleading statement:(i)by the billboard applicant in the application; and(ii)regarding the placement or erection of the billboard.(e)A county that acquires a billboard and associated rights through eminent domain under Section 17-27a-51117-79-604 shall pay just compensation to the billboard owner in an amount that is:(i)the value of the existing billboard at a fair market capitalization rate, based on actual annual revenue, less any annual rent expense;(ii)the value of any other right associated with the billboard;(iii)the cost of the sign structure; and(iv)damage to the economic unit described in Subsection 72-7-510(3)(b), of which the billboard owner's interest is a part.(f)If a county commences an eminent domain action under Subsection (2)(a)(i):(i)the provisions of Section 78B-6-510 do not apply; and(ii)the county may not take possession of the billboard or the billboard's associated rights until:(A)completion of all appeals of a judgment allowing the county to acquire the billboard and associated rights; and(B)the billboard owner receives payment of just compensation, described in Subsection (2)(e).(g)Unless the eminent domain action is dismissed under Subsection (2)(h)(ii), a billboard owner may proceed, without further county land use approval, to take an action requested under Subsection (2)(a), if the county's eminent domain action commenced under Subsection (2)(a)(i) is dismissed without an order allowing the county to acquire the billboard and associated rights.(h)(i)A billboard owner may withdraw a request made under Subsection (2)(a) at any time before the county takes possession of the billboard or the billboard's associated rights in accordance with Subsection (2)(f)(ii).(ii)If a billboard owner withdraws a request in accordance with Subsection (2)(h)(i), the court shall dismiss the county's eminent domain action to acquire the billboard or associated rights. (3)Notwithstanding Section 17-27a-51117-79-604, a county may require an owner of a billboard to remove the billboard without acquiring a billboard and associated rights through eminent domain if:(a)the county determines:(i)by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant for a permit intentionally made a false or misleading statement in the applicant's application regarding the placement or erection of the billboard; or(ii)by substantial evidence that the billboard:(A)is structurally unsafe;(B)is in an unreasonable state of repair; or(C)has been abandoned for at least 12 months;(b)the county notifies the billboard owner in writing that the billboard owner's billboard meets one or more of the conditions listed in Subsections (3)(a)(i) and (ii);(c)the billboard owner fails to remedy the condition or conditions within:(i)180 days after the day on which the billboard owner receives written notice under Subsection (3)(b); or(ii)if the condition forming the basis of the county's intention to remove the billboard is that it is structurally unsafe, 10 business days, or a longer period if necessary because of a natural disaster, after the day on which the billboard owner receives written notice under Subsection (3)(b); and(d)following the expiration of the applicable period under Subsection (3)(c) and after providing the billboard owner with reasonable notice of proceedings and an opportunity for a hearing, the county finds:(i)by clear and convincing evidence, that the applicant for a permit intentionally made a false or misleading statement in the application regarding the placement or erection of the billboard; or(ii)by substantial evidence that the billboard is structurally unsafe, is in an unreasonable state of repair, or has been abandoned for at least 12 months.(4)A county may not allow a nonconforming billboard to be rebuilt or replaced by anyone other than the billboard's owner, or the billboard's owner acting through a contractor, within 500 feet of the nonconforming location.(5)A permit that a county issues, extends, or renews for a billboard remains valid beginning on the day on which the county issues, extends, or renews the permit and ending 180 days after the day on which a required state permit is issued for the billboard if:(a)the billboard requires a state permit; and(b)an application for the state permit is filed within 30 days after the day on which the county issues, extends, or renews a permit for the billboard.

Section 200:
Section 200. Section 17-79-606, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-514 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-51417-79-606Effective 11/06/25. Regulation of amateur radio antennas.(1)A county may not enact or enforce an ordinance that does not comply with the ruling of the Federal Communications Commission in "Amateur Radio Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" or a regulation related to amateur radio service adopted under 47 C.F.R. Part 97.(2)If a county adopts an ordinance involving the placement, screening, or height of an amateur radio antenna based on health, safety, or aesthetic conditions, the ordinance shall:(a)reasonably accommodate amateur radio communications; and(b)represent the minimal practicable regulation to accomplish the county's purpose.

Section 201:
Section 201. Section 17-79-607, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-515 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-51517-79-607Effective 11/06/25. Regulation of residential facilities for persons with disabilities.A county may only regulate a residential facility for persons with a disability to the extent allowed by:(1)Title 57, Chapter 21, Utah Fair Housing Act, and applicable jurisprudence;(2)the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq., and applicable jurisprudence; and(3)Section 504, Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and applicable jurisprudence.

Section 202:
Section 202. Section 17-79-608, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-520 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52017-79-608Effective 11/06/25. Wetlands.(1)A county may not designate or treat any land as wetlands unless the United States Army Corps of Engineers or other agency of the federal government has designated the land as wetlands.(2)A land use authority that issues a land use permit that affects land designated as wetlands by the United States Army Corps of Engineers or another agency of the federal government shall provide a copy of the land use permit to the Utah Geological Survey established in Section 79-3-201.

Section 203:
Section 203. Section 17-79-609, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-521 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52117-79-609Effective 11/06/25. Refineries.(1)As used in this section, "develop" or "development" means:(a)the construction, alteration, or improvement of land, including any related moving, demolition, or excavation outside of a refinery property boundary;(b)the subdivision of land for a non-industrial use; or(c)the construction of a non-industrial structure on a parcel that is not subject to the subdivision process.(2)Before a legislative body may adopt a non-industrial zoning change to permit development within 500 feet of a refinery boundary, the legislative body shall consult with the refinery to determine whether the proposed change is compatible with the refinery.(3)Before a land use authority may approve an application to develop within 500 feet of a refinery boundary, the land use authority shall consult with the refinery to determine whether the development is compatible with the refinery.(4)A legislative body described in Subsection (2), or a land use authority described in Subsection (3), may not request from the refinery:(a)proprietary information;(b)information, if made public, that would create a security or safety risk to the refinery or the public;(c)information that is restricted from public disclosure under federal or state law; or(d)information that is available in public record.(5)(a)This section does not grant authority to a legislative body described in Subsection (2), or a land use authority described in Subsection (3), to require a refinery to undertake or cease an action.(b)This section does not create a cause of action against a refinery.(c)Except as expressly provided in this section, this section does not alter or remove any legal right or obligation of a refinery.

Section 204:
Section 204. Section 17-79-610, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-525 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52517-79-610Effective 11/06/25. Cannabis production establishments and medical cannabis pharmacies.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Cannabis production establishment" means the same as that term is defined in Section 4-41a-102 and includes a closed-door medical cannabis pharmacy.(b)"Closed-door medical cannabis pharmacy" means the same as that term is defined in Section 4-41a-102.(c)"Industrial hemp producer licensee" means the same as the term "medical cannabis research licensee" is defined in Section 4-41-102.(d)"Medical cannabis pharmacy" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-4-201.(2)(a)(i)A county may not regulate a cannabis production establishment or a medical cannabis pharmacy in conflict with:(A)Title 4, Chapter 41a, Cannabis Production Establishments and Pharmacies, and applicable jurisprudence; and(B)this chapter.(ii)A county may not regulate an industrial hemp producer licensee in conflict with:(A)Title 4, Chapter 41, Hemp and Cannabinoid Act, and applicable jurisprudence; and(B)this chapter.(b)The Department of Agriculture and Food has plenary authority to license programs or entities that operate a cannabis production establishment or a medical cannabis pharmacy.(3)(a)Within the time period described in Subsection (3)(b), a county shall prepare and adopt a land use regulation, development agreement, or land use decision in accordance with this title and:(i)regarding a cannabis production establishment, Section 4-41a-406; or(ii)regarding a medical cannabis pharmacy, Section 4-41a-1105.(b)A county shall take the action described in Subsection (3)(a):(i)before January 1, 2021, within 45 days after the day on which the county receives a petition for the action; and(ii)after January 1, 2021, in accordance with Subsection 17-27a-509.5(2)17-79-805(2).

Section 205:
Section 205. Section 17-79-611, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-510.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-510.517-79-611Effective 11/06/25. Changes to rental dwelling units -- Egress windows.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Internal accessory dwelling unit" means an accessory dwelling unit created:(i)within a primary dwelling;(ii)within the footprint of the primary dwelling described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) at the time the internal accessory dwelling unit is created; and(iii)for the purpose of offering a long-term rental of 30 consecutive days or longer.(b)"Primary dwelling" means a single-family dwelling that:(i)is detached; and(ii)is occupied as the primary residence of the owner of record.(c)"Rental dwelling" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-8-85.5.(2)A county ordinance adopted under Section 10-1-203.5 may not:(a)require physical changes in a structure with a legal nonconforming rental dwelling use unless the change is for:(i)the reasonable installation of:(A)a smoke detector that is plugged in or battery operated;(B)a ground fault circuit interrupter protected outlet on existing wiring;(C)street addressing;(D)except as provided in Subsection (3), an egress bedroom window if the existing bedroom window is smaller than that required by current State Construction Code;(E)an electrical system or a plumbing system, if the existing system is not functioning or is unsafe as determined by an independent electrical or plumbing professional who is licensed in accordance with Title 58, Occupations and Professions;(F)hand or guard rails; or(G)occupancy separation doors as required by the International Residential Code; or(ii)the abatement of a structure; or(b)be enforced to terminate a legal nonconforming rental dwelling use.(3)(a)A county may not require physical changes to install an egress or emergency escape window in an existing bedroom that complied with the State Construction Code in effect at the time the bedroom was finished if:(i)the dwelling is an owner-occupied dwelling or a rental dwelling that is:(A)a detached one-, two-, three-, or four-family dwelling; or(B)a town home that is not more than three stories above grade with a separate means of egress; and(ii)(A)the window in the existing bedroom is smaller than that required by current State Construction Code; and(B)the change would compromise the structural integrity of the structure or could not be completed in accordance with current State Construction Code, including set-back and window well requirements.(b)Subsection (3)(a) does not apply to an internal accessory dwelling unit.(4)Nothing in this section prohibits a county from:(a)regulating the style of window that is required or allowed in a bedroom;(b)requiring that a window in an existing bedroom be fully openable if the openable area is less than required by current State Construction Code; or(c)requiring that an existing window not be reduced in size if the openable area is smaller than required by current State Construction Code.

Section 206:
Section 206. Section 17-79-612, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-527 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52717-79-612Effective 11/06/25. Utility service connections.(1)A county may not enact an ordinance, a resolution, or a policy that prohibits, or has the effect of prohibiting, the connection or reconnection of an energy utility service provided by a public utility as that term is defined in Section 54-2-1.(2)Subsection (1) does not apply to:(a)an incentive offered by a county; or(b)a building owned by a county.

Section 207:
Section 207. Section 17-79-613, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-529 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52917-79-613Effective 11/06/25. Infrastructure improvements involving roadways.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Low impact development" means the same as that term is defined in Section 19-5-108.5.(b)(i)"Pavement" means the bituminous or concrete surface of a roadway.(ii)"Pavement" does not include a curb or gutter.(c)"Residential street" means a public or private roadway that:(i)currently serves or is projected to serve an area designated primarily for single-family residential use;(ii)requires at least two off-site parking spaces for each single-family residential property abutting the roadway; and(iii)has or is projected to have, on average, traffic of no more than 1,000 trips per day, based on findings contained in:(A)a traffic impact study;(B)the county's general plan under Section 17-27a-40117-79-401;(C)an adopted phasing plan; or(D)a written plan or report on current or projected traffic usage.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a county may not, as part of an infrastructure improvement, require the installation of pavement on a residential street at a width in excess of 32 feet if the county requires low impact development for the area in which the residential street is located.(b)Subsection (2)(a) does not apply if a county requires the installation of pavement:(i)in a vehicle turnaround area; or(ii)to address specific traffic flow constraints at an intersection or other area.(3)(a)A county shall, by ordinance, establish any standards that the county requires, as part of an infrastructure improvement, for fire department vehicle access and turnaround on roadways.(b)The county shall ensure that the standards established under Subsection (3)(a) are consistent with the State Fire Code as defined in Section 15A-1-102.

Section 208:
Section 208. Section 17-79-614, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-530 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-53017-79-614Effective 11/06/25. Regulation of building design elements prohibited -- Regulation of parking spaces prohibited -- Exceptions.(1)As used in this section: (a)"Affordable housing" means housing occupied or reserved for occupancy that is priced at 80% of the county median home price.(b) "Building design element" means:(i)exterior color;(ii)type or style of exterior cladding material;(iii)style, dimensions, or materials of a roof structure, roof pitch, or porch;(iv)exterior nonstructural architectural ornamentation;(v)location, design, placement, or architectural styling of a window or door;(vi)location, design, placement, or architectural styling of a garage door, not including a rear-loading garage door;(vii)number or type of rooms;(viii)interior layout of a room;(ix)minimum square footage over 1,000 square feet, not including a garage;(x)rear yard landscaping requirements;(xi)minimum building dimensions; or(xii)a requirement to install front yard fencing.(c)"Owner-occupied" means a housing unit in which the individual who owns the housing unit, solely or jointly, lives as the individual's primary residence for no less than five years.(d)"Specified county" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-27a-40817-80-101.(e)"Unobstructed" means a parking space that has no permanent barriers that would unreasonably reduce the size of an available parking space described in Subsection (4).(2)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a county may not impose a requirement for a building design element on a one- or two-family dwelling.(3)Subsection (2) does not apply to:(a)a dwelling located within an area designated as a historic district in:(i)the National Register of Historic Places;(ii)the state register as defined in Section 9-8a-402; or(iii)a local historic district or area, or a site designated as a local landmark, created by ordinance before January 1, 2021, except as provided under Subsection (3)(b);(b)an ordinance enacted as a condition for participation in the National Flood Insurance Program administered by the Federal Emergency Management Agency;(c)an ordinance enacted to implement the requirements of the Utah Wildland Urban Interface Code adopted under Section 15A-2-103;(d)building design elements agreed to under a development agreement;(e)a dwelling located within an area that:(i)is zoned primarily for residential use; and(ii)was substantially developed before calendar year 1950;(f)an ordinance enacted to implement water efficient landscaping in a rear yard;(g)an ordinance enacted to regulate type of cladding, in response to findings or evidence from the construction industry of:(i)defects in the material of existing cladding; or(ii)consistent defects in the installation of existing cladding;(h)a land use regulation, including a planned unit development or overlay zone, that a property owner requests:(i)the county to apply to the owner's property; and(ii)in exchange for an increase in density or other benefit not otherwise available as a permitted use in the zoning area or district; or(i)an ordinance enacted to mitigate the impacts of an accidental explosion:(i)in excess of 20,000 pounds of trinitrotoluene equivalent;(ii)that would create overpressure waves greater than .2 pounds per square inch; and(iii)that would pose a risk of damage to a window, garage door, or carport of a facility located within the vicinity of the regulated area.(4)A county that is a specified county may not:(a)require that the dimensions of a single parking space for a one- or two-family dwelling or town home be:(i)for unobstructed, enclosed, or covered parking:(A)more than 10 feet wide; or(B)more than 20 feet long; or(ii)for uncovered parking:(A)more than nine feet wide; or(B)more than 20 feet long;(b)restrict an unobstructed tandem parking space from satisfying two parking spaces as part of a minimum parking space requirement; and(c)restrict a two-car garage from satisfying two parking spaces as part of a minimum parking space requirement.(5)A county may not require a garage for a single-family attached or detached dwelling that is owner-occupied affordable housing.(6)If a county requires a garage, the county shall count each parking space within the garage as part of the county's minimum parking space requirement as described in Section 17-27a-52617-80-303.(7)Nothing in this section prohibits a county from requiring on-site parking for owner-occupied affordable housing.

Section 209:
Section 209. Section 17-79-615, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-532 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-53217-79-615Effective 11/06/25. Water wise landscaping -- County landscaping regulations.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Lawn or turf" means nonagricultural land planted in closely mowed, managed grasses.(b)"Mulch" means material such as rock, bark, wood chips, or other materials left loose and applied to the soil.(c)"Overhead spray irrigation" means above ground irrigation heads that spray water through a nozzle.(d)"Private landscaping plan" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-27a-604.517-79-707.(e)(i)"Vegetative coverage" means the ground level surface area covered by the exposed leaf area of a plant or group of plants at full maturity.(ii)"Vegetative coverage" does not mean the ground level surface area covered by the exposed leaf area of a tree or trees.(f)"Water wise landscaping" means any or all of the following:(i)installation of plant materials suited to the microclimate and soil conditions that can:(A)remain healthy with minimal irrigation once established; or(B)be maintained without the use of overhead spray irrigation;(ii)use of water for outdoor irrigation through proper and efficient irrigation design and water application; or(iii)the use of other landscape design features that:(A)minimize the need of the landscape for supplemental water from irrigation; or(B)reduce the landscape area dedicated to lawn or turf.(2)A county may not enact or enforce an ordinance, resolution, or policy that prohibits, or has the effect of prohibiting, a property owner from incorporating water wise landscaping on the property owner's property.(3)(a)Subject to Subsection (3)(b), Subsection (2) does not prohibit a county from requiring a property owner to:(i)comply with a site plan review, private landscaping plan review, or other review process before installing water wise landscaping;(ii)maintain plant material in a healthy condition; and(iii)follow specific water wise landscaping design requirements adopted by the county, including a requirement that:(A)restricts or clarifies the use of mulches considered detrimental to county operations;(B)imposes minimum or maximum vegetative coverage standards; or(C)restricts or prohibits the use of specific plant materials.(b)A county may not require a property owner to install or keep in place lawn or turf in an area with a width less than eight feet.(4)A county may require a seller of a newly constructed residence within the unincorporated area of the county to inform the first buyer of the newly constructed residence of a county ordinance requiring water wise landscaping.(5)A county shall report to the Division of Water Resources the existence, enactment, or modification of an ordinance, resolution, or policy that implements regional-based water use efficiency standards established by the Division of Water Resources by rule under Section 73-10-37.(6)A county may enforce a county landscaping ordinance in compliance with this section.

Section 210:
Section 210. Section 17-79-616, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-533 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-53317-79-616Effective 11/06/25. Land use compatibility with military use.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Department" means the Department of Veterans and Military Affairs.(b)"Military" means a branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the Utah National Guard.(c)"Military land" means the following land or facilities:(i)Camp Williams;(ii)Hill Air Force Base;(iii)Dugway Proving Ground;(iv)Tooele Army Depot;(v)Utah Test and Training Range;(vi)Nephi Readiness Center;(vii)Cedar City Alternate Flight Facility; or(viii)Little Mountain Test Facility.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), on or before July 1, 2025, for any area in a county within 5,000 feet of a boundary of military land, a county shall, in consultation with the department, develop and maintain a compatible use plan to ensure permitted uses and conditional uses relevant to the military land are compatible with the military operations on military land.(b)A county that has a compatible use plan as of January 1, 2023, is not required to develop a new compatible use plan.(3)If a county receives a land use application related to land within 5,000 feet of a boundary of military land, before the county may approve the land use application, the county shall notify the department in writing.(4)(a)If the department receives the notice described in Subsection (3), the executive director of the department shall:(i)determine whether the proposed land use is compatible with the military use of the relevant military land; and(ii)within 90 days after the receipt of the notice described in Subsection (3), respond in writing to the county regarding the determination of compatibility described in Subsection (4)(a)(i).(b)(i)For a land use application pertaining to a parcel within 5,000 feet of military land that may have an adverse effect on the operations of the military installation, except as provided in Subsection (4)(b)(ii), the county shall consider the compatible use plan in processing the land use application.(ii)For a land use application pertaining to a parcel within 5,000 feet of military land that may have an adverse effect on the operations of the military installation, if the applicant has a vested right, the county is not required to consider the compatible land use plan in consideration of the land use application.(5)If the department receives the notice described in Subsection (3) before the county has completed the compatible use plan as described in this section, the department shall consult with the county and representatives of the relevant military land to determine whether the use proposed in the land use application is a compatible use.

Section 211:
Section 211. Section 17-79-617, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-534 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-53417-79-617Effective 11/06/25. Residential rear setback limitations.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Allowable feature" means:(i)a landing or walkout porch that:(A)is no more than 32 square feet in size; and(B)is used for ingress to and egress from the rear of the residential dwelling; or(ii)a window well.(b)"Landing" means an uncovered, above-ground platform, with or without stairs, connected to the rear of a residential dwelling.(c)"Setback" means the required distance between the property line of a lot or parcel and the location where a structure is allowed to be placed under an adopted land use regulation.(d)"Walkout porch" means an uncovered platform that is on the ground and connected to the rear of a residential dwelling.(e)"Window well" means a recess in the ground around a residential dwelling to allow for ingress and egress through a window installed in a basement that is fully or partially below ground.(2)A county may not enact or enforce an ordinance, resolution, or policy that prohibits or has the effect of prohibiting an allowable feature within the rear setback of a residential building lot or parcel.(3)Subsection (2) does not apply to a historic district located within the unincorporated area of a county.

Section 212:
Section 212. Section 17-79-618, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-535 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-53517-79-618Effective 11/06/25. Operation of a tower crane.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Affected land" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-539.(b)"Airspace approval" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-539.(c)"Live load" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-539.(d)"Permit period" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-539.(e)"Tower crane" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-539.(2)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a county may not require airspace approval as a condition for the county's:(a)approval of a building permit; or(b)authorization of a development activity.(3)A county may require airspace approval relating to affected land as a condition for the county's approval of a building permit or for the county's authorization of a development activity if:(a)the tower crane will, during the permit period or development activity, carry a live load over the affected land; or(b)the affected land is within:(i)an airport overlay zone; or(ii)another zone designated to protect the airspace around an airport.

Section 213:
Section 213. Section 17-79-619, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-539 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-53917-79-619Effective 11/06/25. Digital asset mining -- Zoning restrictions.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Digital asset" means the same as that term is defined in Section 7-29-101.(b)"Digital asset mining" means using computer hardware and software specifically designed or utilized for validating data and securing a blockchain network.(c)"Digital asset mining business" means a group of computers working at a single site that:(i)consumes more than one megawatt of energy on an average annual basis; and(ii)operates for the purpose of generating blockchain tokens by securing a blockchain network.(2)A political subdivision of the statecounty may not enact an ordinance, resolution, or rule that:(a)for digital asset mining businesses located in unincorporated areas zoned for industrial use, imposes sound restrictions on digital asset mining businesses that are more stringent than the generally applicable limits set for industrial-zoned areas; or(b)prevents a digital asset mining business from operating in an unincorporated area zoned for industrial use if the digital asset mining business meets other requirements for industrial use.

Section 214:
Section 214. Section 17-79-620, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-540 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-54017-79-620Effective 11/06/25. High tunnels -- Exemption from county regulation.(1)As used in this section, "high tunnel" means a structure that:(a)is not a permanent structure;(b)is used for the growing, keeping, storing, sale, or shelter of an agricultural commodity; and(c)has a:(i)metal, wood, or plastic frame;(ii)plastic, woven textile, or other flexible covering; and(iii)floor made of soil, crushed stone, matting, pavers, or a floating concrete slab.(2)A county building code does not apply to a high tunnel.(3)No building permit shall be required for the construction of a high tunnel.

Section 215:
Section 215. Section 17-79-701, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-601 is renumbered and amended to read:7. Subdivisions17-27a-60117-79-701Effective 11/06/25. Enactment of subdivision ordinance.(1)The legislative body of a county may enact ordinances requiring that a subdivision plat comply with the provisions of the county's ordinances and this part before:(a)the subdivision plat may be filed and recorded in the county recorder's office; and(b)lots may be sold.(2)If the legislative body fails to enact a subdivision ordinance, the county may regulate subdivisions only as provided in this part.(3)The joining of a lot or lots to a parcel does not constitute a subdivision as to the parcel or subject the parcel to the county's subdivision ordinance.(4)A legislative body may adopt a land use regulation that specifies that combining lots does not require a subdivision plat amendment.

Section 216:
Section 216. Section 17-79-702, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-602 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-60217-79-702Effective 11/06/25. Planning commission preparation and recommendation of subdivision ordinance -- Adoption or rejection by legislative body.(1)A county planning commission established as required by Section 17-79-301 shall:(a)review and provide a recommendation to the legislative body on any proposed ordinance that regulates the subdivision of land in the county;(b)review and make a recommendation to the legislative body on any proposed ordinance that amends the regulation of the subdivision of the unincorporated land in the county or, in the case of a mountainous planning district, the mountainous planning district;(c)provide notice consistent with Section 17-27a-20517-79-205; and(d)hold a public hearing on the proposed ordinance before making the planning commission's final recommendation to the legislative body.(2)(a)A legislative body may adopt, modify, revise, or reject an ordinance described in Subsection (1) that the planning commission recommends.(b)A legislative body may consider a planning commission's failure to make a timely recommendation as a negative recommendation if the legislative body has provided for that consideration by ordinance.

Section 217:
Section 217. Section 17-79-703, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-603 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-60317-79-703Effective 11/06/25. Plat required when land is subdivided -- Approval of plat -- Owner acknowledgment, surveyor certification, and verification of plat -- Recording plat.(1)As used in this section:(a)(i)"Facility owner" means the same as that term is defined in Section 73-1-15.5.(ii)"Facility owner" includes a canal owner or associated canal operator contact described in:(A)Section 17-27a-21117-79-211;(B)Subsection 73-5-7(3); or(C)Subsection (6)(c).(b)"Local health department" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26A-1-102.(c)"State engineer's inventory of canals" means the state engineer's inventory of water conveyance systems established in Section 73-5-7.(d)"Underground facility" means the same as that term is defined in Section 54-8a-2.(e)"Water conveyance facility" means the same as that term is defined in Section 73-1-15.5.(2)Unless exempt under Section 17-27a-60517-79-708 or excluded from the definition of subdivision under Section 17-27a-10317-79-102, whenever any land is laid out and platted, the owner of the land shall provide to the county in which the land is located an accurate plat that describes or specifies:(a)a subdivision name that is distinct from any subdivision name on a plat recorded in the county recorder's office;(b)the boundaries, course, and dimensions of all of the parcels of ground divided, by their boundaries, course, and extent, whether the owner proposes that any parcel of ground is intended to be used as a street or for any other public use, and whether any such area is reserved or proposed for dedication for a public purpose;(c)the lot or unit reference, block or building reference, street or site address, street name or coordinate address, acreage or square footage for all parcels, units, or lots, and length and width of the blocks and lots intended for sale;(d)every existing right-of-way and recorded easement located within the plat for:(i)an underground facility;(ii)a water conveyance facility; or(iii)any other utility facility; and(e)any water conveyance facility located, entirely or partially, within the plat that:(i)is not recorded; and(ii)of which the owner of the land has actual or constructive knowledge, including from information made available to the owner of the land:(A)in the state engineer's inventory of canals; or(B)from a surveyor under Subsection (6)(c).(3)(a)Subject to Subsections (4), (6), and (7), if the plat conforms to the county's ordinances and this part and has been approved by the culinary water authority, the sanitary sewer authority, and the local health department, if the local health department and the county consider the local health department's approval necessary, the county shall approve the plat.(b)Counties are encouraged to receive a recommendation from the fire authority and the public safety answering point before approving a plat.(c)A county may not require that a plat be approved or signed by a person or entity who:(i)is not an employee or agent of the county; or(ii)does not:(A)have a legal or equitable interest in the property within the proposed subdivision;(B)provide a utility or other service directly to a lot within the subdivision;(C)own an easement or right-of-way adjacent to the proposed subdivision who signs for the purpose of confirming the accuracy of the location of the easement or right-of-way in relation to the plat; or(D)provide culinary public water service whose source protection zone designated as provided in Section 19-4-113 is included, in whole or in part, within the proposed subdivision.(d)A county shall:(i)within 20 days after the day on which an owner of land submits to the county a complete subdivision plat land use application, mail written notice of the proposed subdivision to the facility owner of any water conveyance facility located, entirely or partially, within 100 feet of the subdivision plat, as determined using information made available to the county:(A)from the facility owner under Section 10-9a-21117-79-211, using mapping-grade global positioning satellite units or digitized data from the most recent aerial photo available to the facility owner;(B)in the state engineer's inventory of canals; or(C)from a surveyor under Subsection (6)(c); and(ii)not approve the subdivision plat for at least 20 days after the day on which the county mails to each facility owner the notice under Subsection (3)(d)(i) in order to receive any comments from each facility owner regarding:(A)access to the water conveyance facility;(B)maintenance of the water conveyance facility;(C)protection of the water conveyance facility integrity;(D)safety of the water conveyance facility; or(E)any other issue related to water conveyance facility operations.(e)When applicable, the owner of the land seeking subdivision plat approval shall comply with Section 73-1-15.5.(f)A facility owner's failure to provide comments to a county in accordance with Subsection (3)(d)(ii) does not affect or impair the county's authority to approve the subdivision plat.(4)The county may withhold an otherwise valid plat approval until the owner of the land provides the legislative body with a tax clearance indicating that all taxes, interest, and penalties owing on the land have been paid.(5)(a)Within 30 days after approving a final plat under this section, a county shall submit to the Utah Geospatial Resource Center, created in Section 63A-16-505, for inclusion in the unified statewide 911 emergency service database described in Subsection 63H-7a-304(4)(b):(i)an electronic copy of the approved final plat; or(ii)preliminary geospatial data that depict any new streets and situs addresses proposed for construction within the bounds of the approved plat.(b)If requested by the Utah Geospatial Resource Center, a county that approves a final plat under this section shall:(i)coordinate with the Utah Geospatial Resource Center to validate the information described in Subsection (5)(a); and(ii)assist the Utah Geospatial Resource Center in creating electronic files that contain the information described in Subsection (5)(a) for inclusion in the unified statewide 911 emergency service database.(6)(a)A county recorder may not record a plat unless, subject to Subsection 17-27a-604(1)17-79-704(1):(i)prior tobefore recordation, the county has approved and signed the plat;(ii)each owner of record of land described on the plat has signed the owner's dedication as shown on the plat; and(iii)the signature of each owner described in Subsection (6)(a)(ii) is acknowledged as provided by law.(b)A surveyor who prepares the plat shall certify that the surveyor:(i)holds a license in accordance with Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act;(ii)(A)has completed a survey of the property described on the plat in accordance with Section 17-23-1717-73-504 and has verified all measurements; or(B)has referenced a record of survey map of the existing property boundaries shown on the plat and verified the locations of the boundaries; and(iii)has placed monuments as represented on the plat.(c)(i)To the extent possible, the surveyor shall consult with the owner or operator, or a representative designated by the owner or operator, of an existing water conveyance facility located within the proposed subdivision, or an existing or proposed underground facility or utility facility located within the proposed subdivision, to verify the accuracy of the surveyor's depiction of the:(A)boundary, course, dimensions, and intended use of the public rights-of-way, a public or private easement, or grants of record;(B)location of the existing water conveyance facility, or the existing or proposed underground facility or utility facility; and(C)physical restrictions governing the location of the existing or proposed underground facility or utility facility.(ii)The cooperation of an owner or operator of a water conveyance facility, underground facility, or utility facility under Subsection (6)(c)(i):(A)indicates only that the plat approximates the location of the existing facilities but does not warrant or verify their precise location; and(B)does not affect a right that the owner or operator has under Title 54, Chapter 8a, Damage to Underground Utility Facilities, a recorded easement or right-of-way, the law applicable to prescriptive rights, or any other provision of law.(7)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (6)(c), after the plat has been acknowledged, certified, and approved, the owner of the land seeking to record the plat shall, within the time period and manner designated by ordinance, record the plat in the county recorder's office in the county in which the lands platted and laid out are situated.(b)A failure to record a plat within the time period designated by ordinance renders the plat voidable by the county.(8)A county acting as a land use authority shall approve a condominium plat that complies with the requirements of Section 57-8-13 unless the condominium plat violates a land use regulation of the county.

Section 218:
Section 218. Section 17-79-704, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-604 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-60417-79-704Effective 11/06/25. Subdivision plat approval procedure -- Effect of not complying.(1)A person may not submit a subdivision plat to the county recorder's office for recording unless:(a)the person has complied with the requirements of Subsection 17-27a-603(6)(a)17-79-703(6)(a);(b)the plat has been approved by:(i)the land use authority of the:(A)county in whose unincorporated area the land described in the plat is located; or(B)mountainous planning district in whose area the land described in the plat is located; and(ii)other officers that the county designates in its ordinance;(c)all approvals described in Subsection (1)(b) are entered in writing on the plat by designated officers; and(d)if the person submitting the plat intends the plat to be or if the plat is part of a community association subject to Title 57, Chapter 8a, Community Association Act, the plat includes language conveying to the association, as that term is defined in Section 57-8a-102, all common areas, as that term is defined in Section 57-8a-102.(2)An owner of a platted lot is the owner of record sufficient to re-subdivide the lot if the owner's platted lot is not part of a community association subject to Title 57, Chapter 8a, Community Association Act.(3)A plat recorded without the signatures required under this section is void.(4)A transfer of land pursuant to a void plat is voidable by the land use authority.

Section 219:
Section 219. Section 17-79-705, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-604.1 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-604.117-79-705Effective 11/06/25. Process for subdivision review and approval.(1)(a)As used in this section, an "administrative land use authority" means an individual, board, or commission, appointed or employed by a county, including county staff or a county planning commission.(b)"Administrative land use authority" does not include a county legislative body or a member of a county legislative body.(2)(a)This section applies to land use decisions arising from subdivision applications for single-family dwellings, two-family dwellings, or townhomes.(b)This section does not apply to land use regulations adopted, approved, or agreed upon by a legislative body exercising land use authority in the review of land use applications for zoning or other land use regulation approvals.(3)A county ordinance governing the subdivision of land shall:(a)comply with this section and establish a standard method and form of application for preliminary subdivision applications and final subdivision applications; and(b)(i)designate a single administrative land use authority for the review of preliminary applications to subdivide land; or(ii)if the county has adopted an ordinance that establishes a separate procedure for the review and approval of subdivisions under Section 17-27a-60517-79-708, the county may designate a different and separate administrative land use authority for the approval of subdivisions under Section 17-27a-60517-79-708.(4)(a)If an applicant requests a pre-application meeting, the county shall, within 15 business days after the request, schedule the meeting to review the concept plan and give initial feedback.(b)At the pre-application meeting, the county staff shall provide or have available on the county website the following:(i)copies of applicable land use regulations;(ii)a complete list of standards required for the project;(iii)preliminary and final application checklists; and(iv)feedback on the concept plan.(5)A preliminary subdivision application shall comply with all applicable county ordinances and requirements of this section.(6)An administrative land use authority may complete a preliminary subdivision application review in a public meeting or at a county staff level.(7)With respect to a preliminary application to subdivide land, an administrative land use authority may:(a)receive public comment; and(b)hold no more than one public hearing.(8)If a preliminary subdivision application complies with the applicable county ordinances and the requirements of this section, the administrative land use authority shall approve the preliminary subdivision application.(9)A county shall review and approve or deny a final subdivision plat application in accordance with the provisions of this section and county ordinances, which:(a)may permit concurrent processing of the final subdivision plat application with the preliminary subdivision plat application; and(b)may not require planning commission or county legislative body approval.(10)If a final subdivision application complies with the requirements of this section, the applicable county ordinances, and the preliminary subdivision approval granted under Subsection (9)(a), a county shall approve the final subdivision application.

Section 220:
Section 220. Section 17-79-706, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-604.2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-604.217-79-706Effective 11/06/25. Review of subdivision  applications and subdivision improvement plans.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Review cycle" means the occurrence of:(i)the applicant's submittal of a complete subdivision application;(ii)the county's review of that subdivision application;(iii)the county's response to that subdivision application, in accordance with this section; and(iv)the applicant's reply to the county's response that addresses each of the county's required modifications or requests for additional information.(b)"Subdivision application" means a land use application for the subdivision of land located within the unincorporated area of a county.(c)"Subdivision improvement plans" means the civil engineering plans associated with required infrastructure improvements and county-controlled utilities required for a subdivision.(d)"Subdivision ordinance review" means review by a county to verify that a subdivision application meets the criteria of the county's ordinances.(e)"Subdivision plan review" means a review of the applicant's subdivision improvement plans and other aspects of the subdivision application to verify that the application complies with county ordinances and applicable installation standards and inspection specifications for infrastructure improvements.(2)The review cycle restrictions and requirements of this section do not apply to the review of subdivision applications affecting property within identified geological hazard areas.(3)(a)A county may require a subdivision improvement plan to be submitted with a subdivision application.(b)A county may not require a subdivision improvement plan to be submitted with both a preliminary subdivision application and a final subdivision application.(4)(a)The review cycle requirements of this section apply:(i)to the review of a preliminary subdivision application, if the county requires a subdivision improvement plan to be submitted with a preliminary subdivision application; or(ii)to the review of a final subdivision application, if the county requires a subdivision improvement plan to be submitted with a final subdivision application.(b)A county may not, outside the review cycle, engage in a substantive review of required infrastructure improvements or a county controlled utility.(5)(a)A county shall complete the initial review of a complete subdivision application submitted for ordinance review for a residential subdivision for single-family dwellings, two-family dwellings, or town homes:(i)no later than 15 business days after the complete subdivision application is submitted, if the county has a population over 5,000; or(ii)no later than 30 business days after the complete subdivision application is submitted, if the county has a population of 5,000 or less.(b)A county shall maintain and publish a list of the items comprising the complete subdivision application, including:(i)the application;(ii)the owner's affidavit;(iii)an electronic copy of all plans in PDF format;(iv)the preliminary subdivision plat drawings; and(v)a breakdown of fees due upon approval of the application.(6)A county shall publish a list of the items that comprise a complete subdivision land use application.(7)A county shall complete a subdivision plan review of a subdivision improvement plan that is submitted with a complete subdivision application for a residential subdivision for single-family dwellings, two-family dwellings, or town homes:(a)within 20 business days after the complete subdivision application is submitted, if the county has a population over 5,000; or(b)within 40 business days after the complete subdivision application is submitted, if the county has a population of 5,000 or less.(8)(a)In reviewing a subdivision application, a county may require:(i)additional information relating to an applicant's plans to ensure compliance with county ordinances and approved standards and specifications for construction of public improvements; and(ii)modifications to plans that do not meet current ordinances, applicable standards, or specifications or do not contain complete information.(b)A county's request for additional information or modifications to plans under Subsection (8)(a)(i) or (ii) shall be specific and include citations to ordinances, standards, or specifications that require the modifications to subdivision improvement plans, and shall be logged in an index of requested modifications or additions.(c)A county may not require more than four review cycles for a subdivision improvement plan review.(d)(i)Subject to Subsection (8)(d)(ii), unless the change or correction is necessitated by the applicant's adjustment to a subdivision improvement plan or an update to a phasing plan that adjusts the infrastructure needed for the specific development, a change or correction not addressed or referenced in a county's subdivision improvement plan review is waived.(ii)A modification or correction necessary to protect public health and safety or to enforce state or federal law may not be waived.(iii)If an applicant makes a material change to a subdivision improvement plan, the county has the discretion to restart the review process at the first review of the subdivision improvement plan review, but only with respect to the portion of the subdivision improvement plan that the material change substantively affects.(e)(i)This Subsection (8) applies if an applicant does not submit a revised subdivision improvement plan within:(A)20 business days after the county requires a modification or correction, if the county has a population over 5,000; or(B)40 business days after the county requires a modification or correction, if the county has a population of 5,000 or less.(ii)If an applicant does not submit a revised subdivision improvement plan within the time specified in Subsection (8)(e)(i), a county has an additional 20 business days after the time specified in Subsection (7) to respond to a revised subdivision improvement plan.(9)After the applicant has responded to the final review cycle, and the applicant has complied with each modification requested in the county's previous review cycle, the county may not require additional revisions if the applicant has not materially changed the plan, other than changes that were in response to requested modifications or corrections.(10)(a)In addition to revised plans, an applicant shall provide a written explanation in response to the county's review comments, identifying and explaining the applicant's revisions and reasons for declining to make revisions, if any.(b)The applicant's written explanation shall be comprehensive and specific, including citations to applicable standards and ordinances for the design and an index of requested revisions or additions for each required correction.(c)If an applicant fails to address a review comment in the response, the review cycle is not complete and the subsequent review cycle may not begin until all comments are addressed.(11)(a)If, on the fourth or final review, a county fails to respond within 20 business days, the county shall, upon request of the property owner, and within 10 business days after the day on which the request is received:(i)for a dispute arising from the subdivision improvement plans, assemble an appeal panel in accordance with Subsection 17-27a-507(5)(d)17-79-812(5)(d) to review and approve or deny the final revised set of plans; or(ii)for a dispute arising from the subdivision ordinance review, advise the applicant, in writing, of the deficiency in the application and of the right to appeal the determination to a designated appeal authority.

Section 221:
Section 221. Section 17-79-707, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-604.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-604.517-79-707Effective 11/06/25. Subdivision plat recording or development activity before required infrastructure is completed -- Improvement completion assurance -- Improvement warranty.(1)As used in this section: (a)"Private landscaping plan" means a proposal:(i)to install landscaping on a lot owned by a private individual or entity; and(ii)submitted to a county by the private individual or entity, or on behalf of a private individual or entity, that owns the lot.(b)"Public landscaping improvement" means landscaping that an applicant is required to install to comply with published installation and inspection specifications for public improvements that:(i)will be dedicated to and maintained by the county; or(ii)are associated with and proximate to trail improvements that connect to planned or existing public infrastructure.(2)A land use authority shall establish objective inspection standards for acceptance of a required public landscaping improvement or infrastructure improvement.(3)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(d) or (3)(e), before an applicant conducts any development activity or records a plat, the applicant shall:(i)complete any required public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements; or(ii)post an improvement completion assurance for any required public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements.(b)If an applicant elects to post an improvement completion assurance, the applicant shall in accordance with Subsection (5) provide completion assurance for:(i)completion of 100% of the required public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements; or(ii)if the county has inspected and accepted a portion of the public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements, 100% of the incomplete or unaccepted public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements.(c)A county shall:(i)establish a minimum of two acceptable forms of completion assurance;(ii)(A)if an applicant elects to post an improvement completion assurance, allow the applicant to post an assurance that meets the conditions of this chapter and any local ordinances; and(B)if a county accepts cash deposits as a form of completion assurance and an applicant elects to post a cash deposit as a form of completion assurance, place the cash deposit in an interest-bearing account upon receipt and return any earned interest to the applicant with the return of the completion assurance according to the conditions of this chapter and any local ordinances;(iii)establish a system for the partial release of an improvement completion assurance as portions of required public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements are completed and accepted in accordance with local ordinance; and(iv)issue or deny a building permit in accordance with Section 17-27a-80217-79-901 based on the installation of public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements.(d)A county may not require an applicant to post an improvement completion assurance for:(i)public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements that the county has previously inspected and accepted;(ii)infrastructure improvements that are private and not essential or required to meet the building code, fire code, flood or storm water management provisions, street and access requirements, or other essential necessary public safety improvements adopted in a land use regulation;(iii)in a county where ordinances require all infrastructure improvements within the area to be private, infrastructure improvements within a development that the county requires to be private;(iv)landscaping improvements that are not public landscaping improvements, unless the landscaping improvements and completion assurance are required under the terms of a development agreement;(v)a private landscaping plan;(vi)landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements that an applicant elects to install at the applicant's own risk:(A)before the plat is recorded;(B)pursuant to inspections required by the county for the infrastructure improvement; and(C)pursuant to final civil engineering plan approval by the county; or(vii)any individual public landscaping improvement or individual infrastructure improvement when the individual public landscaping improvement or individual infrastructure improvement is also included as part of a separate improvement completion assurance.(e)(i)A county may not:(A)prohibit an applicant from installing a public landscaping improvement or an infrastructure improvement when the municipality has approved final civil engineering plans for the development activity or plat for which the public landscaping improvement or infrastructure improvement is required; or(B)require an applicant to sign an agreement, release, or other document inconsistent with this chapter as a condition of posting an improvement completion assurance, security for an improvement warranty, or receiving a building permit.(ii)Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(e)(i)(A), public infrastructure improvements and infrastructure improvements that are installed by an applicant are subject to inspection by the county in accordance with the county's adopted inspection standards.(f)(i)Each improvement completion assurance and improvement warranty posted by an applicant with a county shall be independent of any other improvement completion assurance or improvement warranty posted by the same applicant with the county.(ii)Subject to Section 10-9a-509.517-79-805, if an applicant has posted a form of security with a county for more than one infrastructure improvement or public landscaping improvement, the county may not withhold acceptance of an applicant's required subdivision improvements, public landscaping improvement, infrastructure improvements, or the performance of warranty work for the same applicant's failure to complete a separate subdivision improvement, public landscaping improvement, infrastructure improvement, or warranty work under a separate improvement completion assurance or improvement warranty.(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), as a condition for increased density or other entitlement benefit not currently available under the existing zone, a county may require a completion assurance bond for landscaped amenities and common area that are dedicated to and maintained by a homeowners association.(b)Any agreement regarding a completion assurance bond under Subsection (4)(a) between the applicant and the county shall be memorialized in a development agreement.(c)A county may not require a completion assurance bond for or dictate who installs or is responsible for the cost of the landscaping of residential lots or the equivalent open space surrounding single-family attached homes, whether platted as lots or common area.(5)The sum of the improvement completion assurance required under Subsections (3) and (4) may not exceed the sum of:(a)100% of the estimated cost of the public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements, as evidenced by an engineer's estimate or licensed contractor's bid; and(b)10% of the amount of the bond to cover administrative costs incurred by the county to complete the improvements, if necessary.(6)(a)Upon an applicant's written request that the land use authority accept or reject the applicant's installation of required subdivision improvements or performance of warranty work as set forth in Section 17-27a-509.517-79-805, and for the duration of each improvement warranty period, the land use authority may require the applicant to:(i)execute an improvement warranty for the improvement warranty period; and(ii)post a cash deposit, surety bond, letter of credit, or other similar security, as required by the county, in the amount of up to 10% of the lesser of the:(A)county engineer's original estimated cost of completion; or(B)applicant's reasonable proven cost of completion.(b)A county may not require the payment of the deposit of the improvement warranty assurance described in Subsection (6)(a) for an infrastructure improvement or public landscaping improvement before the applicant indicates through written request that the applicant has completed the infrastructure improvement or public landscaping improvement.(7)When a county accepts an improvement completion assurance for public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements for a development in accordance with Subsection (3)(c)(ii)(A), the county may not deny an applicant a building permit if the development meets the requirements for the issuance of a building permit under the building code and fire code.(8)A county may not require the submission of a private landscaping plan as part of an application for a building permit.(9)The provisions of this section do not supersede the terms of a valid development agreement, an adopted phasing plan, or the state construction code.

Section 222:
Section 222. Section 17-79-708, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-605 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-60517-79-708Effective 11/06/25. Exemptions from plat requirement.(1)Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a plat is not required if:(a)a county establishes a process to approve an administrative land use decision for the subdivision of unincorporated land or mountainous planning district land into 10 or fewer parcels without a plat; and(b)the county provides in writing that:(i)the county has provided a certificate or written approval as required by ordinance; and(ii)the proposed subdivision:(A)is not traversed by the mapped lines of a proposed street as shown in the general plan unless the county has approved the location and dedication of any public street, county utility easement, any other easement, or any other land for public purposes as the county's ordinance requires;(B)has been approved by the culinary water authority and the sanitary sewer authority;(C)is located in a zoned area; and(D)conforms to all applicable land use ordinances or has properly received a variance from the requirements of an otherwise conflicting and applicable land use ordinance.(2)(a)Subject to Subsection (1), a parcel resulting from a division of agricultural land is exempt from the plat requirements of Section 17-27a-60317-79-703 if:(i)the  parcel:(A)qualifies as land in agricultural use under Section 59-2-502; and(B)is not used and will not be used for any nonagricultural purpose; and(ii)the new owner of record completes, signs, and records with the county recorder a notice:(A)describing the parcel by legal description; and(B)stating that the parcel is created for agricultural purposes as defined in Section 59-2-502 and will remain so until a future zoning change permits other uses.(b)If a parcel exempted under Subsection (2)(a) is used for a nonagricultural purpose, the county shall require the parcel to comply with the requirements of Section 17-27a-60317-79-703 and all applicable land use ordinance requirements.(3)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4), a document recorded in the county recorder's office that divides property by a metes and bounds description does not create an approved subdivision allowed by this part unless the land use authority's certificate of written approval required by Subsection (1) is attached to the document.(b)The absence of the certificate or written approval required by Subsection (1) does not:(i)prohibit the county recorder from recording a document; or(ii)affect the validity of a recorded document.(c)A document which does not meet the requirements of Subsection (1) may be corrected by the recording of an affidavit to which the required certificate or written approval is attached and that complies with Section 57-3-106.(4)(a)As used in this Subsection (4):(i)"Divided land" means land that has been divided by a minor subdivision.(ii)"Land to be divided" means land that is proposed to be divided by a minor subdivision.(iii)"Minor subdivision" means a division of at least 50 contiguous acres of agricultural land in a county of the third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class to create one new parcel that, after the division, is separate from the remainder of the original 50 or more contiguous acres of agricultural land.(iv)"Minor subdivision parcel" means a parcel created by a minor subdivision.(b)Notwithstanding Sections 17-27a-60317-79-703 and 17-27a-60417-79-704, an owner of at least 50 contiguous acres of agricultural land may make a minor subdivision by submitting for recording in the office of the recorder of the county in which the land to be divided is located:(i)a recordable deed containing the legal description of the minor subdivision parcel; and(ii)a notice:(A)indicating that the owner of the land to be divided is making a minor subdivision;(B)referring specifically to this section as the authority for making the minor subdivision; and(C)containing the legal description of:(I)the land to be divided; and(II)the proposed minor subdivision parcel.(c)A minor subdivision parcel:(i)may not be less than one acre in size; (ii)may not be within 500 feet of another minor subdivision parcel within the divided land; (iii)is not subject to the subdivision ordinance of the county in which the minor subdivision parcel is located; and(iv)is not required to be owned by the same person that owns the divided land.(d)A minor subdivision is effective the day on which it is recorded.(e)A county:(i)may not deny a building permit to an owner of a minor subdivision parcel based on:(A)the parcel's status as a minor subdivision parcel; or(B)the absence of standards described in Subsection (4)(e)(ii); and(ii)may, in connection with the issuance of a building permit, subject a minor subdivision parcel to reasonable health, safety, and access standards that the county has established and made public.(5)(a)Notwithstanding Sections 17-27a-60317-79-703 and 17-27a-60417-79-704, and subject to Subsection (1), the legislative body of a county may enact an ordinance allowing the subdivision of a parcel, without complying with the plat requirements of Section 17-27a-60317-79-703, if:(i)the parcel contains an existing legal single family dwelling unit;(ii)the subdivision results in two parcels, one of which is agricultural land;(iii)the parcel of agricultural land:(A)qualifies as land in agricultural use under Section 59-2-502; and(B)is not used, and will not be used, for a nonagricultural purpose;(iv)both the parcel with an existing legal single family dwelling unit and the parcel of agricultural land meet the minimum area, width, frontage, and setback requirements of the applicable zoning designation in the applicable land use ordinance; and(v)the owner of record completes, signs, and records with the county recorder a notice:(A)describing the parcel of agricultural land by legal description; and(B)stating that the parcel of agricultural land is created as land in agricultural use, as defined in Section 59-2-502, and will remain as land in agricultural use until a future zoning change permits another use.(b)If a parcel of agricultural land divided from another parcel under Subsection (5)(a) is later used for a nonagricultural purpose, the exemption provided in Subsection (5)(a) no longer applies, and the county shall require the owner of the parcel to:(i)retroactively comply with the subdivision plat requirements of Section 17-27a-60317-79-703; and(ii)comply with all applicable land use ordinance requirements.(6)(a)The boundaries of any subdivision exempted from the plat requirement under this section shall be graphically illustrated on a record of survey map that includes:(i)a legal description of the parcel to be divided;(ii)a legal description of each parcel created by the subdivision; and(iii)a citation to the specific provision of this section for which an exemption to the plat requirement is authorized.(b)The record of survey map described in Subsection (6)(a) shall be filed with the county surveyor in accordance with Section 17-23-1717-73-504.

Section 223:
Section 223. Section 17-79-709, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-606 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-60617-79-709Effective 11/06/25. Common area parcels on a plat -- No separate ownership -- Ownership interest equally divided among other parcels on plat and included in description of other parcels.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Association" means the same as that term is defined in:(i)regarding a common area, Section 57-8a-102; and(ii)regarding a common area and facility, Section 57-8-3.(b)"Common area" means the same as that term is defined in Section 57-8a-102.(c)"Common area and facility" means the same as that term is defined in Section 57-8-3.(d)"Declarant" means the same as that term is defined in:(i)regarding a common area, Section 57-8a-102; and(ii)regarding a common area and facility, Section 57-8-3.(e)"Declaration," regarding a common area and facility, means the same as that term is defined in Section 57-8-3.(f)"Period of administrative control" means the same as that term is defined in:(i)regarding a common area, Section 57-8a-102; and(ii)regarding a common area and facility, Section 57-8-3.(2)A person may not separately own, convey, or modify a parcel designated as a common area or common area and facility on a plat recorded in compliance with this part, independent of the other lots, units, or parcels created by the plat unless:(a)an association holds in trust the parcel designated as a common area for the owners of the other lots, units, or parcels created by the plat; or(b)the conveyance or modification is approved under Subsection (5).(3)If a conveyance or modification of a common area or common area and facility is approved in accordance with Subsection (5), the person who presents the instrument of conveyance to a county recorder shall:(a)attach a notice of the approval described in Subsection (5) as an exhibit to the document of conveyance; or(b)record a notice of the approval described in Subsection (5) concurrently with the conveyance as a separate document.(4)When a plat contains a common area or common area and facility:(a)each parcel that the plat creates has an equal ownership interest in the common area or common area and facility within the plat, unless the plat or an accompanying recorded document indicates a different division of interest for assessment purposes; and(b)each instrument describing a parcel on the plat by the parcel's identifying plat number implicitly includes the ownership interest in the common area or common area and facility within the plat, even if that ownership interest is not explicitly stated in the instrument.(5)Notwithstanding Subsection (2), a person may modify the size or location of or separately convey a common area or common area and facility if the following approve the conveyance or modification:(a)the local government;(b)(i)for a common area that an association owns, 67% of the voting interests in the association; or(ii)for a common area that an association does not own, or for a common area and facility, 67% of the owners of lots, units, and parcels designated on a plat that is subject to a declaration and on which the common area or common area and facility is included; and(c)during the period of administrative control, the declarant.

Section 224:
Section 224. Section 17-79-710, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-607 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-60717-79-710Effective 11/06/25. Dedication by plat of public streets and other public places.(1)A plat that is signed, dedicated, and acknowledged by each owner of record, and approved according to the procedures specified in this part, operates, when recorded, as a dedication of all public streets and other public places, and vests the fee of those parcels of land in the county for the public for the uses named or intended in the plat.(2)The dedication established by this section does not impose liability upon the county for public streets and other public places that are dedicated in this manner but are unimproved unless:(a)adequate financial assurance has been provided in accordance with this chapter; and(b)the county has accepted the dedication.

Section 225:
Section 225. Section 17-79-711, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-608 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-60817-79-711Effective 11/06/25. Subdivision amendments.(1)(a)A fee owner of a lot, as shown on the last county assessment roll, in a plat that has been laid out and platted as provided in this part may file a petition with the land use authority to request a subdivision amendment.(b)Upon filing a petition to request a subdivision amendment under Subsection (1)(a), the owner shall prepare and, if approved by the land use authority, record a plat in accordance with Section 17-27a-60317-79-703 that:(i)depicts only the portion of the subdivision that is proposed to be amended;(ii)includes a plat name distinguishing the amended plat from the original plat;(iii)describes the differences between the amended plat and the original plat; and(iv)includes references to the original plat.(c)(i)The land use authority shall provide notice of a petition filed under Subsection (1)(a) by mail or email to: (A)each affected entity that provides a service to a property owner of record of the portion of the plat that is being amended; and(B)each property owner of record within the portion of the subdivision that is proposed to be amended.(ii)The notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(i)(B) shall include a deadline by which written objections to the petition are due to the land use authority, but no earlier than 10 calendar days after the day on which the land use authority sends the notice.(d)The land use authority shall hold a public hearing within 45 days after the day on which a petition is filed under Subsection (1)(a) if:(i)any property owner within the subdivision that is proposed to be amended notifies the county of the owner's objection in writing by the deadline for objections, as described in Subsection (1)(c)(ii); or(ii)a county ordinance requires a public hearing if all of the owners within the portion of the subdivision proposed to be amended have not signed the proposed amended plat.(e)A land use authority may approve a petition for subdivision amendment no earlier than:(i)the day after the day on which written objections were due to the land authority, as described in Subsection (1)(c)(ii); or(ii)if a public hearing is required as described in Subsection (1)(d), the day on which the public hearing takes place.(f)A land use authority may not approve a petition for a subdivision amendment under this section unless the amendment identifies and preserves any easements owned by a culinary water authority and sanitary sewer authority for existing facilities located within the subdivision.(2)The public hearing requirement of Subsection (1)(d) does not apply and a land use authority may consider at a public meeting an owner's petition for a subdivision amendment if:(a)the petition seeks to:(i)join two or more of the petitioning fee owner's contiguous lots;(ii)subdivide one or more of the petitioning fee owner's lots, if the subdivision will not result in a violation of a land use ordinance or a development condition;(iii)on a lot owned by the petitioning fee owner, adjust an internal lot restriction imposed by the local political subdivision; or(iv)alter the plat in a manner that does not change existing boundaries or other attributes of lots within the subdivision that are not:(A)owned by the petitioner; or(B)designated as a common area; and(b)notice has been given to adjoining property owners in accordance with any applicable local ordinance.(3)A petition under Subsection (1)(a) that contains a request to amend a public street or county utility easement is also subject to Section 17-27a-609.517-79-713.(4)A petition under Subsection (1)(a) that contains a request to amend an entire plat or a portion of a plat shall include:(a)the name and address of each owner of record of the land contained in:(i)the entire plat; or(ii)that portion of the plan described in the petition; and(b)the signature of each owner who consents to the petition.(5)A surveyor preparing an amended plat under this section shall certify that the surveyor:(a)holds a license in accordance with Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act;(b)(i)has completed a survey of the property described on the plat in accordance with Section 17-23-1717-73-504 and has verified all measurements;(ii)has referenced a record of survey map of the existing property boundaries shown on the plat and verified the locations of the boundaries; or(iii)has referenced the original plat that created the lot boundaries being amended; and(c)has placed monuments as represented on the plat.

Section 226:
Section 226. Section 17-79-712, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-609 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-60917-79-712Effective 11/06/25. Land use authority approval of vacation or amendment of plat -- Recording the amended plat.(1)The land use authority may approve the vacation or amendment of a plat by signing an amended plat showing the vacation or amendment if the land use authority finds that:(a)there is good cause for the vacation or amendment; and(b)no public street or county utility easement has been vacated or amended.(2)(a)The land use authority shall ensure that the amended plat showing the vacation or amendment is recorded in the office of the county recorder in which the land is located.(b)If the amended plat is approved and recorded in accordance with this section, the recorded plat shall vacate, supersede, and replace any contrary provision in a previously recorded plat of the same land.(3)(a)A legislative body may vacate a subdivision or a portion of a subdivision by recording in the county recorder's office an ordinance describing the subdivision or the portion being vacated.(b)The recorded vacating ordinance shall replace a previously recorded plat described in the vacating ordinance.(4)An amended plat may not be submitted to the county recorder for recording unless it is:(a)signed by the land use authority; and(b)signed, acknowledged, and dedicated by each owner of record of the portion of the plat that is amended.(5)A management committee may sign and dedicate an amended plat as provided in Title 57, Chapter 8, Condominium Ownership Act.(6)A plat may be corrected as provided in Section 57-3-106.

Section 227:
Section 227. Section 17-79-713, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-609.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-609.517-79-713Effective 11/06/25. Petition to vacate a public street.(1)In lieu of vacating some or all of a public street through a plat or amended plat in accordance with Sections 17-27a-60317-79-703 through 17-27a-60917-79-712, a legislative body may approve a petition to vacate a public street in accordance with this section.(2)A petition to vacate some or all of a public street or county utility easement shall include:(a)the name and address of each owner of record of land that is:(i)adjacent to the public street or county utility easement between the two nearest public street intersections; or(ii)accessed exclusively by or within 300 feet of the public street or county utility easement;(b)proof of written notice to operators of utilities and culinary water or sanitary sewer facilities located within the bounds of the public street or county utility easement sought to be vacated; and (c)the signature of each owner under Subsection (2)(a) who consents to the vacation.(3)If a petition is submitted containing a request to vacate some or all of a public street or county utility easement, the legislative body shall hold a public hearing in accordance with Section 17-27a-20817-79-208 and determine whether:(a)good cause exists for the vacation; and(b)the public interest or any person will be materially injured by the proposed vacation.(4)The legislative body may adopt an ordinance granting a petition to vacate some or all of a public street or county utility easement if the legislative body finds that:(a)good cause exists for the vacation; and(b)neither the public interest nor any person will be materially injured by the vacation.(5)If the legislative body adopts an ordinance vacating some or all of a public street or county utility easement, the legislative body shall ensure that one or both of the following is recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the land is located:(a)a plat reflecting the vacation; or(b)(i)an ordinance described in Subsection (4); and(ii)a legal description of the public street to be vacated.(6)The action of the legislative body vacating some or all of a public street or county utility easement that has been dedicated to public use:(a)operates to the extent to which it is vacated, upon the effective date of the recorded plat or ordinance, as a revocation of the acceptance of and the relinquishment of the county's fee in the vacated street, right-of-way, or easement; and(b)may not be construed to impair:(i)any right-of-way or easement of any parcel or lot owner;(ii)the rights of any public utility; or(iii)the rights of a culinary water authority or sanitary sewer authority.(7)(a)A county may submit a petition, in accordance with Subsection (2), and initiate and complete a process to vacate some or all of a public street.(b)If a county submits a petition and initiates a process under Subsection (7)(a):(i)the legislative body shall hold a public hearing;(ii)the petition and process may not apply to or affect a public utility easement, except to the extent:(A)the easement is not a protected utility easement as defined in Section 54-3-27;(B)the easement is included within the public street; and(C)the notice to vacate the public street also contains a notice to vacate the easement; and(iii)a recorded ordinance to vacate a public street has the same legal effect as vacating a public street through a recorded plat or amended plat.(8)A legislative body may not approve a petition to vacate a public street under this section unless the vacation identifies and preserves any easements owned by a culinary water authority and sanitary sewer authority for existing facilities located within the public street.

Section 228:
Section 228. Section 17-79-714, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-610 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-61017-79-714Effective 11/06/25. Restrictions for solar and other energy devices.The land use authority may refuse to approve or renew any plat, subdivision plan, or dedication of any street or other ground, if deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with the land for the lots or parcels covered by the plat or subdivision prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting reasonably sited and designed solar collectors, clotheslines, or other energy devices based on renewable resources from being installed on buildings erected on lots or parcels covered by the plat or subdivision.

Section 229:
Section 229. Section 17-79-715, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-611 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-61117-79-715Effective 11/06/25. Prohibited acts.(1)(a)If a subdivision requires a plat, an owner of any land located in a subdivision who transfers or sells any land in that subdivision before a plat of the subdivision has been approved and recorded violates this part for each lot or parcel transferred or sold.(b)The description by metes and bounds in an instrument of transfer or other documents used in the process of selling or transferring does not exempt the transaction from being a violation of Subsection (1)(a) or from the penalties or remedies provided in this chapter.(c)Notwithstanding any other provision of this Subsection (1), the recording of an instrument of transfer or other document used in the process of selling or transferring real property that violates this part:(i)does not affect the validity of the instrument or other document; and(ii)does not affect whether the property that is the subject of the instrument or other document complies with applicable county ordinances on land use and development.(2)(a)A county may bring an action against an owner to require the property to conform to the provisions of this part or an ordinance enacted under the authority of this part.(b)An action under this Subsection (2) may include an injunction or any other appropriate action or proceeding to prevent or enjoin the violation.(c)A county need only establish the violation to obtain the injunction.

Section 230:
Section 230. Section 17-79-716, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1004 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-100417-79-716Effective 11/06/25. Notice.(1)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of a vested critical infrastructure materials operations created under Chapter 81, Part 7, Vested Critical Infrastructure Materials Operations, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"Vested Critical Infrastructure Materials OperationsThis property is located in the vicinity of an established vested critical infrastructure materials operations in which critical infrastructure materials operations have been afforded the highest priority use status. It can be anticipated that such operations may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the critical infrastructure materials operations. The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience that may result from such normal critical infrastructure materials operations."(2)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 300 feet of the boundary of an agriculture protection area created under Chapter 81, Part 2, Proposal and Approval of Protection Areas, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"Agriculture Protection AreaThis property is located in the vicinity of an established agriculture protection area in which normal agricultural uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that such agricultural uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the agriculture protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience which may result from such normal agricultural uses and activities."(3)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of an industrial protection area created under Chapter 81, Part 2, Proposal and Approval of Protection Areas, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"Industrial Protection AreaThis property is located in the vicinity of an established industrial protection area in which normal industrial uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that such industrial uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the industrial protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience which may result from such normal industrial uses and activities."(4)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of a critical infrastructure materials protection area created under Chapter 81, Part 2, Proposal and Approval of Protection Areas, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"Critical Infrastructure Materials Protection AreaThis property is located in the vicinity of an established critical infrastructure materials protection area in which critical infrastructure materials operations have been afforded the highest priority use status. It can be anticipated that such operations may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the critical infrastructure materials protection area. The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience which may result from such normal critical infrastructure materials operations."(5)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of a mining protection area created under Chapter 81, Part 2, Proposal and Approval of Protection Areas, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"This property is located within the vicinity of an established mining protection area in which normal mining uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that the mining uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the mining protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience that may result from the normal mining uses and activities."

Section 231:
Section 231. Section 17-79-801, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-308 is renumbered and amended to read:8. Administration of Land Use, Development, and Management Provisions17-27a-30817-79-801Effective 11/06/25. Land use authority requirements -- Nature of land use decision.(1)A land use authority shall apply the plain language of land use regulations.(2)If a land use regulation does not plainly restrict a land use application, the land use authority shall interpret and apply the land use regulation to favor the land use application.(3)A land use decision of a land use authority is an administrative act, even if the land use authority is the legislative body.

Section 232:
Section 232. Section 17-79-802, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-309 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-30917-79-802Effective 11/06/25. Urban development in municipal expansion area -- Requirements.(1)For purposes of this section, "urban development" means the same as thethat term is defined in Section 10-2-801.(2)A county legislative body may approve urban development within an adopted expansion area of a municipality if the county notifies the municipality of the proposed urban development, and:(a)the municipality consents in writing to the proposed urban development; or(b)the municipality fails to respond to the county's notification of the proposed urban development within 90 days after the day on which the county provides the notice.(3)If a municipality responds to the county's notice under Subsection (2) within 90 days after the county's notification of the proposed urban development to object to the proposed urban development, the county may approve the urban development if the county responds to the municipality's objection in writing.

Section 233:
Section 233. Section 17-79-803, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-508 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-50817-79-803Effective 11/06/25. Applicant's entitlement to land use application approval -- Application relating to land in a high priority transportation corridor -- County's requirements and limitations -- Vesting upon submission of development plan and schedule.(1)(a)(i)Subject to Subsection (7), an applicant who has submitted a complete land use application, including the payment of all application fees, is entitled to substantive review of the application under the land use regulations:(A)in effect on the date that the application is complete; and(B)applicable to the application or to the information shown on the submitted application.(ii)An applicant is entitled to approval of a land use application if the application conforms to the requirements of the applicable land use regulations, land use decisions, and development standards in effect when the applicant submits a complete application and pays all application fees, unless:(A)the land use authority, on the record, formally finds that a compelling, countervailing public interest would be jeopardized by approving the application and specifies the compelling, countervailing public interest in writing; or(B)in the manner provided by local ordinance and before the applicant submits the application, the county formally initiates proceedings to amend the county's land use regulations in a manner that would prohibit approval of the application as submitted.(b)The county shall process an application without regard to proceedings the county initiated to amend the county's ordinances as described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) if:(i)180 days have passed since the county initiated the proceedings; and(ii)(A)the proceedings have not resulted in an enactment that prohibits approval of the application as submitted; or(B)during the 12 months prior tobefore the county processing the application or multiple applications of the same type, the application is impaired or prohibited under the terms of a temporary land use regulation adopted under Section 17-27a-50417-79-504.(c)A land use application is considered submitted and complete when the applicant provides the application in a form that complies with the requirements of applicable ordinances and pays all applicable fees.(d)Unless a phasing sequence is required in an executed development agreement, a county shall, without regard to any other separate and distinct land use application, accept and process a complete land use application in accordance with this chapter.(e)The continuing validity of an approval of a land use application is conditioned upon the applicant proceeding after approval to implement the approval with reasonable diligence.(f)Subject to Subsection (7), a county may not impose on an applicant who has submitted a complete application a requirement that is not expressed in:(i)this chapter;(ii)a county ordinance in effect on the date that the applicant submits a complete application, subject to Subsection (1)(a)(ii); or(iii)a county specification for public improvements applicable to a subdivision or development that is in effect on the date that the applicant submits an application.(g)A county may not impose on a holder of an issued land use permit or a final, unexpired subdivision plat a requirement that is not expressed:(i)in a land use permit;(ii)on the subdivision plat;(iii)in a document on which the land use permit or subdivision plat is based;(iv)in the written record evidencing approval of the land use permit or subdivision plat;(v)in this chapter;(vi)in a county ordinance; or(vii)in a county specification for residential roadways in effect at the time a residential subdivision was approved.(h)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(i) or (j), a county may not withhold issuance of a certificate of occupancy or acceptance of subdivision improvements because of an applicant's failure to comply with a requirement that is not expressed:(i)in the building permit or subdivision plat, documents on which the building permit or subdivision plat is based, or the written record evidencing approval of the building permit or subdivision plat; or(ii)in this chapter or the county's ordinances.(i)A county may not unreasonably withhold issuance of a certificate of occupancy where an applicant has met all requirements essential for the public health, public safety, and general welfare of the occupants, in accordance with this chapter, unless:(i)the applicant and the county have agreed in a written document to the withholding of a certificate of occupancy; or(ii)the applicant has not provided a financial assurance for required and uncompleted public landscaping improvements or infrastructure improvements in accordance with an applicable local ordinance.(j)A county may not conduct a final inspection required before issuing a certificate of occupancy for a residential unit that is within the boundary of an infrastructure financing district, as defined in Section 17B-1-102, until the applicant for the certificate of occupancy provides adequate proof to the county that any lien on the unit arising from the infrastructure financing district's assessment against the unit under Title 11, Chapter 42, Assessment Area Act, has been released after payment in full of the infrastructure financing district's assessment against that unit.(k)A county:(i)may require the submission of a private landscaping plan, as defined in Section 17-27a-604.517-79-707, before landscaping is installed; and(ii)may not withhold an applicant's building permit or certificate of occupancy because the applicant has not submitted a private landscaping plan.(2)A county is bound by the terms and standards of applicable land use regulations and shall comply with mandatory provisions of those regulations.(3)A county may not, as a condition of land use application approval, require a person filing a land use application to obtain documentation regarding a school district's willingness, capacity, or ability to serve the development proposed in the land use application.(4)Subject to Subsection (7), a specified public agency's submission of a development plan and schedule as required in Subsection 17-27a-305(8)17-79-305(8) that complies with the requirements of that subsection, the specified public agency vests in the county's applicable land use maps, zoning map, hookup fees, impact fees, other applicable development fees, and land use regulations in effect on the date of submission.(5)(a)If sponsors of a referendum timely challenge a project in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-601(6), the project's affected owner may rescind the project's land use approval by delivering a written notice:(i)to the local clerk as defined in Section 20A-7-101; and(ii)no later than seven days after the day on which a petition for a referendum is determined sufficient under Subsection 20A-7-607(4).(b)Upon delivery of a written notice described in Subsection (5)(a) the following are rescinded and are of no further force or effect:(i)the relevant land use approval; and(ii)any land use regulation enacted specifically in relation to the land use approval.(6)(a)After issuance of a building permit, a county may not:(i)change or add to the requirements expressed in the building permit, unless the change or addition is:(A)requested by the building permit holder; or(B)necessary to comply with an applicable state building code; or(ii)revoke the building permit or take action that has the effect of revoking the building permit.(b)Subsection (6)(a) does not prevent a county from issuing a building permit that contains an expiration date defined in the building permit.(7)A county shall comply with the provisions of this chapter regarding all pending land use applications and new land use applications submitted under this chapter.

Section 234:
Section 234. Section 17-79-804, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-509 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-50917-79-804Effective 11/06/25. Limit on fees -- Requirement to itemize fees -- Appeal of fee.(1)A county may impose or collect a fee for reviewing or approving the plans for a commercial or residential building, not to exceed the lesser of:(a)the actual cost of performing the plan review; and(b)65% of the amount the county charges for a building permit fee for that building.(2)(a)Subject to Subsection (2)(b), a county may impose and collect a fee for reviewing and approving identical plans, as described in Section 17-27a-53617-79-809, not to exceed the lesser of:(i)the actual cost of performing the plan review; or(ii)30% of the fee that would be imposed and collected under Subsection (1).(b)A county may impose and collect a fee for reviewing an original plan, as defined in Section 17-27a-53617-79-809, that an applicant submits with the intent that the original plan be used as the basis for a future identical plan submission, the same as any other plan review fee under Subsection (1).(3)A county may not impose or collect a hookup fee that exceeds the reasonable cost of installing and inspecting the pipe, line, meter, or appurtenance to connect to the county water, sewer, storm water, power, or other utility system.(4)A county may not impose or collect:(a)a land use application fee that exceeds the reasonable cost of processing the application or issuing the permit;(b)an inspection, regulation, or review fee that exceeds the reasonable cost of performing the inspection, regulation, or review; or(c)an inspection fee on a qualified water conservancy district, as defined in Section 17B-2a-1010, that hires a qualified inspector to conduct inspections on new infrastructure.(5)(a)If requested by an applicant who is charged a fee or an owner of residential property upon which a fee is imposed, the county shall provide an itemized fee statement that shows the calculation method for each fee.(b)If an applicant who is charged a fee or an owner of residential property upon which a fee is imposed submits a request for an itemized fee statement no later than 30 days after the day on which the applicant or owner pays the fee, the county shall no later than 10 days after the day on which the request is received provide or commit to provide within a specific time:(i)for each fee, any studies, reports, or methods relied upon by the county to create the calculation method described in Subsection (5)(a);(ii)an accounting of each fee paid;(iii)how each fee will be distributed; and(iv)information on filing a fee appeal through the process described in Subsection (5)(c).(c)A county shall establish a fee appeal process subject to an appeal authority described in Part 7, Appeal Authority and Variances, and district court review in accordance with Part 8, District Court Review, to determine whether a fee reflects only the reasonable estimated cost of:(i)regulation;(ii)processing an application;(iii)issuing a permit; or(iv)delivering the service for which the applicant or owner paid the fee.(6)A county may not impose on or collect from a public agency any fee associated with the public agency's development of its land other than:(a)subject to Subsection (4), a fee for a development service that the public agency does not itself provide;(b)subject to Subsection (3), a hookup fee; and(c)an impact fee for a public facility listed in Subsection 11-36a-102(17)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (g), subject to any applicable credit under Subsection 11-36a-402(2).(7)A provider of culinary or secondary water that commits to provide a water service required by a land use application process is subject to the following as if it were a county:(a)Subsections (5) and (6);(b)Section 17-27a-507; and(c)Section 17-27a-509.5.

Section 235:
Section 235. Section 17-79-805, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-509.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-509.517-79-805Effective 11/06/25. Review for application completeness -- Substantive application review -- Reasonable diligence required for determination of whether improvements or warranty work meets standards -- Money damages claim prohibited.(1)(a)Each county shall, in a timely manner, determine whether a land use application is complete for the purposes of subsequent, substantive land use authority review.(b)After a reasonable period of time to allow the county diligently to evaluate whether all objective ordinance-based application criteria have been met, if application fees have been paid, the applicant may in writing request that the county provide a written determination either that the application is:(i)complete for the purposes of allowing subsequent, substantive land use authority review; or(ii)deficient with respect to a specific, objective, ordinance-based application requirement.(c)Within 30 days of receipt of an applicant's request under this section, the county shall either:(i)mail a written notice to the applicant advising that the application is deficient with respect to a specified, objective, ordinance-based criterion, and stating that the application must be supplemented by specific additional information identified in the notice; or(ii)accept the application as complete for the purposes of further substantive processing by the land use authority.(d)If the notice required by Subsection (1)(c)(i) is not timely mailed, the application shall be considered complete, for purposes of further substantive land use authority review.(e)(i)The applicant may raise and resolve in a single appeal any determination made under this Subsection (1) to the appeal authority, including an allegation that a reasonable period of time has elapsed under Subsection (1)(a).(ii)The appeal authority shall issue a written decision for any appeal requested under this Subsection (1)(e).(f)(i)The applicant may appeal to district court the decision of the appeal authority made under Subsection (1)(e).(ii)Each appeal under Subsection (1)(f)(i) shall be made within 30 days of the date of the written decision.(2)(a)Each land use authority shall substantively review a complete application and an application considered complete under Subsection (1)(d), and shall approve or deny each application with reasonable diligence.(b)After a reasonable period of time to allow the land use authority to consider an application, the applicant may in writing request that the land use authority take final action within 45 days from date of service of the written request.(c)Within 45 days from the date of service of the written request described in Subsection (2)(b):(i)except as provided in Subsection (2)(c)(ii), the land use authority shall take final action, approving or denying the application; and(ii)if a landowner petitions for a land use regulation, a legislative body shall take final action by approving or denying the petition.(d)If the land use authority denies an application processed under the mandates of Subsection (2)(b), or if the applicant has requested a written decision in the application, the land use authority shall include its reasons for denial in writing, on the record, which may include the official minutes of the meeting in which the decision was rendered.(e)If the land use authority fails to comply with Subsection (2)(c), the applicant may appeal this failure to district court within 30 days of the date on which the land use authority should have taken final action under Subsection (2)(c).(3)(a)As used in this Subsection (3), an "infrastructure improvement category" includes a:(i)culinary water system;(ii)sanitary sewer system;(iii)storm water system;(iv)transportation system;(v)secondary and irrigation water system;(vi)public landscaping; or(vii)public parks, trails, or open space.(b)With reasonable diligence, each land use authority shall determine whether the installation of required subdivision improvements or the performance of warranty work meets the county's adopted standards.(c)(i)An applicant may in writing request the land use authority to accept or reject the applicant's installation of required subdivision improvements or performance of warranty work.(ii)The land use authority shall accept or reject subdivision improvements within 15 days after receiving an applicant's written request under Subsection (3)(c)(i), or as soon as practicable after that 15-day period if inspection of the subdivision improvements is impeded by winter weather conditions.(iii)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c)(iv), (3)(d), or (3)(e), the land use authority shall accept or reject the performance of warranty work within:(A)for a county of athe first, second, or third class, 15 days after the day on which the land use authority receives an applicant's written request under Subsection (3)(c)(i); and(B)for a county of the fourth, fifth, or sixth class, 30 days after the day on which the land use authority receives an applicant's written request under Subsection (3)(c)(i).(iv)If winter weather conditions do not reasonably permit a full and complete inspection of warranty work within the time periods described in Subsection (3)(c)(iii)(A) or (3)(c)(iii)(B) so the land use authority is able to accept or reject the warranty work, the land use authority shall:(A)notify the applicant in writing before the end of the applicable time period described in Subsection (3)(c)(iii)(A) or (3)(c)(iii)(B) that, because of winter weather conditions, the land use authority will require additional time to accept or reject the performance of warranty work; and(B)complete the inspection of the performance of warranty work and provide the applicant with an acceptance or rejection as soon as practicable.(d)If a land use authority rejects an applicant's performance of warranty work three times, the county may take 15 days in addition to the relevant time period described in Subsection  (3)(c)(iii) for subsequent inspections of the applicant's warranty work.(e)(i)If extraordinary circumstances do not permit a land use authority to complete inspection of warranty work within the relevant time period described in Subsection (3)(c)(iii)(A) or (3)(c)(iii)(B) so the land use authority is able to accept or reject the warranty work, the land use authority shall:(A)notify the applicant in writing before the end of the applicable time period described in Subsection (3)(c)(iii)(A) or (3)(c)(iii)(B) that, because of the extraordinary circumstances, the land use authority will require additional time to accept or reject the performance of warranty work; and(B)complete the inspection of the performance of warranty work and provide the applicant with an acceptance or rejection within 30 days after the day on which the relevant time period described in Subsection (3)(c)(iii)(A) or (3)(c)(iii)(B) ends.(ii)The following situations constitute extraordinary circumstances for purposes of Subsection (3)(e)(i):(A)the land use authority is processing a request for inspection that substantially exceeds the normal scope of inspection the county is customarily required to perform;(B)the applicant has provided two or more written requests described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) within the same 30-day time period; or(C)the land use authority is processing an unusually large number of written requests described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) to accept or reject subdivision improvements or performance of warranty work.(f)(i)If a land use authority determines that the installation of required subdivision improvements or the performance of warranty work does not meet the county's adopted standards, the land use authority shall, within 15 days of the day on which the land use authority makes the determination, comprehensively and with specificity list the reasons for the land use authority's determination.(ii)If the land use authority fails to provide an applicant with the list described in Subsection (3)(f)(i) within the required time period:(A)the applicant may send written notice to the land use authority requesting the list within five days; and(B)if the applicant does not receive the list within five days from the day on which the applicant provides the land use authority with written notice as described in Subsection (3)(f)(ii)(A), the applicant may demand, and the land use authority shall provide, a reimbursement equal to 20% of the applicant's improvement completion assurance or security for the warranty work within each infrastructure improvement category.(g)Subject to the provisions of Section 10-9a-604.517-79-707:(i)within 15 days of the day on which the land use authority determines that an infrastructure improvement within a certain infrastructure improvement category, as described in Subsection (3)(a), meets the county's adopted standards for that category of infrastructure improvement and an applicant submits complete as-built drawings to the land use authority, whichever occurs later, the land use authority shall return to the applicant 90% of the applicant's improvement completion assurance allocated toward that infrastructure improvement category; and(ii)within 15 days of the day on which the warranty period expires and the land use authority determines that an infrastructure improvement within a certain infrastructure improvement category, as described in Subsection (3)(a), meets the county's adopted standards for that category of infrastructure improvement, the land use authority shall return to the applicant the remaining 10% of the applicant's improvement completion assurance allocated toward that infrastructure improvement category, plus any remaining portion of a bond described in Subsection 10-9a-604.5(5)(b)17-79-707(5)(b).(h)The following acts under this Subsection (3) are administrative acts:(i)a county's return of an applicant's improvement completion assurance, or any portion of an improvement completion assurance, within a category of infrastructure improvements, to the applicant; and(ii)a county's return of an applicant's security for an improvement warranty, or any portion of security for an improvement warranty, within a category of infrastructure improvements, to the applicant.(4)Subject to Section 17-27a-50817-79-803, nothing in this section and no action or inaction of the land use authority relieves an applicant's duty to comply with all applicable substantive ordinances and regulations.(5)There shall be no money damages remedy arising from a claim under this section.

Section 236:
Section 236. Section 17-79-806, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-522 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52217-79-806Effective 11/06/25. Simple boundary adjustment -- Full boundary adjustment -- Process -- Review by land use authority.(1)A person may propose a simple boundary adjustment to a land use authority as described in this section.(2)A proposal for a simple boundary adjustment shall:(a)include a conveyance document that complies with Section 57-1-45.5; and(b)describe all lots or parcels affected by the proposed boundary adjustment.(3)A land use authority shall consent to a proposed simple boundary adjustment if the land use authority verifies that the proposed simple boundary adjustment:(a)meets the requirements of Subsection (2); and(b)does not:(i)affect a public right-of-way, county utility easement, or other public property;(ii)affect an existing easement, onsite wastewater system, or an internal lot restriction; or(iii)result in a lot or parcel out of conformity with land use regulations.(4)If the land use authority determines that a proposed simple boundary adjustment does not meet the requirements of Subsection (3), a full boundary adjustment is required.(5)To propose a full boundary adjustment, the adjoining property owners shall submit a proposal to the land use authority that includes:(a)a conveyance document that complies with Section 57-1-45.5;(b)a survey that complies with Subsection 57-1-4.5(3)(b)57-1-45.5(3)(b); and(c)if required by county ordinance, a proposed plat amendment corresponding with the proposed full boundary adjustment, prepared in accordance with Section 17-27a-60817-79-711.(6)The land use authority shall consent to a proposed full boundary adjustment made under Subsection (5) if:(a)the proposal submitted to the land use authority under Subsection (5) includes all necessary information;(b)the survey described in Subsection (5)(b) shows no evidence of a violation of a land use regulation; and(c)if required by county ordinance, the plat amendment corresponding with the proposed full boundary adjustment has been approved in accordance with Section 17-27a-60817-79-711.(7)(a)Consent under Subsection (3) or (6) is an administrative act.(b)Notice of consent under Subsection (3) or (6) shall be provided to the person proposing the boundary adjustment in a format that makes clear:(i)the land use authority is not responsible for any error related to the boundary adjustment; and(ii)a county recorder may record the boundary adjustment.(8)A boundary adjustment is effective from the day on which the boundary adjustment, as consented to by the land use authority, is recorded by the county recorder along with the relevant conveyance document.(9)The recording of a boundary adjustment does not constitute a land use approval.(10)A county may enforce county ordinances against, or withhold approval of a land use application for, property that is subject to a boundary adjustment if the county determines that the resulting lots or parcels are not in compliance with the county's land use regulations in effect on the day on which the boundary adjustment is recorded.

Section 237:
Section 237. Section 17-79-807, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-523 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52317-79-807Effective 11/06/25. Boundary establishment -- Process -- Boundary agreement not subject to review by land use authority -- Prohibitions.(1)The owners of adjoining property may initiate a boundary establishment to:(a)resolve an ambiguous, uncertain, or disputed boundary between the adjoining properties; and(b)agree upon the location of the boundary between the adjoining properties.(2)Adjoining property owners executing a boundary establishment described in Subsection (1) shall:(a)prepare an establishment document that complies with Section 57-1-45; and(b)record the boundary establishment with the county recorder, in accordance with Section 57-1-45.(3)A boundary establishment:(a)is not subject to review of a land use authority; and(b)does not require consent or approval from a land use authority before it may be recorded.(4)A boundary establishment is effective from the day it is recorded by the county recorder.(5)A county may enforce county ordinances against property with a boundary establishment that violates a land use regulation.(6)A boundary establishment that complies with this section presumptively:(a)has no detrimental effect on any easement on the property that is recorded before the day on which the agreement is executed; and(b)conveys the ownership of the adjoining parties to the established common boundary.

Section 238:
Section 238. Section 17-79-808, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-524 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52417-79-808Effective 11/06/25. Site plan.A site plan submitted to a county for approval of a building permit:(1)if modified, may not be used to impose a penalty on a property owner;(2)does not represent an agreement for a specific final layout;(3)does not bind an owner from future development activity or modifications to a development activity on the property; and(4)is superseded by the terms of a building permit requirement.

Section 239:
Section 239. Section 17-79-809, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-536 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-53617-79-809Effective 11/06/25. Identical plan review -- Process -- Indexing of plans -- Prohibitions.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Business day" means Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, or Friday, unless the day falls on a federal, state, or county holiday.(b)"Nonidentical plan" means a plan that does not meet the definition of an identical plan in Section 17-27a-10317-79-102.(c)"Original plan" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-541.(2)An applicant may submit, and a county shall review, an identical plan as described in this section.(3)At the time of submitting an identical plan for review to a county, an applicant shall:(a)mark the floor plan as "identical plans";(b)identify in writing:(i)the building permit number the county issued for the original plan:(A)that was previously approved by the county; and(B)to which the submitted floor plan qualifies as an identical plan; or(ii)the identifying index number assigned by the county to the original plan, as described in Subsection (5)(b); and(c)identify the site on which the applicant intends to implement the identical plan.(4)Beginning May 7, 2025, an applicant that intends to submit an identical plan for review to a county shall:(a)indicate, at the time of submitting an original plan to the county for review and approval, that the applicant intends to use the original plan as the basis for submitting a future identical plan if the original plan is approved by the county; and(b)identify:(i)the name or other identifier of the original plan; and(ii)the zone the building will be located in, if the county approves the original plan.(5)Upon approving an original plan and receiving the information described in Subsection (4), a county shall:(a)file and index the original plan for future reference against an identical plan later submitted under Subsection (2); and(b)provide the applicant with an identifying index number for the original plan.(6)A county that receives a submission under Subsection (2) shall review and compare the submitted identical plan to the original plan to ensure:(a)the identical plan and original plan are substantially identical; and(b)no structural changes have been made from the original plan.(7)Nothing in this section prohibits a county from conducting a site review and requiring geological analysis of the proposed site identified by the applicant under Subsection (3)(c).(8)A county shall:(a)review a submitted identical plan for compliance with this section; and(b)approve or reject the identical plan within five business days after the day on which the identical plan was submitted under Subsection (2).(9)An applicant that submits a nonidentical plan to a county as an identical plan, with knowledge that the nonidentical plan does not qualify as an identical plan and with intent to deceive the county:(a)may be fined by the county receiving the submission of the nonidentical plan:(i)in an amount not to exceed three times the building permit fee, if the county approved the nonidentical plan as an identical plan before discovering the submission did not qualify as an identical plan; or(ii)in an amount equal to the building permit fee that would have been issued for the nonidentical plan, if the county did not approve the nonidentical plan before discovering the submission did not qualify as an identical plan; and(b)is prohibited from submitting an identical plan for review and approval under this section for a period of two years from the day on which the county discovers the nonidentical plan identified as an identical plan in the applicant's submission did not qualify as an identical plan.(10)A county may impose a criminal penalty, as described in Section 17-53-22317-64-501, for an applicant that knowingly violates the prohibition described in Subsection (9)(b).

Section 240:
Section 240. Section 17-79-810, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-537 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-53717-79-810Effective 11/06/25. Fees collected for construction approval -- Approval of plans.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Automated review" means a computerized process used to conduct a plan review, including through the use of software and algorithms to assess compliance with an applicable building code, regulation, or ordinance to ensure that a plan meets all of a county's required criteria for approval.(b)"Business day" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-27a-53617-79-809.(c)"Construction project" means: (i)the same as that term is defined in Section 38-1a-102; or(ii)any work requiring a permit for construction of or on a one- or two-family dwelling, a townhome, or other residential structure built under the State Construction Code and State Fire Code.(d)"Lodging establishment" means a place providing temporary sleeping accommodations to the public, including any of the following:(i)a bed and breakfast establishment;(ii)a boarding house;(iii)a dormitory;(iv)a hotel;(v)an inn;(vi)a lodging house;(vii)a motel;(viii)a resort; or(ix)a rooming house.(e)(i)"Plan review" means all of the reviews and approvals of a plan that a county, including all relevant divisions or departments within a county, requires before issuing a building permit, with a scope that may not exceed a review to verify: (A)that the construction project complies with the provisions of the State Construction Code under Title 15A, State Construction and Fire Codes Act;(B)that the construction project complies with the energy code adopted under Section 15A-2-103;(C)that the construction project complies with local ordinances;(D)that the applicant paid any required fees;(E)that the applicant obtained final approvals from any other required reviewing agencies;(F)that the construction project received a structural review;(G)the total square footage for each building level of finished, garage, and unfinished space; and(H)that the plans include a printed statement indicating that, before the disturbance of land and during the actual construction, the applicant will comply with applicable federal, state, and local laws and ordinances, including any storm water protection laws and ordinances.(ii)"Plan review" does not mean a review of:(A)a document required to be re-submitted for a construction project other than a construction project for a one-or two-family dwelling or townhome if additional modifications or substantive changes are identified by the plan review;(B)a document submitted as part of a deferred submittal when requested by the applicant and approved by the building official; (C)a document that, due to the document's technical nature or on the request of the applicant, is reviewed by a third party; or(D)a storm water permit.(f)"Screening period" means the three business days following the day on which an applicant submits an application.(g)"State Construction Code" means the same as that term is defined in Section 15A-1-102.(h)"State Fire Code" means the same as that term is defined in Section 15A-1-102.(i)"Storm water permit" means the same as that term is defined in Section 19-5-108.5.(j)"Structural review" means:(i)a review that verifies that a construction project complies with the following: (A)footing size and bar placement;(B)foundation thickness and bar placement;(C)beam and header sizes;(D)nailing patterns;(E)bearing points;(F)structural member size and span; and(G)sheathing; or(ii)if the review exceeds the scope of the review described in Subsection (1)(j)(i), a review that a licensed engineer conducts.(k)"Technical nature" means a characteristic that places an item outside the training and expertise of an individual who regularly performs plan reviews. (2)(a)If a county collects a fee for the inspection of a construction project, the county shall ensure that the construction project receives a prompt inspection.(b)If a county cannot provide a building inspection within three business days after the day on which the county receives the request for the inspection, the applicant may engage an inspection with a third-party inspection firm from the third-party inspection firm list, as described in Section 15A-1-105.(c)If an inspector identifies one or more violations of the State Construction Code or State Fire Code during an inspection, the inspector shall give the permit holder written notification that:(i)identifies each violation;(ii)upon request by the permit holder, includes a reference to each applicable provision of the State Construction Code or State Fire Code; and(iii)is delivered:(A)in hardcopy or by electronic means; and(B)the day on which the inspection occurs.(3)(a)(i)A county that receives an application for a plan review shall determine if the application is complete, as described in Subsection (12), within the screening period.(ii)If the county determines an application for a plan review is complete, as described in Subsection (12), within the screening period, the county shall begin the plan review process described in Subsection (4).(b)If the county determines that an application for a plan review is not complete as described in Subsection (12), and if the county notifies the applicant of the county's determination:(i)before 5 p.m. on the last day of the screening period, the county may:(A)pause the screening period until the applicant ensures the application meets the requirements of Subsection (12); or(B)reject the incomplete application; or(ii)after 5 p.m. on the last day of the screening period, the county may not pause the screening period and shall begin the plan review process described in Subsection (4).(c)If an application is rejected as described in Subsection (3)(b)(i)(B) and an applicant resubmits the application, the resubmission begins a new screening period in which the county shall review the resubmitted application to determine if the application is complete as described in Subsection (12).(d)If the county gives notice of an incomplete application after 5 p.m. on the last day of the screening period, the county:(i)shall immediately notify the applicant that the county has determined the application is not complete and the basis for the determination;(ii)may not, except as provided in Subsection (3)(d)(iii), pause the relevant time period described in Subsection (4); and(iii)may pause the relevant time period described in Subsection (4)(a) or (b) as described in Subsection (4)(c).(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (7), once a county determines an application for plan review is complete, or proceeds to review an incomplete application for plan review under Subsection (3)(b)(ii), the county shall complete a plan review of a construction project for a one- or two-family dwelling or townhome by no later than 14 business days after the day on which the screening period for the application ends.(b)Except as provided in Subsection (7), once a county determines an application for plan review is complete, or proceeds to review an incomplete application for plan review under Subsection (3)(b)(ii), the county shall complete a plan review of a construction project for a residential structure built under the State Construction Code that is not a one- or two-family dwelling, townhome, or a lodging establishment, by no later than 21 business days after the day on which the screening period for the application ends.(c)If a county gives notice of an incomplete application as described in Subsection (3)(d), the county:(i)may pause the time period described in Subsection (4)(a) or (b):(A)within the last five days of the relevant time period; and(B)until the applicant provides the county with the information necessary to consider the application complete under Subsection (12);(ii)shall resume the relevant time period upon receipt of the information necessary to consider the application complete; and(iii)may, if necessary, use five additional days beginning the day on which the county receives the information described in Subsection (4)(c)(ii) to consider whether the application meets the requirements for a building permit, even if the five additional days extend beyond the relevant time period described in Subsection 4(a) or (b).(d)If, at the conclusion of plan review, the county determines the application meets the requirements for a building permit, the county shall approve the application and, subject to Subsection (10)(b), issue the building permit to the applicant.(5)(a)A county may utilize another government entity to determine if an application is complete or perform a plan review, in whole or in part.(b)A county that utilizes another government entity to determine if an application is complete or perform a plan review, as described in Subsection (5)(a), shall:(i)notify any other government entities, including water providers, within 24 hours of receiving any building permit application; and(ii)provide the government entity all documents necessary to determine if an application is complete or perform a plan review, in whole or in part, as requested by the county.(6)A government entity determining if an application is complete or performing a plan review, in whole or in part, as requested by a county, shall:(a)comply with the requirements of this chapter; and(b)notify the county within the screening period whether the application, or a portion of the application, is complete.(7)An applicant may:(a)waive the plan review time requirements described in Subsection (4); or(b)with the county's written consent, establish an alternative plan review time requirement.(8)(a)A county may not enforce a requirement to have a plan review if:(i)the county does not complete the plan review within the relevant time period described in Subsection (4); and(ii)a licensed architect or structural engineer, or both when required by law, stamps the plan.(b)If a county is prohibited from enforcing a requirement to have a plan review under Subsection (8)(a), the county shall return to the applicant the plan review fee.(9)(a)A county may attach to a reviewed plan a list that includes:(i)items with which the county is concerned and may enforce during construction; and(ii)building code violations found in the plan.(b)A county may not require an applicant to redraft a plan if the county requests minor changes to the plan that the list described in Subsection (9)(a) identifies.(c)A county may require a single resubmittal of plans for a one- or two-family dwelling or townhome if deficiencies in the plan would affect the site plan interaction or footprint of the design.(10)(a)If a county charges a fee for a building permit, the county may not refuse payment of the fee at the time the applicant submits an application under Subsection (3).(b)If a county charges a fee for a building permit and does not require the fee for a building permit to be included in an application for plan review, upon approval of an application for plan review under Subsection (4)(d), the county may require the applicant to pay the fee for the building permit before the county issues the building permit.(11)A county may not limit the number of  applications submitted under Subsection (3).(12)For purposes of Subsection (3), an application for plan review is complete if the application contains:(a)the name, address, and contact information of:(i)the applicant; and(ii)the construction manager/general contractor, as defined in Section 63G-6a-103, for the construction project;(b)a site plan for the construction project that:(i)is drawn to scale;(ii)includes a north arrow and legend; and(iii)provides specifications for the following:(A)lot size and dimensions;(B)setbacks and overhangs for setbacks;(C)easements;(D)property lines;(E)topographical details, if the slope of the lot is greater than 10%;(F)retaining walls;(G)hard surface areas;(H)curb and gutter elevations as indicated in the subdivision documents;(I)existing and proposed utilities, including water, sewer, and subsurface drainage facilities;(J)street names;(K)driveway locations;(L)defensible space provisions and elevations, if required by the Utah Wildland Urban Interface Code adopted under Section 15A-2-103; and(M)the location of the nearest hydrant;(c)construction plans and drawings, including:(i)elevations, only if the construction project is new construction;(ii)floor plans for each level, including the location and size of doors, windows, and egress;(iii)foundation, structural, and framing detail; (iv)electrical, mechanical, and plumbing design;(v)a licensed architect's or structural engineer's stamp, when required by law; and(vi)fire suppression details, when required by fire code;(d)documentation of energy code compliance;(e)structural calculations, except for trusses;(f)a geotechnical report, including a slope stability evaluation and retaining wall design, if:(i)the slope of the lot is greater than 15%; and(ii)required by the county; (g)a statement indicating that:(i)before land disturbance occurs on the subject property, the applicant will obtain a storm water permit; and(ii)during actual construction, the applicant shall comply with applicable local ordinances and building codes; and(h)the fees, if any, established by ordinance for the county to perform a plan review.(13)A county may, at the county's discretion, utilize automated review to fulfill, in whole or in part, the county's obligation to conduct a plan review described in this section.

Section 241:
Section 241. Section 17-79-811 is enacted to read:17-79-811Effective 11/06/25. Provisions applicable to a provider of culinary or secondary water.A provider of culinary or secondary water that commits to provide a water service required by a land use application process is subject to the following provisions the same as if the provider were a county:(1)Subsections 17-79-804(5) and (6);(2)Section 17-79-805; and(3)Section 17-79-812.

Section 242:
Section 242. Section 17-79-812, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-507 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-50717-79-812Effective 11/06/25. Exactions -- Exaction for water interest -- Requirement to offer to original owner property acquired by exaction.(1)A county may impose an exaction or exactions on development proposed in a land use application, including, subject to Subsection (3), an exaction for a water interest, if:(a)an essential link exists between a legitimate governmental interest and each exaction; and(b)each exaction is roughly proportionate, both in nature and extent, to the impact of the proposed development.(2)If a land use authority imposes an exaction for another governmental entity:(a)the governmental entity shall request the exaction; and(b)the land use authority shall transfer the exaction to the governmental entity for which it was exacted.(3)(a)(i)Subject to the requirements of this Subsection (3), a county or, if applicable, the county's culinary water authority shall base any exaction for a water interest on the culinary water authority's established calculations of projected water interest requirements.(ii)Except as described in Subsection (3)(a)(iii), a culinary water authority shall base an exaction for a culinary water interest on:(A)consideration of the system-wide minimum sizing standards established for the culinary water authority by the Division of Drinking Water pursuant toin accordance with Section 19-4-114; and(B)the number of equivalent residential connections associated with the culinary water demand for each specific development proposed in the development's land use application, applying lower exactions for developments with lower equivalent residential connections as demonstrated by at least five years of usage data for like land uses within the county.(iii)A county or culinary water authority may impose an exaction for a culinary water interest that results in less water being exacted than would otherwise be exacted under Subsection (3)(a)(ii) if the county or culinary water authority, at the county's or culinary water authority's sole discretion, determines there is good cause to do so.(iv)A county shall make public the methodology used to comply with Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B). A land use applicant may appeal to the county's governing body an exaction calculation used by the county or the county's culinary water authority under Subsection (3)(a)(ii).  A land use applicant may present data and other information that illustrates a need for an exaction recalculation and the county's governing body shall respond with due process.(v)Upon an applicant's request, the culinary water authority shall provide the applicant with the basis for the culinary water authority's calculations under Subsection (3)(a)(i) on which an exaction for a water interest is based.(b)A county or itsthe county's culinary water authority may not impose an exaction for a water interest if the culinary water authority's existing available water interests exceed the water interests needed to meet the reasonable future water requirement of the public, as determined under Subsection 73-1-4(2)(f).(4)(a)If a county plans to dispose of surplus real property under Section 17-50-31217-78-103 that was acquired under this section and has been owned by the county for less than 15 years, the county shall first offer to reconvey the property, without receiving additional consideration, to the person who granted the property to the county.(b)A person to whom a county offers to reconvey property under Subsection (4)(a) has 90 days to accept or reject the county's offer.(c)If a person to whom a county offers to reconvey property declines the offer, the county may offer the property for sale.(d)Subsection (4)(a) does not apply to the disposal of property acquired by exaction by a community development or urban renewal agency.(5)(a)A county may not, as part of an infrastructure improvement, require the installation of pavement on a residential roadway at a width in excess of 32 feet.(b)Subsection (5)(a) does not apply if a county requires the installation of pavement in excess of 32 feet:(i)in a vehicle turnaround area;(ii)in a cul-de-sac;(iii)to address specific traffic flow constraints at an intersection, mid-block crossings, or other areas;(iv)to address an applicable general or master plan improvement, including transportation, bicycle lanes, trails, or other similar improvements that are not included within an impact fee area;(v)to address traffic flow constraints for service to or abutting higher density developments or uses that generate higher traffic volumes, including community centers, schools, and other similar uses;(vi)as needed for the installation or location of a utility which is maintained by the county and is considered a transmission line or requires additional roadway width;(vii)for third-party utility lines that have an easement preventing the installation of utilities maintained by the county within the roadway;(viii)for utilities over 12 feet in depth;(ix)for roadways with a design speed that exceeds 25 miles per hour;(x)as needed for flood and stormwater routing;(xi)as needed to meet fire code requirements for parking and hydrants; or(xii)as needed to accommodate street parking.(c)Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a county from approving a road cross section with a pavement width less than 32 feet.(d)(i)A land use applicant may appeal a municipal requirement for pavement in excess of 32 feet on a residential roadway.(ii)A land use applicant that has appealed a municipal specification for a residential roadway pavement width in excess of 32 feet may request that the county assemble a panel of qualified experts to serve as the appeal authority for purposes of determining the technical aspects of the appeal.(iii)Unless otherwise agreed by the applicant and the county, the panel described in Subsection (5)(d)(ii) shall consist of the following three experts:(A)one licensed engineer, designated by the county;(B)one licensed engineer, designated by the land use applicant; and(C)one licensed engineer, agreed upon and designated by the two designated engineers under Subsections (5)(d)(iii)(A) and (B).(iv)A member of the panel assembled by the county under Subsection (5)(d)(ii) may not have an interest in the application that is the subject of the appeal.(v)The land use applicant shall pay:(A)50% of the cost of the panel; and(B)the county's published appeal fee.(vi)The decision of the panel is a final decision, subject to a petition for review under Subsection (5)(d)(vii).(vii)Pursuant toIn accordance with Section 17-27a-80117-79-1009, a land use applicant or the county may file a petition for review of the decision with the district court within 30 days after the date that the decision is final.

Section 243:
Section 243. Section 17-79-901, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-802 is renumbered and amended to read:9. Enforcement17-27a-80217-79-901Effective 11/06/25. Enforcement -- Limitations on a county's ability to enforce an ordinance by withholding a permit or certificate.(1)(a)A county or an adversely affected party may, in addition to other remedies provided by law, institute:(i)injunctions, mandamus, abatement, or any other appropriate actions; or(ii)proceedings to prevent, enjoin, abate, or remove the unlawful building, use, or act.(b)A county need only establish the violation to obtain the injunction.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsections (3) through (6), a county may enforce the county's ordinance by withholding a building permit or certificate of occupancy.(b)It is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, alter, or change the use of any building or other structure within a county without approval of a building permit.(c)The county may not issue a building permit unless the plans of and for the proposed erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, or use fully conform to all regulations then in effect.(d)A county may require an applicant to install a permanent road, cover a temporary road with asphalt or concrete, or create another method for servicing a structure that is consistent with Appendix D of the International Fire Code, before receiving a certificate of occupancy for that structure.(e)A county may require an applicant to maintain and repair a temporary fire apparatus road during the construction of a structure accessed by the temporary fire apparatus road in accordance with the county's adopted standards.(f)A county may require temporary signs to be installed at each street intersection once construction of new roadway allows passage by a motor vehicle.(g)A county may adopt and enforce any appendix of the International Fire Code, 2021 Edition.(3)(a)A county may not deny an applicant a building permit or certificate of occupancy because the applicant has not completed an infrastructure improvement:(i)unless the infrastructure improvement is essential to meet the requirements for the issuance of a building permit or certificate of occupancy under Title 15A, State Construction and Fire Codes Act; and(ii)for which the county has accepted an improvement completion assurance for a public landscaping improvement, as defined in Section 17-27a-604.517-79-707, or an infrastructure improvement for the development.(b)For purposes of Subsection (3)(a)(i), notwithstanding Section 15A-5-205.6, infrastructure improvement that is essential means:(i)operable fire hydrants installed in a manner that is consistent with the county's adopted engineering standards; and(ii)for temporary roads used during construction, a properly compacted road base installed in a manner consistent with the county's adopted engineering standards.(c)A county may not adopt an engineering standard that requires an applicant to install a permanent road or a temporary road with asphalt or concrete before receiving a building permit.(4)A county may not deny an applicant a building permit or certificate of occupancy for failure to:(a)submit a private landscaping plan, as defined in Section 17-27a-604.517-79-707; or(b)complete a landscaping improvement that is not a public landscaping improvement, as defined in Section 17-27a-604.517-79-707.(5)A county may not withhold a building permit based on the lack of completion of a portion of a public sidewalk to be constructed within a public right-of-way serving a lot where a single-family or two-family residence or town home is proposed in a building permit application if an improvement completion assurance has been posted for the incomplete portion of the public sidewalk.(6)A county may not prohibit the construction of a single-family or two-family residence or town home, withhold recording a plat, or withhold acceptance of a public landscaping improvement, as defined in Section 17-27a-604.517-79-707, or an infrastructure improvement based on the lack of installation of a public sidewalk if an improvement completion assurance has been posted for the public sidewalk.(7)A county may not redeem an improvement completion assurance securing the installation of a public sidewalk sooner than 18 months after the date the improvement completion assurance is posted.(8)A county shall allow an applicant to post an improvement completion assurance for a public sidewalk separate from an improvement completion assurance for:(a)another infrastructure improvement; or(b)a public landscaping improvement, as defined in Section 17-27a-604.517-79-707.(9)A county may withhold a certificate of occupancy for a single-family or two-family residence or town home until the portion of the public sidewalk to be constructed within a public right-of-way and located immediately adjacent to the single-family or two-family residence or town home is completed and accepted by the county.

Section 244:
Section 244. Section 17-79-902, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-803 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-80317-79-902Effective 11/06/25. Penalties -- Notice.(1)The county may, by ordinance, establish civil penalties for violations of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any ordinances adopted under the authority of this chapter.(2)Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any ordinances adopted under the authority of this chapter is punishable as a class C misdemeanor upon conviction either:(a)as a class C misdemeanor; or(b)by imposing the appropriate civil penalty adopted under the authority of this section.(3)Prior to Before imposing upon an owner of record a civil penalty established by ordinance under authority of this chapter, a county shall provide:(a)written notice, by mail or hand delivery, of each ordinance violation to the address of the:(i)owner of record on file in the office of the county recorder; or(ii)person designated, in writing, by the owner of record as the owner's agent for the purpose of receiving notice of an ordinance violation;(b)the owner of record a reasonable opportunity to cure a noticed violation; and(c)a schedule of the civil penalties that may be imposed upon the expiration of a time certain.

Section 245:
Section 245. Section 17-79-903, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-510 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-51017-79-903Effective 11/06/25. Nonconforming uses and noncomplying structures.(1)(a)Except as provided in this section, a nonconforming use or a noncomplying structure may be continued by the present or a future property owner.(b)A nonconforming use may be extended through the same building, provided no structural alteration of the building is proposed or made for the purpose of the extension.(c)For purposes of this Subsection (1), the addition of a solar energy device to a building is not a structural alteration.(2)The legislative body may provide for:(a)the establishment, restoration, reconstruction, extension, alteration, expansion, or substitution of nonconforming uses upon the terms and conditions set forth in the land use ordinance;(b)the termination of all nonconforming uses, except billboards, by providing a formula establishing a reasonable time period during which the owner can recover or amortize the amount of his investment in the nonconforming use, if any; and(c)the termination of a nonconforming use due to its abandonment.(3)(a)A county may not prohibit the reconstruction or restoration of a noncomplying structure or terminate the nonconforming use of a structure that is involuntarily destroyed in whole or in part due to fire or other calamity unless the structure or use has been abandoned.(b)A county may prohibit the reconstruction or restoration of a noncomplying structure or terminate the nonconforming use of a structure if:(i)the structure is allowed to deteriorate to a condition that the structure is rendered uninhabitable and is not repaired or restored within six months after the day on which written notice is served to the property owner that the structure is uninhabitable and that the noncomplying structure or nonconforming use will be lost if the structure is not repaired or restored within six months; or(ii)the property owner has voluntarily demolished a majority of the noncomplying structure or the building that houses the nonconforming use.(c)(i)Notwithstanding a prohibition in the county's zoning ordinance, a county may permit a billboard owner to relocate the billboard within the county's unincorporated area to a location that is mutually acceptable to the county and the billboard owner.(ii)If the county and billboard owner cannot agree to a mutually acceptable location within 180 days after the day on which the owner submits a written request to relocate the billboard, the billboard owner may relocate the billboard in accordance with Subsection 17-27a-512(2)17-79-605(2).(4)(a)Unless the county establishes, by ordinance, a uniform presumption of legal existence for nonconforming uses, the property owner shall have the burden of establishing the legal existence of a noncomplying structure or nonconforming use through substantial evidence, which may not be limited to municipal or county records.(b)Any party claiming that a nonconforming use has been abandoned shall have the burden of establishing the abandonment.(c)Abandonment may be presumed to have occurred if:(i)a majority of the primary structure associated with the nonconforming use has been voluntarily demolished without prior written agreement with the county regarding an extension of the nonconforming use;(ii)the use has been discontinued for a minimum of one year; or(iii)the primary structure associated with the nonconforming use remains vacant for a period of one year.(d)The property owner may rebut the presumption of abandonment under Subsection (4)(c), and has the burden of establishing that any claimed abandonment under Subsection (4)(c) has not occurred.(5)A county may terminate the nonconforming status of a school district or charter school use or structure when the property associated with the school district or charter school use or structure ceases to be used for school district or charter school purposes for a period established by ordinance.

Section 246:
Section 246. Section 17-79-1001, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-701 is renumbered and amended to read:10. Appeal Authority, Variances, and District Court Review17-27a-70117-79-1001Effective 11/06/25. Appeal authority required -- Condition precedent to judicial review -- Appeal authority duties.(1)(a)Each county adopting a land use ordinance shall, by ordinance, establish one or more appeal authorities.(b)An appeal authority shall hear and decide:(i)requests for variances from the terms of land use ordinances;(ii)appeals from land use decisions applying land use ordinances; and(iii)appeals from a fee charged in accordance with Section 17-27a-50917-79-802.(c)An appeal authority may not hear an appeal from the enactment of a land use regulation.(2)As a condition precedent to judicial review, each adversely affected party shall timely and specifically challenge a land use authority's land use decision, in accordance with local ordinance.(3)An appeal authority described in Subsection (1)(a):(a)shall:(i)act in a quasi-judicial manner; and(ii)serve as the final arbiter of issues involving the interpretation or application of land use ordinances; and(b)may not entertain an appeal of a matter in which the appeal authority, or any participating member, had first acted as the land use authority.(4)By ordinance, a county may:(a)designate a separate appeal authority to hear requests for variances than the appeal authority the county designates to hear appeals;(b)designate one or more separate appeal authorities to hear distinct types of appeals of land use authority decisions;(c)require an adversely affected party to present to an appeal authority every theory of relief that the adversely affected party can raise in district court;(d)not require a land use applicant or adversely affected party to pursue duplicate or successive appeals before the same or separate appeal authorities as a condition of an appealing party's duty to exhaust administrative remedies; and(e)provide that specified types of land use decisions may be appealed directly to the district court.(5)A county may not require a public hearing for a request for a variance or land use appeal.(6)If the county establishes or, prior to the effective date of this chapterbefore May 2, 2005, has established a multiperson board, body, or panel to act as an appeal authority, at a minimum the board, body, or panel shall:(a)notify each of the members of the board, body, or panel of any meeting or hearing of the board, body, or panel;(b)provide each of the members of the board, body, or panel with the same information and access to municipal resources as any other member;(c)convene only if a quorum of the members of the board, body, or panel is present; and(d)act only upon the vote of a majority of the convened members of the board, body, or panel.

Section 247:
Section 247. Section 17-79-1002, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-702 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-70217-79-1002Effective 11/06/25. Variances.(1)Any person or entity desiring a waiver or modification of the requirements of a land use ordinance as applied to a parcel of property that hethe person or entity owns, leases, or in which hethe person or entity holds some other beneficial interest may apply to the applicable appeal authority for a variance from the terms of the ordinance.(2)(a)The appeal authority may grant a variance only if:(i)literal enforcement of the ordinance would cause an unreasonable hardship for the applicant that is not necessary to carry out the general purpose of the land use ordinances;(ii)there are special circumstances attached to the property that do not generally apply to other properties in the same zone;(iii)granting the variance is essential to the enjoyment of a substantial property right possessed by other property in the same zone;(iv)the variance will not substantially affect the general plan and will not be contrary to the public interest; and(v)the spirit of the land use ordinance is observed and substantial justice done.(b)(i)In determining whether or not enforcement of the land use ordinance would cause unreasonable hardship under Subsection (2)(a), the appeal authority may not find an unreasonable hardship unless the alleged hardship:(A)is located on or associated with the property for which the variance is sought; and(B)comes from circumstances peculiar to the property, not from conditions that are general to the neighborhood.(ii)In determining whether or not enforcement of the land use ordinance would cause unreasonable hardship under Subsection (2)(a), the appeal authority may not find an unreasonable hardship if the hardship is self-imposed or economic.(c)In determining whether or not there are special circumstances attached to the property under Subsection (2)(a), the appeal authority may find that special circumstances exist only if the special circumstances:(i)relate to the hardship complained of; and(ii)deprive the property of privileges granted to other properties in the same zone.(3)The applicant shall bear the burden of proving that all of the conditions justifying a variance have been met.(4)Variances run with the land.(5)The appeal authority may not grant a use variance.(6)In granting a variance, the appeal authority may impose additional requirements on the applicant that will:(a)mitigate any harmful affects of the variance; or(b)serve the purpose of the standard or requirement that is waived or modified.

Section 248:
Section 248. Section 17-79-1003, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-703 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-70317-79-1003Effective 11/06/25. Appealing a land use authority's decision -- Panel of experts for appeals of geologic hazard decisions.(1)The land use applicant, a board or officer of the county, or an adversely affected party may, within the time period provided by ordinance, appeal that decision to the appeal authority by alleging that there is error in any order, requirement, decision, or determination made by the land use authority in the administration or interpretation of the land use ordinance.(2)(a)A land use applicant who has appealed a decision of the land use authority administering or interpreting the county's geologic hazard ordinance may request the county to assemble a panel of qualified experts to serve as the appeal authority for purposes of determining the technical aspects of the appeal.(b)If a land use applicant makes a request under Subsection (2)(a), the county shall assemble the panel described in Subsection (2)(a) consisting of, unless otherwise agreed by the land use applicant and county:(i)one expert designated by the county;(ii)one expert designated by the land use applicant; and(iii)one expert chosen jointly by the county's designated expert and the applicant's land use designated expert.(c)A member of the panel assembled by the county under Subsection (2)(b) may not be associated with the application that is the subject of the appeal.(d)The land use applicant shall pay:(i)1/2 of the cost of the panel; and(ii)the county's published appeal fee.

Section 249:
Section 249. Section 17-79-1004, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-704 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-70417-79-1004Effective 11/06/25. Time to appeal.(1)The county shall enact an ordinance establishing a reasonable time of not less than 10 days to appeal to an appeal authority a written decision issued by a land use authority.(2)In the absence of an ordinance establishing a reasonable time to appeal, a land use applicant or adversely affected party shall have 10 calendar days to appeal to an appeal authority a written decision issued by a land use authority.

Section 250:
Section 250. Section 17-79-1005, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-705 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-70517-79-1005Effective 11/06/25. Burden of proof.The appellant has the burden of proving that the land use authority erred.

Section 251:
Section 251. Section 17-79-1006, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-706 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-70617-79-1006Effective 11/06/25. Due process.(1)Each appeal authority shall conduct each appeal and variance request as described by local ordinance.(2)Each appeal authority shall respect the due process rights of each of the participants.

Section 252:
Section 252. Section 17-79-1007, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-707 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-70717-79-1007Effective 11/06/25. Scope of review of factual matters on appeal -- Appeal authority requirements.(1)A county may, by ordinance, designate the scope of review of factual matters for appeals of land use authority decisions.(2)If the county fails to designate a scope of review of factual matters, the appeal authority shall review the matter de novo, without deference to the land use authority's determination of factual matters.(3)If the scope of review of factual matters is on the record, the appeal authority shall determine whether the record on appeal includes substantial evidence for each essential finding of fact.(4)The appeal authority shall:(a)determine the correctness of the land use authority's interpretation and application of the plain meaning of the land use regulations; and(b)interpret and apply a land use regulation to favor a land use application unless the land use regulation plainly restricts the land use application.(5)(a)An appeal authority's land use decision is a quasi-judicial act.(b)A legislative body may act as an appeal authority unless both the legislative body and the appealing party agree to allow a third party to act as the appeal authority.(6)Only a decision in which a land use authority has applied a land use regulation to a particular land use application, person, or parcel may be appealed to an appeal authority.

Section 253:
Section 253. Section 17-79-1008, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-708 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-70817-79-1008Effective 11/06/25. Final decision.(1)A decision of an appeal authority takes effect on the date when the appeal authority issues a written decision, or as otherwise provided by local ordinance.(2)A written decision, or other event as provided by ordinance, constitutes a final decision under Subsection 17-27a-801(2)(a)17-79-1009(2)(a) or a final action under Subsection 17-27a-801(4)17-79-1009(4).

Section 254:
Section 254. Section 17-79-1009, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-801 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-80117-79-1009Effective 11/06/25. No district court review until administrative remedies exhausted -- Time for filing -- Tolling of time -- Standards governing court review -- Record on review -- Staying of decision.(1)No person may challenge in district court a land use decision until that person has exhausted the person's administrative remedies as provided in Part 7, Appeal Authority and Variances, if applicable.(2)(a)Subject to Subsection (1), a land use applicant or adversely affected party may file a petition for review of a land use decision with the district court within 30 days after the decision is final.(b)(i)The time under Subsection (2)(a) to file a petition is tolled from the date a property owner files a request for arbitration of a constitutional taking issue with the property rights ombudsman under Section 13-43-204 until 30 days after:(A)the arbitrator issues a final award; or(B)the property rights ombudsman issues a written statement under Subsection 13-43-204(3)(b) declining to arbitrate or to appoint an arbitrator.(ii)A tolling under Subsection (2)(b)(i) operates only as to the specific constitutional taking issue that is the subject of the request for arbitration filed with the property rights ombudsman by a property owner.(iii)A request for arbitration filed with the property rights ombudsman after the time under Subsection (2)(a) to file a petition has expired does not affect the time to file a petition.(3)(a)A court shall:(i)presume that a land use regulation properly enacted under the authority of this chapter is valid; and(ii)determine only whether:(A)the land use regulation is expressly preempted by, or was enacted contrary to, state or federal law; and(B)it is reasonably debatable that the land use regulation is consistent with this chapter.(b)A court shall presume that a final land use decision of a land use authority or an appeal authority is valid unless the land use decision is:(i)arbitrary and capricious; or(ii)illegal.(c)(i)A land use decision is arbitrary and capricious if the land use decision is not supported by substantial evidence in the record.(ii)A land use decision is illegal if the land use decision:(A)is based on an incorrect interpretation of a land use regulation;(B)conflicts with the authority granted by this title; or(C)is contrary to law.(d)(i)A court may affirm or reverse a land use decision.(ii)If the court reverses a land use decision, the court shall remand the matter to the land use authority with instructions to issue a land use decision consistent with the court's decision.(4)The provisions of Subsection (2)(a) apply from the date on which the county takes final action on a land use application, if the county conformed with the notice provisions of Part 2, Notice, or for any person who had actual notice of the pending land use decision.(5)If the county has complied with Section 17-27a-20517-79-205, a challenge to the enactment of a land use regulation or general plan may not be filed with the district court more than 30 days after the enactment.(6)A challenge to a land use decision is barred unless the challenge is filed within 30 days after the land use decision is final.(7)(a)The land use authority or appeal authority, as the case may be, shall transmit to the reviewing court the record of the proceedings of the land use authority or appeal authority, including the minutes, findings, orders and, if available, a true and correct transcript of the proceedings.(b)If the proceeding was recorded, a transcript of that recording is a true and correct transcript for purposes of this Subsection (7).(8)(a)(i)If there is a record, the district court's review is limited to the record provided by the land use authority or appeal authority, as the case may be.(ii)The court may not accept or consider any evidence outside the record of the land use authority or appeal authority, as the case may be, unless that evidence was offered to the land use authority or appeal authority, respectively, and the court determines that the evidence was improperly excluded.(b)If there is no record, the court may call witnesses and take evidence.(9)(a)The filing of a petition does not stay the land use decision of the land use authority or appeal authority, as the case may be.(b)(i)Before filing a petition under this section or a request for mediation or arbitration of a constitutional taking issue under Section 13-43-204, a land use applicant may petition the appeal authority to stay the appeal authority's decision.(ii)Upon receipt of a petition to stay, the appeal authority may order the appeal authority's decision stayed pending district court review if the appeal authority finds the order to be in the best interest of the county.(iii)After a petition is filed under this section or a request for mediation or arbitration of a constitutional taking issue is filed under Section 13-43-204, the petitioner may seek an injunction staying the appeal authority's land use decision.(10)If the court determines that a party initiated or pursued a challenge to a land use decision on a land use application in bad faith, the court may award attorney fees.

Section 255:
Section 255. Section 17-79-1010, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-804 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-80417-79-1010Effective 11/06/25. Consent agreement.(1)A legislative body may, by resolution or ordinance, settle litigation initiated under Section 17-27a-80117-79-1009 regarding a land use decision with a property owner through a consent agreement.(2)A legislative body shall approve the consent agreement under Subsection (1) in a public meeting in accordance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(3)A legislative body is not required to present to a planning commission on any matter covered by a consent agreement.

Section 256:
Section 256. Section 17-80-101, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1201 is renumbered and amended to read:80. Counties and Housing Supply1. General Provisions17-27a-120117-80-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Affordable housing" means housing offered for sale at 80% or less of the median county home price for housing of that type.(2)"Agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17C-1-102.(3)"Base taxable value" means a property's taxable value as shown upon the assessment roll last equalized during the base year.(4)"Base year" means, for a proposed home ownership promotion zone area, a year beginning the first day of the calendar quarter determined by the last equalized tax roll before the adoption of the home ownership promotion zone.(5)"Division" means the Housing and Community Development Division within the Department of Workforce Services.(5)(6)"Home ownership promotion zone" means a home ownership promotion zone created pursuant toin accordance with this part.(7)"Implementation plan" means the implementation plan adopted as part of the moderate income housing element of a specified county's general plan.(8)"Initial report" means the one-time moderate income housing report described in Subsection 17-80-202(1).(9)"Internal accessory dwelling unit" means an accessory dwelling unit created:(a)within a primary dwelling;(b)within the footprint of the detached primary dwelling at the time the internal accessory dwelling unit is created; and(c)for the purpose of offering a long-term rental of 30 consecutive days or longer.(10)"Moderate income housing strategy" means a strategy described in Section 17-80-201.(6)(11)"Participant" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17C-1-102.(7)(12)"Participation agreement" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17C-1-102.(13)(a)"Primary dwelling" means a single-family dwelling that:(i)is detached; and(ii)is occupied as the primary residence of the owner of record.(b)"Primary dwelling" includes a garage if the garage:(i)is a habitable space; and(ii)is connected to the primary dwelling by a common wall.(8)(14)"Project improvements" means the same as that term is defined in Section 11-36a-102.(15)"Report" means an initial report or a subsequent report described in Section 17-80-202.(16)"Specified county" means a county of the first, second, or third class, which has a population of more than 5,000 in the county's unincorporated areas.(17)"Subsequent progress report" means the annual moderate income housing report described in Section 17-80-202.(9)(18)"System improvements" means the same as that term is defined in Section 11-36a-102.(10)(19)"Tax commission" means the State Tax Commission created in Section 59-1-201.(11)(20)(a)"Tax increment" means the difference between:(i)the amount of property tax revenue generated each tax year by a taxing entity from the area within a home ownership promotion zone, using the current assessed value and each taxing entity's current certified tax rate as defined in Section 59-2-924; and(ii)the amount of property tax revenue that would be generated from that same area using the base taxable value and each taxing entity's current certified tax rate as defined in Section 59-2-924.(b)"Tax increment" does not include property revenue from:(i)a multicounty assessing and collecting levy described in Subsection 59-2-1602(2); or(ii)a county additional property tax described in Subsection 59-2-1602(4).(12)(21)"Taxing entity" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17C-1-102.

Section 257:
Section 257. Section 17-80-102 is enacted to read:17-80-102Effective 11/06/25. Applicability.(1)The provisions of Chapter 79, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act, apply to this chapter.(2)The definitions in Section 17-80-101 are in addition to the definitions in Section 17-79-102, except that if there is any conflict between a definition in this chapter and a definition in Chapter 79, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act, the definition in this chapter prevails in regard to the provisions of this chapter.

Section 258:
Section 258. Section 17-80-201 is enacted to read:2. County Plans for Housing17-80-201Effective 11/06/25. Moderate income housing plan required.(1)A moderate income housing element of a general plan shall include a moderate income housing element that meets the requirements of this section.(2)For a specified county, as defined in Section 17-80-101, a moderate income housing element shall:(a)provide a realistic opportunity to meet the need for additional moderate income housing within the next five years;(b)select three or more moderate income housing strategies described in Subsections (3)(a)(ii)(A) through (V), or at least one moderate income housing strategy described in Subsections (3)(a)(ii)(W) through (BB), for implementation; and(c)include an implementation plan as provided in Subsection (4).(3)(a)In drafting the moderate income housing element, the county planning commission shall:(i)consider the Legislature's determination that counties should facilitate a reasonable opportunity for a variety of housing, including moderate income housing:(A)to meet the needs of people of various income levels living, working, or desiring to live or work in the community; and(B)to allow people with various incomes to benefit from and fully participate in all aspects of neighborhood and community life; and(ii)include an analysis of how the county will provide a realistic opportunity for the development of moderate income housing within the planning horizon, including a recommendation to implement three or more of the following moderate income housing strategies:(A)rezone for densities necessary to facilitate the production of moderate income housing;(B)demonstrate investment in the rehabilitation or expansion of infrastructure that facilitates the construction of moderate income housing;(C)demonstrate investment in the rehabilitation of existing uninhabitable housing stock into moderate income housing;(D)identify and utilize county general fund subsidies or other sources of revenue to waive construction related fees that are otherwise generally imposed by the county for the construction or rehabilitation of moderate income housing;(E)create or allow for, and reduce regulations related to, internal or detached accessory dwelling units in residential zones;(F)zone or rezone for higher density or moderate income residential development in commercial or mixed-use zones, commercial centers, or employment centers;(G)amend land use regulations to allow for higher density or new moderate income residential development in commercial or mixed-use zones near major transit investment corridors;(H)amend land use regulations to eliminate or reduce parking requirements for residential development where a resident is less likely to rely on the resident's own vehicle, such as residential development near major transit investment corridors or senior living facilities;(I)amend land use regulations to allow for single room occupancy developments;(J)implement zoning incentives for moderate income units in new developments;(K)preserve existing and new moderate income housing and subsidized units by utilizing a landlord incentive program, providing for deed restricted units through a grant program, or establishing a housing loss mitigation fund;(L)reduce, waive, or eliminate impact fees related to moderate income housing;(M)demonstrate creation of, or participation in, a community land trust program for moderate income housing;(N)implement a mortgage assistance program for employees of the county, an employer that provides contracted services for the county, or any other public employer that operates within the county;(O)apply for or partner with an entity that applies for state or federal funds or tax incentives to promote the construction of moderate income housing, an entity that applies for programs offered by the Utah Housing Corporation within that agency's funding capacity, an entity that applies for affordable housing programs administered by the Department of Workforce Services, an entity that applies for services provided by a public housing authority to preserve and create moderate income housing, or any other entity that applies for programs or services that promote the construction or preservation of moderate income housing;(P)demonstrate utilization of a moderate income housing set aside from a community reinvestment agency, redevelopment agency, or community development and renewal agency to create or subsidize moderate income housing;(Q)eliminate impact fees for any accessory dwelling unit that is not an internal accessory dwelling unit as defined in Section 17-79-611;(R)create a program to transfer development rights for moderate income housing;(S)ratify a joint acquisition agreement with another local political subdivision for the purpose of combining resources to acquire property for moderate income housing;(T)develop a moderate income housing project for residents who are disabled or 55 years old or older;(U)create or allow for, and reduce regulations related to, multifamily residential dwellings compatible in scale and form with detached single-family residential dwellings and located in walkable communities within residential or mixed-use zones;(V)demonstrate implementation of any other program or strategy to address the housing needs of residents of the county who earn less than 80% of the area median income, including the dedication of a local funding source to moderate income housing or the adoption of a land use ordinance that requires 10% or more of new residential development in a residential zone be dedicated to moderate income housing;(W)create a housing and transit reinvestment zone in accordance with Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 6, Housing and Transit Reinvestment Zone Act;(X)create a home ownership investment zone in accordance with Part 5, Home Ownership Promotion Zone;(Y)create a first home investment zone in accordance with Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 16, First Home Investment Zone Act;(Z)approve a project that receives funding from, or qualifies to receive funding from, the Utah Homes Investment Program created in Title 51, Chapter 12, Utah Homes Investment Program;(AA)adopt or approve a qualifying affordable home ownership density bonus for single-family residential units, as described in Section 17-80-401; and(BB)adopt or approve an affordable home ownership density bonus for multi-family residential units, as described in Section 17-80-402.(b)The planning commission shall identify each moderate income housing strategy recommended to the legislative body for implementation by restating the exact language used to describe the strategy in Subsection (3)(a)(ii).(4)(a)In drafting the implementation plan portion of the moderate income housing element as described in Subsection (2)(c), the planning commission shall recommend to the legislative body the establishment of a five-year timeline for implementing each of the moderate income housing strategies selected by the county for implementation.(b)The timeline described in Subsection (4)(a) shall:(i)identify specific measures and benchmarks for implementing each moderate income housing strategy selected by the county; and(ii)provide flexibility for the county to make adjustments as needed.

Section 259:
Section 259. Section 17-80-202, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-408 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-40817-80-202Effective 11/06/25. Moderate income housing report -- Contents -- Prioritization for funds or projects -- Ineligibility for funds after noncompliance -- Civil actions.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Division" means the Housing and Community Development Division within the Department of Workforce Services.(b)"Implementation plan" means the implementation plan adopted as part of the moderate income housing element of a specified county's general plan as provided in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(f).(c)"Initial report" means the one-time moderate income housing report described in Subsection (2).(d)"Moderate income housing strategy" means a strategy described in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(b)(ii).(e)"Report" means an initial report or a subsequent report.(f)"Specified county" means a county of the first, second, or third class, which has a population of more than 5,000 in the county's unincorporated areas.(g)"Subsequent progress report" means the annual moderate income housing report described in Subsection (3).(2)(1)(a)The legislative body of a specified county shall annually submit an initial report to the division.(b)(i)This Subsection (2)(b)(1)(b) applies to a county that is not a specified county as of January 1, 2023.(ii)As of January 1, if a county described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) changes from one class to another or grows in population to qualify as a specified county, the county shall submit an initial plan to the division on or before August 1 of the first calendar year beginning on January 1 in which the county qualifies as a specified county.(c)The initial report shall:(i)identify each moderate income housing strategy selected by the specified county for continued, ongoing, or one-time implementation, using the exact language used to describe the moderate income housing strategy in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(b)(ii); and(ii)include an implementation plan.(3)(2)(a)After the division approves a specified county's initial report under this section, the specified county shall, as an administrative act, annually submit to the division a subsequent progress report on or before August 1 of each year after the year in which the specified county is required to submit the initial report.(b)The subsequent progress report shall include:(i)subject to Subsection (3)(c)(2)(c), a description of each action, whether one-time or ongoing, taken by the specified county during the previous 12-month period to implement the moderate income housing strategies identified in the initial report for implementation;(ii)a description of each land use regulation or land use decision made by the specified county during the previous 12-month period to implement the moderate income housing strategies, including an explanation of how the land use regulation or land use decision supports the specified county's efforts to implement the moderate income housing strategies;(iii)a description of any barriers encountered by the specified county in the previous 12-month period in implementing the moderate income housing strategies;(iv)the number of residential dwelling units that have been entitled that have not received a building permit as of the submission date of the progress report;(v)shapefiles, or website links if shapefiles are not available, to current maps and tables related to zoning;(vi)information regarding the number of internal and external or detached accessory dwelling units located within the specified county for which the specified county:(A)issued a building permit to construct; or(B)issued a business license or comparable license or permit to rent;(vii)a description of how the market has responded to the selected moderate income housing strategies, including the number of entitled moderate income housing units or other relevant data; and(viii)any recommendations on how the state can support the specified county in implementing the moderate income housing strategies.(c)For purposes of describing actions taken by a specified county under Subsection (3)(b)(i)(2)(b)(i), the specified county may include an ongoing action taken by the specified county prior tobefore the 12-month reporting period applicable to the subsequent progress report if the specified county:(i)has already adopted an ordinance, approved a land use application, made an investment, or approved an agreement or financing that substantially promotes the implementation of a moderate income housing strategy identified in the initial report; and(ii)demonstrates in the subsequent progress report that the action taken under Subsection (3)(c)(i)(2)(b)(i) is relevant to making meaningful progress towards the specified county's implementation plan.(d)A specified county's report shall be in a form:(i)approved by the division; and(ii)made available by the division on or before May 1 of the year in which the report is required.(4)(3)Within 90 days after the day on which the division receives a specified county's report, the division shall:(a)post the report on the division's website;(b)send a copy of the report to the Department of Transportation, the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, the association of governments in which the specified county is located, and, if the unincorporated area of the specified county is located within the boundaries of a metropolitan planning organization, the appropriate metropolitan planning organization; and(c)subject to Subsection (5)(4), review the report to determine compliance with this section.(5)(4)(a)An initial report complies with this section if the report:(i)includes the information required under Subsection (2)(c)(1)(c);(ii)demonstrates to the division that the specified county made plans to implement three or more moderate income housing strategies described in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(b)(ii)(A) thoughSubsections 17-80-201(3)(a)(ii)(A) through (V) or at least one moderate income housing strategy described in Subsections 17-27a-403(2)(b)(ii)(W)17-80-201(3)(a)(ii)(W) through (BB); and(iii)is in a form approved by the division.(b)A subsequent progress report complies with this section if the report:(i)demonstrates to the division that the specified county made plans to implement or is implementing three or more moderate income housing strategies described in Subsection 17-27a-403(2)(b)(ii)(A)Subsections 17-80-201(3)(a)(ii)(A) though (V) or at least one moderate income housing strategy described in Subsections 17-27a-403(2)(b)(ii)(W)17-80-201(3)(a)(ii)(W) through (BB);(ii)is in a form approved by the division; and(iii)provides sufficient information for the division to:(A)assess the specified county's progress in implementing the moderate income housing strategies;(B)monitor compliance with the specified county's implementation plan;(C)identify a clear correlation between the specified county's land use decisions and efforts to implement the moderate income housing strategies;(D)identify how the market has responded to the specified county's selected moderate income housing strategies; and(E)identify any barriers encountered by the specified county in implementing the selected moderate income housing strategies.(c)If a specified county initial report or subsequent progress report demonstrates the county plans to implement or is implementing at least one moderate income housing strategy described in Subsections 17-27a-403(2)(b)(ii)(W)17-80-201(3)(a)(ii)(W) through (BB), the division shall also consider the specified county compliant with the reporting requirement described in this section for:(i)the year in which the specified county submits the report; and(ii)two subsequent reporting years.(6)(5)(a)A specified county qualifies for priority consideration under this Subsection (6)(5) if the specified county's report:(i)complies with this section; and(ii)demonstrates to the division that the specified county made plans to implement five or more moderate income housing strategies.(b)The Transportation Commission may, in accordance with Subsection 72-1-304(3)(c), give priority consideration to transportation projects located within the unincorporated areas of a specified county described in Subsection (6)(a)(5)(a) until the Department of Transportation receives notice from the division under Subsection (6)(e)(5)(e).(c)Upon determining that a specified county qualifies for priority consideration under this Subsection (6)(5), the division shall send a notice of prioritization to the legislative body of the specified county and the Department of Transportation.(d)The notice described in Subsection (6)(c)(5)(c) shall:(i)name the specified county that qualifies for priority consideration;(ii)describe the funds or projects for which the specified county qualifies to receive priority consideration; and(iii)state the basis for the division's determination that the specified county qualifies for priority consideration.(e)The division shall notify the legislative body of a specified county and the Department of Transportation in writing if the division determines that the specified county no longer qualifies for priority consideration under this Subsection (6)(5).(7)(6)(a)If the division, after reviewing a specified county's report, determines that the report does not comply with this section, the division shall send a notice of noncompliance to the legislative body of the specified county.(b)A specified county that receives a notice of noncompliance may:(i)cure each deficiency in the report within 90 days after the day on which the notice of noncompliance is sent; or(ii)request an appeal of the division's determination of noncompliance within 10 days after the day on which the notice of noncompliance is sent.(c)The notice described in Subsection (7)(a)(6)(a) shall:(i)describe each deficiency in the report and the actions needed to cure each deficiency;(ii)state that the specified county has an opportunity to:(A)submit to the division a corrected report that cures each deficiency in the report within 90 days after the day on which the notice of noncompliance is sent; or(B)submit to the division a request for an appeal of the division's determination of noncompliance within 10 days after the day on which the notice of noncompliance is sent; and(iii)state that failure to take action under Subsection (7)(c)(ii)(6)(c)(ii) will result in the specified county's ineligibility for funds and fees owed under Subsection (9)(8).(d)For purposes of curing the deficiencies in a report under this Subsection (7)(6), if the action needed to cure the deficiency as described by the division requires the specified county to make a legislative change, the specified county may cure the deficiency by making that legislative change within the 90-day cure period.(e)(i)If a specified county submits to the division a corrected report in accordance with Subsection (7)(b)(i)(6)(b)(i), and the division determines that the corrected report does not comply with this section, the division shall send a second notice of noncompliance to the legislative body of the specified county.(ii)A specified county that receives a second notice of noncompliance may request an appeal of the division's determination of noncompliance within 10 days after the day on which the second notice of noncompliance is sent.(iii)The notice described in Subsection (7)(e)(i)(6)(e)(i) shall:(A)state that the specified county has an opportunity to submit to the division a request for an appeal of the division's determination of noncompliance within 10 days after the day on which the second notice of noncompliance is sent; and(B)state that failure to take action under Subsection (7)(e)(iii)(A)(6)(e)(iii)(A) will result in the specified county's ineligibility for funds under Subsection (9)(8).(8)(7)(a)A specified county that receives a notice of noncompliance under Subsection (7)(a)(6)(a) or (7)(e)(i)(6)(e)(i) may request an appeal of the division's determination of noncompliance within 10 days after the day on which the notice of noncompliance is sent.(b)Within 90 days after the day on which the division receives a request for an appeal, an appeal board consisting of the following three members shall review and issue a written decision on the appeal:(i)one individual appointed by the Utah Association of Counties;(ii)one individual appointed by the Utah Homebuilders Association; and(iii)one individual appointed by the presiding member of the association of governments, established pursuant toin accordance with an interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, of which the specified county is a member.(c)The written decision of the appeal board shall either uphold or reverse the division's determination of noncompliance.(d)The appeal board's written decision on the appeal is final.(9)(8)(a)A specified county is ineligible for funds and owes a fee under this Subsection (9)(8) if:(i)the specified county fails to submit a report to the division;(ii)after submitting a report to the division, the division determines that the report does not comply with this section and the specified county fails to:(A)cure each deficiency in the report within 90 days after the day on which the notice of noncompliance is sent; or(B)request an appeal of the division's determination of noncompliance within 10 days after the day on which the notice of noncompliance is sent;(iii)after submitting to the division a corrected report to cure the deficiencies in a previously submitted report, the division determines that the corrected report does not comply with this section and the specified county fails to request an appeal of the division's determination of noncompliance within 10 days after the day on which the second notice of noncompliance is sent; or(iv)after submitting a request for an appeal under Subsection (8)(7), the appeal board issues a written decision upholding the division's determination of noncompliance.(b)The following apply to a specified county described in Subsection (9)(a)(8)(a) until the division provides notice under Subsection (9)(e)(8)(e):(i)the executive director of the Department of Transportation may not program funds from the Transportation Investment Fund of 2005, including the Transit Transportation Investment Fund, to projects located within the unincorporated areas of the specified county in accordance with Subsection 72-2-124(6);(ii)beginning with the report submitted in 2024, the specified county shall pay a fee to the Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund in the amount of $250 per day that the specified county:(A)fails to submit the report to the division in accordance with this section, beginning the day after the day on which the report was due; or(B)fails to cure the deficiencies in the report, beginning the day after the day by which the cure was required to occur as described in the notice of noncompliance under Subsection (7)(6); and(iii)beginning with the report submitted in 2025, the specified county shall pay a fee to the Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund in the amount of $500 per day that the specified county, for a consecutive year:(A)fails to submit the report to the division in accordance with this section, beginning the day after the day on which the report was due; or(B)fails to cure the deficiencies in the report, beginning the day after the day by which the cure was required to occur as described in the notice of noncompliance under Subsection (7)(6).(c)Upon determining that a specified county is ineligible for funds under this Subsection (9)(8), and is required to pay a fee under Subsection (9)(b)(8)(b), if applicable, the division shall send a notice of ineligibility to the legislative body of the specified county, the Department of Transportation, the State Tax Commission, and the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.(d)The notice described in Subsection (9)(c)(8)(c) shall:(i)name the specified county that is ineligible for funds;(ii)describe the funds for which the specified county is ineligible to receive;(iii)describe the fee the specified county is required to pay under Subsection (9)(b)(8)(b), if applicable; and(iv)state the basis for the division's determination that the specified county is ineligible for funds.(e)The division shall notify the legislative body of a specified county and the Department of Transportation in writing if the division determines that the provisions of this Subsection (9)(8) no longer apply to the specified county.(f)The division may not determine that a specified county that is required to pay a fee under Subsection (9)(b)(8)(b) is in compliance with the reporting requirements of this section until the specified county pays all outstanding fees required under Subsection (9)(b)(8)(b) to the Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund, created under Title 35A, Chapter 8, Part 5, Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund.(10)(9)In a civil action seeking enforcement or claiming a violation of this section or of Subsection 17-27a-404(5)(c)17-79-404(5)(c), a plaintiff may not recover damages but may be awarded only injunctive or other equitable relief.

Section 260:
Section 260. Section 17-80-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-531 is renumbered and amended to read:3. Land Use Regulations Unique to Residential Zones and Residential Units17-27a-53117-80-301Effective 11/06/25. Moderate income housing.(1)A county may only require the development of a certain number of moderate income housing units as a condition of approval of a land use application if:(a)the county and the applicant enter into a written agreement regarding the number of moderate income housing units;(b)the county provides incentives for an applicant who agrees to include moderate income housing units in a development; or(c)the county offers or approves, and an applicant accepts, an incentive described in Section 17-27a-403.117-80-401 or 17-27a-403.217-80-402.(2)If an applicant does not agree to participate in the development of moderate income housing units under Subsection (1)(a) or (b), a county may not take into consideration the applicant's decision in the county's determination of whether to approve or deny a land use application.(3)Notwithstanding Subsections (1) and (2), a county of the third class, which has a ski resort located within the unincorporated area of the county, may require the development of a certain number of moderate income housing units as a condition of approval of a land use application if the requirement is in accordance with an ordinance enacted by the county before January 1, 2022.

Section 261:
Section 261. Section 17-80-302, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-513 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-51317-80-302Effective 11/06/25. Manufactured homes.(1)For purposes of this section, a manufactured home ismeans the same as that term is defined in Section 15A-1-302, except that the manufactured home shall be attached to a permanent foundation in accordance with plans providing for vertical loads, uplift, and lateral forces and frost protection in compliance with the applicable building code.  All appendages, including carports, garages, storage buildings, additions, or alterations shall be built in compliance with the applicable building code.(2)A manufactured home may not be excluded from any land use zone or area in which a single-family residence would be permitted, provided the manufactured home  complies with all local land use ordinances, building codes, and any restrictive covenants, applicable to a single-family residence within that zone or area.(3)A county may not:(a)adopt or enforce an ordinance or regulation that treats a proposed development that includes manufactured homes differently than one that does not include manufactured homes; or(b)reject a development plan based on the fact that the development is expected to contain manufactured homes.

Section 262:
Section 262. Section 17-80-303, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-526 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-52617-80-303Effective 11/06/25. Internal accessory dwelling units.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Internal accessory dwelling unit" means an accessory dwelling unit created:(i)within a primary dwelling;(ii)within the footprint of the primary dwelling described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) at the time the internal accessory dwelling unit is created; and(iii)for the purpose of offering a long-term rental of 30 consecutive days or longer.(b)(i)"Primary dwelling" means a single-family dwelling that:(A)is detached; and(B)is occupied as the primary residence of the owner of record.(ii)"Primary dwelling" includes a garage if the garage:(A)is a habitable space; and(B)is connected to the primary dwelling by a common wall.(2)(1)In any area zoned primarily for residential use:(a)the use of an internal accessory dwelling unit is a permitted use;(b)except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3) and (4), a county may not establish any restrictions or requirements for the construction or use of one internal accessory dwelling unit within a primary dwelling, including a restriction or requirement governing:(i)the size of the internal accessory dwelling unit in relation to the primary dwelling;(ii)total lot size;(iii)street frontage; or(iv)internal connectivity; and(c)a county's regulation of architectural elements for internal accessory dwelling units shall be consistent with the regulation of single-family units, including single-family units located in historic districts.(3)(2)An internal accessory dwelling unit shall comply with all applicable building, health, and fire codes.(4)(3)A county may:(a)prohibit the installation of a separate utility meter for an internal accessory dwelling unit;(b)require that an internal accessory dwelling unit be designed in a manner that does not change the appearance of the primary dwelling as a single-family dwelling;(c)require a primary dwelling:(i)regardless of whether the primary dwelling is existing or new construction, to include one additional on-site parking space for an internal accessory dwelling unit, in addition to the parking spaces required under the county's land use ordinance, except that if the county's land use ordinance requires four off-street parking spaces, the county may not require the additional space contemplated under this Subsection (4)(c)(i)(3)(c)(i); and(ii)to replace any parking spaces contained within a garage or carport if an internal accessory dwelling unit is created within the garage or carport and is habitable space;(d)prohibit the creation of an internal accessory dwelling unit within a mobile home as defined in Section 57-16-3;(e)require the owner of a primary dwelling to obtain a permit or license for renting an internal accessory dwelling unit;(f)prohibit the creation of an internal accessory dwelling unit within a zoning district covering an area that is equivalent to 25% or less of the total unincorporated area in the county that is zoned primarily for residential use, except that the county may not prohibit newly constructed internal accessory dwelling units that:(i)have a final plat approval dated on or after October 1, 2021; and(ii)comply with applicable land use regulations;(g)prohibit the creation of an internal accessory dwelling unit if the primary dwelling is served by a failing septic tank;(h)prohibit the creation of an internal accessory dwelling unit if the lot containing the primary dwelling is 6,000 square feet or less in size;(i)prohibit the rental or offering the rental of an internal accessory dwelling unit for a period of less than 30 consecutive days;(j)prohibit the rental of an internal accessory dwelling unit if the internal accessory dwelling unit is located in a dwelling that is not occupied as the owner's primary residence;(k)hold a lien against a property that contains an internal accessory dwelling unit in accordance with Subsection (5)(4); and(l)record a notice for an internal accessory dwelling unit in accordance with Subsection (6)(5).(5)(4)(a)In addition to any other legal or equitable remedies available to a county, a county may hold a lien against a property that contains an internal accessory dwelling unit if:(i)the owner of the property violates any of the provisions of this section or any ordinance adopted under Subsection (4)(3);(ii)the county provides a written notice of violation in accordance with Subsection (5)(b)(4)(b);(iii)the county holds a hearing and determines that the violation has occurred in accordance with Subsection (5)(d)(4)(d), if the owner files a written objection in accordance with Subsection (5)(b)(iv)(4)(b)(iv);(iv)the owner fails to cure the violation within the time period prescribed in the written notice of violation under Subsection (5)(b)(4)(b);(v)the county provides a written notice of lien in accordance with Subsection (5)(c)(4)(c); and(vi)the county records a copy of the written notice of lien described in Subsection (5)(a)(v)(4)(a)(v) with the county recorder of the county in which the property is located.(b)The written notice of violation shall:(i)describe the specific violation;(ii)provide the owner of the internal accessory dwelling unit a reasonable opportunity to cure the violation that is:(A)no less than 14 days after the day on which the county sends the written notice of violation, if the violation results from the owner renting or offering to rent the internal accessory dwelling unit for a period of less than 30 consecutive days; or(B)no less than 30 days after the day on which the county sends the written notice of violation, for any other violation;(iii)state that if the owner of the property fails to cure the violation within the time period described in Subsection (5)(b)(ii)(4)(b)(ii), the county may hold a lien against the property in an amount of up to $100 for each day of violation after the day on which the opportunity to cure the violation expires;(iv)notify the owner of the property:(A)that the owner may file a written objection to the violation within 14 days after the day on which the written notice of violation is post-marked or posted on the property; and(B)of the name and address of the county office where the owner may file the written objection;(v)be mailed to:(A)the property's owner of record; and(B)any other individual designated to receive notice in the owner's license or permit records; and(vi)be posted on the property.(c)The written notice of lien shall:(i)comply with the requirements of Section 38-12-102;(ii)describe the specific violation;(iii)specify the lien amount, in an amount of up to $100 for each day of violation after the day on which the opportunity to cure the violation expires;(iv)be mailed to:(A)the property's owner of record; and(B)any other individual designated to receive notice in the owner's license or permit records; and(v)be posted on the property.(d)(i)If an owner of property files a written objection in accordance with Subsection (5)(b)(iv)(4)(b)(iv), the county shall:(A)hold a hearing in accordance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, to conduct a review and determine whether the specific violation described in the written notice of violation under Subsection (5)(b)(4)(b) has occurred; and(B)notify the owner in writing of the date, time, and location of the hearing described in Subsection (5)(d)(i)(A)(4)(d)(i)(A) no less than 14 days before the day on which the hearing is held.(ii)If an owner of property files a written objection under Subsection (5)(b)(iv)(4)(b)(iv), a county may not record a lien under this Subsection (5)(4) until the county holds a hearing and determines that the specific violation has occurred.(iii)If the county determines at the hearing that the specific violation has occurred, the county may impose a lien in an amount of up to $100 for each day of violation after the day on which the opportunity to cure the violation expires, regardless of whether the hearing is held after the day on which the opportunity to cure the violation has expired.(e)If an owner cures a violation within the time period prescribed in the written notice of violation under Subsection (5)(b)(4)(b), the county may not hold a lien against the property, or impose any penalty or fee on the owner, in relation to the specific violation described in the written notice of violation under Subsection (5)(b)(4)(b).(6)(5)(a)A county that issues, on or after October 1, 2021, a permit or license to an owner of a primary dwelling to rent an internal accessory dwelling unit, or a building permit to an owner of a primary dwelling to create an internal accessory dwelling unit, may record a notice in the office of the recorder of the county in which the primary dwelling is located.(b)The notice described in Subsection (6)(a)(5)(a) shall include:(i)a description of the primary dwelling;(ii)a statement that the primary dwelling contains an internal accessory dwelling unit; and(iii)a statement that the internal accessory dwelling unit may only be used in accordance with the county's land use regulations.(c)The county shall, upon recording the notice described in Subsection (6)(a)(5)(a), deliver a copy of the notice to the owner of the internal accessory dwelling unit.

Section 263:
Section 263. Section 17-80-401, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-403.1 is renumbered and amended to read:4. Optional Tools for Counties to Promote Housing Supply17-27a-403.117-80-401Effective 11/06/25. Affordable home ownership density bonus for single-family residential units.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Affordable housing" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-403.2.(b)"Owner-occupier" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-403.2.(c)"Qualifying affordable home ownership single-family density bonus" means:(i)for an area with an underlying zoning density of less than six residential units per acre, county approval of a density at least six residential units per acre; or(ii)for an area with an underlying zoning density of six residential units per acre or more, county approval of a density at least 0.5 residential units per acre greater than the underlying zoning density for the area.(2)If a county approves a qualifying affordable home ownership single-family density bonus, either through a zoning ordinance or a development agreement, the county may adopt requirements for the qualifying affordable home ownership single-family density bonus area to ensure:(a)at least 60% of the total single-family residential units be deed-restricted to owner-occupancy for at least five years;(b)at least 25% of the total single-family residential units qualify as affordable housing;(c)at least 25% of the single-family residential units per acre to be no larger than 1,600 square feet; or(d)the applicant creates a preferential qualifying buyer program in which a single-family residential unit is initially offered for sale, for up to 30 days, to a category of preferred qualifying buyers established by the county, in accordance with provisions of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601.(3)A county may offer additional incentives in a qualifying affordable home ownership single-family density bonus area approved for single-family residential units to promote owner-occupied, affordable housing.

Section 264:
Section 264. Section 17-80-402, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-403.2 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-403.217-80-402Effective 11/06/25. Affordable home ownership density bonus for multi-family residential units.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Affordable housing" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-403.2.(b)"Owner-occupier" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-9a-403.2.(c)"Qualifying affordable home ownership multi-family density bonus" means county approval of a density of at least 20 residential units per acre.(2)If a county approves a qualifying affordable home ownership multi-family density bonus, either through a zoning ordinance or a development agreement, the county may adopt requirements for the qualifying affordable home ownership multi-family density bonus area to ensure:(a)at least 20% more residential units per acre than are otherwise allowed in the area; (b)at least 60% of the total units in the multi-family residential building be deed-restricted to owner-occupancy for at least five years;(c)at least 25% of the total units in the multi-family residential building qualify as affordable housing;(d)at least 25% of the total units in a multi-family residential building to be no larger than 1,600 square feet; or(e)the applicant creates a preferential qualifying buyer program in which a unit in a multi-family residential building is initially offered for sale, for up to 30 days, to a category of preferred qualifying buyers established by the county, in accordance with provisions of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601.(3)A county may offer additional incentives in a qualifying affordable home ownership multi-family density bonus area for multi-family residential units to promote owner-occupied, affordable housing.

Section 265:
Section 265. Section 17-80-501, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1202 is renumbered and amended to read:5. Home Ownership Promotion Zone17-27a-120217-80-501Effective 11/06/25. County designation of a home ownership promotion zone.(1)Subject to Sections 17-27a-120317-80-502 and 17-27a-120417-80-503, a county may create a home ownership promotion zone as described in this section.(2)A home ownership promotion zone created under this section:(a)is an area of 10 contiguous unincorporated acres or less located entirely within the boundaries of the county, zoned for fewer than six housing units per acre before the creation of the home ownership promotion zone;(b)shall be re-zoned for at least six housing units per acre; and(c)may not be encumbered by any residential building permits as of the day on which the home ownership promotion zone is created.(3)(a)The county shall designate the home ownership promotion zone by resolution of the legislative body of the county following:(i)the recommendation of the county planning commission; and(ii)the notification requirements described in Section 17-27a-120417-80-503.(b)The resolution described in Subsection (3)(a) shall describe how the home ownership promotion zone created pursuant toin accordance with this section meets the objectives and requirements of Section 17-27a-120317-80-502.(c)The home ownership promotion zone is created on the effective date of the resolution described in Subsection (3)(a).(4)If a home ownership promotion zone is created as described in this section:(a)affected local taxing entities are required to participate according to the requirements of the home ownership promotion zone established by the county; and(b)each affected taxing entity is required to participate at the same rate.(5)A home ownership promotion zone may be modified by the same manner it is created as described in Subsection (3).(6)Within 30 days after the day on which the county creates the home ownership promotion zone as described in Subsection (3), the county shall:(a)record with the recorder a document containing:(i)a description of the land within the home ownership promotion zone; and(ii)the date of creation of the home ownership promotion zone;(b)transmit a copy of the description of the land within the home ownership promotion zone and an accurate map or plat indicating the boundaries of the home ownership promotion zone to the Utah Geospatial Resource Center created under Section 63A-16-505; and(c)transmit a map and description of the land within the home ownership promotion zone to:(i)the auditor, recorder, attorney, surveyor, and assessor of the county in which any part of the home ownership promotion zone is located;(ii)the officer or officers performing the function of auditor or assessor for each taxing entity that does not use the county assessment roll or collect the taxing entity's taxes through the county;(iii)the legislative body or governing board of each taxing entity impacted by the home ownership promotion zone;(iv)the tax commission; and(v)the State Board of Education.(7)A county may receive tax increment and use home ownership promotion zone funds as described in Section 17-27a-120517-80-504.

Section 266:
Section 266. Section 17-80-502, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1203 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-120317-80-502Effective 11/06/25. Applicability, requirements, and limitations.(1)A home ownership promotion zone shall promote the following objectives:(a)increasing availability of housing, including affordable housing;(b)promotion of home ownership;(c)overcoming development impediments and market conditions that render an affordable housing development cost prohibitive absent the incentives resulting from a home ownership promotion zone; and(d)conservation of water resources through efficient land use.(2)In order to accomplish the objectives described in Subsection (1), a county shall ensure that:(a)land inside the proposed home ownership promotion zone is zoned as residential, with at least six planned housing units per acre;(b)at least 60% of the proposed housing units within the home ownership promotion zone are affordable housing units; and(c)all of the proposed housing units within the home ownership promotion zone are deed restricted to require owner occupation for at least five years.(3)A county may restrict short term rentals in a home ownership promotion zone.(4)A county may not create a home ownership promotion zone if:(a)the proposed home ownership promotion zone would overlap with a school district and:(i)(A)the school district has more than one municipality within the school district's boundaries; and(B)the school district already has 100 acres designated as home ownership promotion zone within the school district's boundaries; or(ii)(A)the school district has one municipality within the school district's boundaries; and(B)the school district already has 50 acres designated as home ownership promotion zone within the school district's boundaries; or(b)the area in the proposed home ownership promotion zone would overlap with:(i)a project area, as that term is defined in Section 17C-1-102, and created under Title 17C, Chapter 1, Agency Operations, until the project area is dissolved pursuant toin accordance with Section 17C-1-702; or(ii)an existing housing and transit reinvestment zone.

Section 267:
Section 267. Section 17-80-503, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1204 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-120417-80-503Effective 11/06/25. Notification before creation of a home ownership promotion zone.(1)(a)As used in this section, "hearing" means a public meeting in which the legislative body of a county:(i)considers a resolution creating a home ownership promotion zone; and(ii)takes public comment on a proposed home ownership promotion zone.(b)A hearing under this section may be combined with any other public meeting of a legislative body of a county.(2)Before a county creates a home ownership promotion zone as described in Section 17-27a-120217-80-501, itthe county shall provide notice of a hearing as described in this section.(3)The notice required by Subsection (2) shall be given by:(a)publishing notice for the county, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 14 days before the day on which the legislative body of the county intends to have a hearing;(b)at least 30 days before the hearing, mailing notice to:(i)each record owner of property located within the proposed home ownership promotion zone;(ii)the State Tax Commission; and(iii)(A)if the proposed home ownership promotion zone is subject to a taxing entity committee, each member of the taxing entity committee and the State Board of Education; or(B)if the proposed home ownership promotion zone is not subject to a taxing entity committee, the legislative body or governing board of each taxing entity within the boundaries of the proposed home ownership promotion zone.(4)The mailing of the notice to record property owners required under Subsection (3)(b) shall be conclusively considered to have been properly completed if:(a)the county mails the notice to the property owners as shown in the records, including an electronic database, of the county recorder's office and at the addresses shown in those records; and(b)the county recorder's office records used by the agency in identifying owners to whom the notice is mailed and their addresses were obtained or accessed from the county recorder's office no earlier than 30 days before the mailing.(5)The county shall include in each notice required under this section:(a)(i)a boundary description of the proposed home ownership promotion zone; or(ii)(A)a mailing address or telephone number where a person may request that a copy of the boundary description of the proposed home ownership promotion zone be sent at no cost to the person by mail, email, or facsimile transmission; and(B)if the agency or community has an Internet website, an Internet address where a person may gain access to an electronic, printable copy of the boundary description of the proposed home ownership promotion zone;(b)a map of the boundaries of the proposed home ownership promotion zone;(c)an explanation of the purpose of the hearing; and(d)a statement of the date, time, and location of the hearing.(6)The county shall include in each notice under Subsection (3)(b):(a)a statement that property tax revenue resulting from an increase in valuation of property within the proposed home ownership promotion zone will be paid to the county for proposed home ownership promotion zone development rather than to the taxing entity to which the tax revenue would otherwise have been paid; and(b)an invitation to the recipient of the notice to submit to the county comments concerning the subject matter of the hearing before the date of the hearing.(7)A county may include in a notice under Subsection (2) any other information the county considers necessary or advisable, including the public purpose achieved by the proposed home ownership promotion zone.

Section 268:
Section 268. Section 17-80-504, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1205 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-120517-80-504Effective 11/06/25. Payment, use, and administration of revenue from a home ownership promotion zone.(1)(a)A county may receive tax increment and use home ownership promotion zone funds in accordance with this section.(b)The maximum amount of time that a county may receive and use tax increment pursuant tocollected from a home ownership promotion zone is 15 consecutive years.(2)A county that collects property tax on property located within a home ownership promotion zone shall, in accordance with Section 59-2-1365, retain 60% of the tax increment collected from property within the home ownership promotion zone to be used as described in this section.(3)(a)Tax increment retained by a county in accordance with Subsection (2) is not revenue of the taxing entity or county, but home ownership promotion zone funds.(b)Home ownership promotion zone funds may be administered by an agency created by the county within which the home ownership promotion zone is located.(c)Before an agency may receive home ownership promotion zone funds from a county, the agency shall enter into an interlocal agreement with the county.(4)(a)A county or agency shall use home ownership promotion zone funds within, or for the direct benefit of, the home ownership promotion zone.(b)If any home ownership promotion zone funds will be used outside of the home ownership promotion zone, the legislative body of the county shall make a finding that the use of the home ownership promotion zone funds outside of the home ownership promotion zone will directly benefit the home ownership promotion zone.(5)A county or agency shall use home ownership promotion zone funds to achieve the purposes described in Section 17-27a-120317-80-502 by paying all or part of the costs of any of the following:(a)project improvement costs;(b)systems improvement costs;(c)water exaction costs;(d)street lighting costs;(e)environmental remediation costs; or(f)the costs of the county to create and administer the home ownership promotion zone, which may not exceed 3% of the total home ownership promotion zone funds.(6)Home ownership promotion zone funds may be paid to a participant, if the county and participant enter into a participation agreement which requires the participant to utilize the home ownership promotion zone funds as allowed in this section.(7)Home ownership promotion zone funds may be used to pay all of the costs of bonds issued by the county in accordance with Title 17C, Chapter 1, Part 5, Agency Bonds, including the cost to issue and repay the bonds including interest.(8)A county may:(a)create one or more public infrastructure districts within home ownership promotion zone under Title 17D, Chapter 4, Public Infrastructure District Act; and(b)pledge and utilize the home ownership promotion zone funds to guarantee the payment of public infrastructure bonds issued by a public infrastructure district.

Section 269:
Section 269. Section 17-80-601 is enacted to read:6. Other Housing Supply Tools17-80-601Effective 11/06/25. Reserved.Reserved.

Section 270:
Section 270. Section 17-81-101, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-101 is renumbered and amended to read:81. Agriculture, Industrial, and Critical Infrastructrure Materials1. General Provisions17-41-10117-81-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Advisory board" means:(a)for an agriculture protection area, the agriculture protection area advisory board created as provided in Section 17-41-20117-81-102;(b)for an industrial protection area, the industrial protection area advisory board created as provided in Section 17-41-20117-81-102; and(c)for a critical infrastructure materials protection area, the critical infrastructure materials protection area advisory board created as provided in Section 17-41-20117-81-102.(2)"Agricultural land" means the same as the term "land in agricultural use" is defined in Section 59-2-502.(2)(3)(a)"Agriculture production" means production for commercial purposes of crops, livestock, and livestock products.(b)"Agriculture production" includes the processing or retail marketing of any crops, livestock, and livestock products when more than 50% of the processed or merchandised products are produced by the farm operator.(3)(4)"Agriculture protection area" means a geographic area created under the authority of this chapter that is granted the specific legal protections contained in this chapter.(4)(5)"Applicable legislative body" means:(a)with respect to a proposed agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area:(i)the legislative body of the county in which the land proposed to be included in the relevant protection area is located, if the land is within the unincorporated part of the county; or(ii)the legislative body of the city or town in which the land proposed to be included in the relevant protection area is located; and(b)with respect to an existing agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area:(i)the legislative body of the county in which the relevant protection area is located, if the relevant protection area is within the unincorporated part of the county; or(ii)the legislative body of the city or town in which the relevant protection area is located.(5)(6)"Board" means the Board of Oil, Gas, and Mining created in Section 40-6-4.(7)"Commercial quantities" means critical infrastructure materials:(a)extracted or processed by a commercial enterprise in the ordinary course of business; and(b)in a sufficient amount that the critical infrastructure materials introduction into commerce would create a reasonable expectation of profit.(6)(8)"Contiguous land" means surface or subsurface land that shares a common boundary and is not separated by a highway as defined in Section 41-6a-102.(9)"Critical infrastructure materials" means sand, gravel, or rock aggregate.(7)(10)"Critical infrastructure materials operations" means the extraction, excavation, processing, or reprocessing of critical infrastructure materials.(8)(11)"Critical infrastructure materials operator" means a natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary, agent, or other organization or representative, either public or private, including a successor, assign, affiliate, subsidiary, and related parent company, that:(a)owns, controls, or manages a critical infrastructure materials operation; and(b)has produced commercial quantities of critical infrastructure materials from the critical infrastructure materials operations.(9)(12)"Critical infrastructure materials protection area" means a geographic area created under the authority of this chapter on or after May 14, 2019, that is granted the specific legal protections contained in this chapter.(13)"Critical infrastructure materials use" means the extraction, excavation, processing, or reprocessing of critical infrastructure materials.(10)(14)"Crops, livestock, and livestock products" includes:(a)land devoted to the raising of useful plants and animals with a reasonable expectation of profit, including:(i)forages and sod crops;(ii)grains and feed crops;(iii)livestock, as that term is defined in Section 59-2-102;(iv)trees and fruits; or(v)vegetables, nursery, floral, and ornamental stock; or(b)land devoted to and meeting the requirements and qualifications for payments or other compensation under a crop-land retirement program with an agency of the state or federal government.(11)(15)"Division" means the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining created in Section 40-6-15.(16)"Existing legal use" means a critical infrastructure materials use that has operated in accordance with:(a)a legal nonconforming use that has not been abandoned for more than 24 consecutive months; or(b)a permit issued by the applicable political subdivision.(12)(17)"Industrial protection area" means a geographic area created under the authority of this chapter that is granted the specific legal protections contained in this chapter.(13)(18)"Mine operator" means a natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary, agent, or other organization or representative, either public or private, including a successor, assign, affiliate, subsidiary, and related parent company, that, before January 1, 2019:(a)owns, controls, or manages a mining use under a large mine permit issued by the division or the board; and(b)has produced commercial quantities of a mineral deposit from the mining use.(14)(19)"Mineral deposit" means the same as that term is defined in Section 40-8-4.(15)(20)"Mining protection area" means land where a vested mining use occurs, including each surface or subsurface land or mineral estate that a mine operator with a vested mining use owns or controls on January 1, 2026.(16)(21)"Mining use":(a)means:(i)the full range of activities, from prospecting and exploration to reclamation and closure, associated with the exploitation of a mineral deposit; and(ii)the use of the surface and subsurface and groundwater and surface water of an area in connection with the activities described in Subsection (16)(a)(i)(21)(a)(i) that have been, are being, or will be conducted; and(b)includes, whether conducted on-site or off-site:(i)any sampling, staking, surveying, exploration, or development activity;(ii)any drilling, blasting, excavating, or tunneling;(iii)the removal, transport, treatment, deposition, and reclamation of overburden, development rock, tailings, and other waste material;(iv)any removal, transportation, extraction, beneficiation, or processing of ore;(v)any smelting, refining, autoclaving, or other primary or secondary processing operation;(vi)the recovery of any mineral left in residue from a previous extraction or processing operation;(vii)a mining activity that is identified in a work plan or permitting document;(viii)the use, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, or alteration of a building, structure, facility, equipment, machine, tool, or other material or property that results from or is used in a surface or subsurface mining operation or activity;(ix)any accessory, incidental, or ancillary activity or use, both active and passive, including a utility, private way or road, pipeline, land excavation, working, embankment, pond, gravel excavation, mining waste, conveyor, power line, trackage, storage, reserve, passive use area, buffer zone, and power production facility;(x)the construction of a storage, factory, processing, or maintenance facility; and(xi)an activity described in Subsection 40-8-4(19)(a).(17)(22)(a)"Municipal" means of or relating to a city or town.(b)"Municipality" means a city or town.(18)(23)"New land" means surface or subsurface land or mineral estate that a mine operator gains ownership or control of, whether that land or mineral estate is included in the mine operator's large mine permit.(19)(24)"Off-site" means the same as that term is defined in Section 40-8-4.(20)(25)"On-site" means the same as that term is defined in Section 40-8-4.(26)(a)"Open land" means land that is:(i)preserved in or restored to a predominantly natural, open, and undeveloped condition; and(ii)used for:(A)wildlife habitat;(B)cultural or recreational use;(C)watershed protection; or(D)another use consistent with the preservation of the land in, or restoration of the land to, a predominantly natural, open, and undeveloped condition.(b)"Open land" includes land described in Subsection (26)(a) that contains facilities, including trails, waterways, and grassy areas, that, in the judgment of the county legislative body:(i)enhance the natural, scenic, or aesthetic qualities of the land; or(ii)facilitate the public's access to, or use of, the land for the enjoyment of the land's natural, scenic, or aesthetic qualities and for compatible recreational activities.(c)"Open land" does not include land whose predominant use is as a developed facility for active recreational activities played on fields or courses, including baseball, tennis, soccer, golf, or other sporting or similar activities.(21)(27)"Planning commission" means:(a)a countywide planning commission if the land proposed to be included in the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area is within the unincorporated part of the county and not within a planning advisory area;(b)a planning advisory area planning commission if the land proposed to be included in the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area is within a planning advisory area; or(c)a planning commission of a city or town if the land proposed to be included in the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area is within a city or town.(22)(28)"Political subdivision" means a county, city, town, school district, special district, or special service district.(23)(29)"Proposal sponsors" means the owners of land in agricultural production, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations who are sponsoring the proposal for creating an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area.(30)"Public land county" means a county in which over 50% of the land area is publicly owned.(31)"Rollback tax funds" means the rollback taxes or in lieu fee payments paid to a county in accordance with Sections 59-2-506, 59-2-511, 59-2-1705, and 59-2-1710.(24)(32)"State agency" means each department, commission, board, council, agency, institution, officer, corporation, fund, division, office, committee, authority, laboratory, library, unit, bureau, panel, or other administrative unit of the state.(25)(33)"Unincorporated" means not within a city or town.(34)"Vested critical infrastructure materials use" means a critical infrastructure materials operations use by a critical infrastructure materials operator that is an existing legal use.(26)(35)"Vested mining use" means a mining use:(a)by a mine operator; and(b)that existed or was conducted or otherwise engaged in before a political subdivision prohibits, restricts, or otherwise limits a mining use.

Section 271:
Section 271. Section 17-81-102, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-201 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-20117-81-102Effective 11/06/25. Protection area advisory board.(1)(a)(i)A county legislative body shall appoint no more than five members from the county's conservation district board of supervisors to serve as the agriculture protection area advisory board.(ii)A county legislative body shall appoint an industrial protection area advisory board.(iii)Subject to Subsection (1)(b), a county legislative body shall form a critical infrastructure materials protection area advisory board that consists of:(A)the executive director of the Department of Transportation, or the executive director's designee;(B)a local government elected official appointed by the county legislative body;(C)a representative of a local highway authority appointed by the county legislative body;(D)a representative of the critical infrastructure materials industry appointed by the county legislative body; and(E)a representative of the construction industry appointed by the county legislative body.(b)(i)A county legislative body may appoint an advisory board before or after a proposal to create an agriculture protection area or industrial protection area is filed. (ii)A county legislative body shall appoint a critical infrastructure materials protection area advisory board only after a proposal to create a critical infrastructure materials protection area is filed.(2)A member of an advisory board shall serve without salary, but a county legislative body may reimburse members for expenses incurred in the performance of theirthe member's duties.(3)An advisory board shall:(a)evaluate proposals for the establishment of the relevant protection areas and make recommendations to the applicable legislative body about whether the proposal should be accepted;(b)provide expert advice to the planning commission and to the applicable legislative body about:(i)the desirability of the proposal;(ii)the nature of agricultural production, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations, as the case may be, within the proposed area;(iii)the relation of agricultural production, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations, as the case may be, in the area to the county as a whole; and(iv)which agriculture production, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations, should be allowed within the relevant protection area; and(c)perform the other duties required by this chapter.

Section 272:
Section 272. Section 17-81-103 is enacted to read:17-81-103Effective 11/06/25. Applicability.(1)A person or entity that wishes to propose the creation of a protection area within the boundaries of a municipality and ensure the subsequent protection and management of a created protection area shall, in accordance with Section 10-7-88, comply with the following provisions the same as if the protection area is located on unincorporated county land:(a)Section 17-81-101, Definitions;(b)Part 2, Proposal and Approval of Protection Area;(c)Part 3, Protection of Land in a Protection Area;(d)Part 4, Vested Mining Use; and(e)Part 5, Open Land and Working Agricultural Land Use.(2)In accordance with Section 10-7-88, a municipality shall comply with the following provisions the same as if the municipality were a county:(a)Section 17-81-101, Definitions;(b)Part 2, Proposal and Approval of Protection Area;(c)Part 3, Protection of Land in a Protection Area;(d)Part 4, Vested Mining Use; and(e)Part 5, Open Land and Working Agricultural Land Use.(3)The provisions of Chapter 79, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act, also apply to Part 6, Large Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations, and Part 7, Vested Critical Infrastructure Materials Operations.

Section 273:
Section 273. Section 17-81-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-301 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Proposal and Approval of a Protection Area17-41-30117-81-201Effective 11/06/25. Proposal for creation of a protection area.(1)(a)A proposal to create an agriculture protection area, an industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area may be filed with:(i) the legislative body of the county in which the area is located, if the area is within the unincorporated part of a county; or.(ii)the legislative body of the city or town in which the area is located, if the area is within a city or town.(b)(i)A proposal to create a critical infrastructure protection area can only be initiated by the legislative body of the municipality or county. (ii)Creation of a critical infrastructure materials protection area is a legislative act.(c)(i)To be accepted for processing by the applicable legislative body, a proposal under Subsection (1)(a) shall be signed by a majority in number of all owners of real property and the owners of a majority of the land area in agricultural production, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations within the proposed relevant protection area.(ii)For purposes of Subsection (1)(c)(i), the owners of real property shall be determined by the records of the county recorder.(2)The proposal shall identify:(a)the boundaries of the land proposed to become part of the relevant protection area;(b)any limits on the types of agriculture production, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations to be allowed within the relevant protection area; and(c)for each parcel of land:(i)the names of the owners of record of the land proposed to be included within the relevant protection area;(ii)the tax parcel number or account number identifying each parcel; and(iii)the number of acres of each parcel.(3)An agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area may include within itsthe protection area boundaries land used for a roadway, dwelling site, park, or other nonagricultural use, in the case of an industrial protection area, nonindustrial use, or in the case of a critical infrastructure materials protection area, use unrelated to critical infrastructure materials operations, if that land constitutes a minority of the total acreage within the relevant protection area.(4)An agricultural protection area may include within the boundaries of the agricultural protection area an agritourism activity, as defined in Section 78B-4-512.(5)A county or municipal legislative body may establish:(a)the manner and form for submission of proposals for the creation of a protection area; and(b)reasonable fees for accepting and processing the proposal for the creation of a protection area.(6)A county and municipal legislative body shall establish the minimum number of continuous acres that shall be included in an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area for the legislative body to approve a proposal filed with the legislative body under this section.

Section 274:
Section 274. Section 17-81-202, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-302 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-30217-81-202Effective 11/06/25. Notice of proposal for creation of protection area -- Responses.(1)(a)An applicable legislative body shall provide notice of the proposal, as a class B notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 15 days.(b)A legislative body shall provide the notice described in Subsection (1)(a) for the geographic boundaries of the proposed agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area, and the area that extends 1,000 feet beyond the geographic boundaries of the proposed agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area.(2)The notice shall contain:(a)a statement that a proposal for the creation of an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area has been filed with the applicable legislative body;(b)a statement that the proposal will be open to public inspection in the office of the applicable legislative body;(c)a statement that any person affected by the establishment of the area may, within 15 days of the date of the notice, file with the applicable legislative body:(i)written objections to the proposal; or(ii)a written request to modify the proposal to exclude land from or add land to the proposed protection area;(d)a statement that the applicable legislative body will submit the proposal to the advisory committee and to the planning commission for review and recommendations;(e)a statement that the applicable legislative body will hold a public hearing to discuss and hear public comment on:(i)the proposal to create the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area;(ii)the recommendations of the advisory committee and planning commission; and(iii)any requests for modification of the proposal and any objections to the proposal; and(f)a statement indicating the date, time, and place of the public hearing.(3)(a)A person wishing to modify the proposal for the creation of the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area shall, within 15 days after the date of the notice, file a written request for modification of the proposal, which identifies specifically the land that should be added to or removed from the proposal.(b)A person wishing to object to the proposal for the creation of the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area shall, within 15 days after the date of the notice, file a written objection to the creation of the relevant protection area.

Section 275:
Section 275. Section 17-81-203, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-303 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-30317-81-203Effective 11/06/25. Review of proposal for creation of protection area.(1)After 15 days from the date of the notice, the applicable legislative body shall refer the proposal and any objections and proposed modifications to the proposal to the: (a)county advisory committeeboard created in accordance with Section 17-81-102; and (b)planning commission for their review, comments, and recommendations.(2)(a)Within 45 days after receipt of the proposal, the planning commission shall submit a written report to the applicable legislative body that:(i)analyzes and evaluates the effect of the creation of the proposed area on the planning policies and objectives of the county or municipality, as the case may be;(ii)analyzes and evaluates the proposal by applying the criteria contained in Section 17-41-30517-81-205;(iii)recommends any modifications to the land to be included in the proposed agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area;(iv)analyzes and evaluates any objections to the proposal; and(v)includes a recommendation to the applicable legislative body either to accept, accept and modify, or reject the proposal.(b)Within 45 days after receipt of the proposal, the advisory board shall submit a written report to the applicable legislative body that:(i)recommends any modifications to the land to be included in the proposed agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area;(ii)analyzes and evaluates the proposal by applying the criteria contained in Section 17-41-305;(iii)analyzes and evaluates any objections to the proposal; and(iv)includes a recommendation to the applicable legislative body either to accept, accept and modify, or reject the proposal.(c)The applicable legislative body shall consider a failure of the planning commission or advisory committee to submit a written report within the 45 days under Subsection (2)(a) or (b) as a recommendation of that committee to approve the proposal as submitted.

Section 276:
Section 276. Section 17-81-204, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-304 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-30417-81-204Effective 11/06/25. Public hearing -- Notice -- Review and action on proposal.(1)After receipt of the written reports from the advisory committee and planning commission, or after the 45 days have expired, whichever is earlier, the county or municipal legislative body shall:(a)schedule a public hearing;(b)provide notice of the public hearing for the geographic area described in Subsection 17-41-302(1)(b)17-81-202(1)(b), as a class B notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least seven days; and(c)ensure that the notice includes:(i)the time, date, and place of the public hearing on the proposal;(ii)a description of the proposed agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area;(iii)any proposed modifications to the proposed agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area;(iv)a summary of the recommendations of the advisory committee and planning commission; and(v)a statement that interested persons may appear at the public hearing and speak in favor of or against the proposal, any proposed modifications to the proposal, or the recommendations of the advisory committee and planning commission.(2)The applicable legislative body shall:(a)convene the public hearing at the time, date, and place specified in the notice; and(b)take oral or written testimony from interested persons.(3)(a)Within 120 days of the submission of the proposal, the applicable legislative body shall approve, modify and approve, or reject the proposal.(b)The creation of an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area is effective at the earlier of:(i)the applicable legislative body's approval of a proposal or modified proposal; or(ii)120 days after submission of a proposal complying with Subsection 17-41-301(2) if the applicable legislative body has failed to approve or reject the proposal within that time.(c)Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(b), a critical infrastructure materials protection area is effective only if the applicable legislative body, at itsthe legislative body's discretion, approves a proposal or modified proposal.(4)(a)To give constructive notice of the existence of the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area to all persons who have, may acquire, or may seek to acquire an interest in land in or adjacent to the relevant protection area within 10 days of the creation of the relevant protection area, the applicable legislative body shall file an executed document containing a legal description of the relevant protection area with:(i)the county recorder of deeds; and(ii)the affected planning commission.(b)If the legal description of the property to be included in the relevant protection area is available through the county recorder's office, the applicable legislative body shall use that legal description in itsthe executed document required in Subsection (4)(a).(5)Within 10 days of the recording of the agriculture protection area, the applicable legislative body shall:(a)send written notification to the commissioner of agriculture and food that the agriculture protection area has been created; and(b)include in the notification:(i)the number of landowners owning land within the agriculture protection area;(ii)the total acreage of the area;(iii)the date of approval of the area; and(iv)the date of recording.(6)The applicable legislative body's failure to record the notice required under Subsection (4) or to send the written notification under Subsection (5) does not invalidate the creation of an agriculture protection area.(7)The applicable legislative body may consider the cost of recording notice under Subsection (4) and the cost of sending notification under Subsection (5) in establishing a fee under Subsection 17-41-301(4)(b).

Section 277:
Section 277. Section 17-81-205, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-305 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-30517-81-205Effective 11/06/25. Criteria to be applied in evaluating a proposal for the creation of a protection area.In evaluating a proposal and in determining whether or not to create or recommend the creation of an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area, the advisory committee, planning commission, and applicable legislative body shall apply the following criteria:(1)whether or not the land is currently being used for agriculture production, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations, as the case may be;(2)whether or not the land is zoned for agriculture use, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations, as the case may be;(3)whether or not the land is viable for agriculture production, industrial use, or critical infrastructure materials operations, as the case may be;(4)(a)for an agriculture protection area, the extent and nature of existing or proposed farm improvements,;(b)for an industrial protection area, the extent and nature of existing or proposed improvements to or expansion of the industrial use,; or (c)for a critical infrastructure materials protection area, the extent and nature of existing or proposed improvements to or expansion of critical infrastructure materials operations, as the case may be; and(5)(a)in the case of an agriculture protection area, anticipated trends in agricultural and technological conditions;(b)in the case of an industrial protection area, anticipated trends in technological conditions applicable to the industrial use of the land in question; or(c)in the case of a critical infrastructure materials protection area, anticipated trends in technological conditions applicable to the critical infrastructure materials operations of the land in question.

Section 278:
Section 278. Section 17-81-206, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-306 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-30617-81-206Effective 11/06/25. Adding land to or removing land from a protection area -- Removing land from a mining protection area.(1)(a)Any owner may add land to an existing agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, critical infrastructure materials protection area, as the case may be, by:(i)filing a proposal with:(A)the county legislative body, if the relevant protection area and the land to be added are within the unincorporated part of the county; or(B)the municipal legislative body, if the relevant protection area and the land to be added are within a city or town; and(ii)obtaining the approval of the applicable legislative body for the addition of the land to the relevant protection area.(b)The applicable legislative body shall:(i)comply with the provisions for creating an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, critical infrastructure materials protection area, as the case may be, in determining whether to accept the proposal; and(ii)for purposes of a critical infrastructure materials protection area, request a copy of the applicable Division of Air Quality approval order.(c)The applicable legislative body may deny the expansion if itexpansion is contrary to the Division of Air Quality's approval order.(2)(a)An owner of land within an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area may remove any or all of the owner's land from the relevant protection area, by filing a petition for removal with the applicable legislative body.(b)(i)The applicable legislative body:(A)shall:(I)grant the petition for removal of land from the relevant protection area, even if removal of the land would result in an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area of less than the number of acres established by the applicable legislative body as the minimum under Section 17-41-301; and(II)to give constructive notice of the removal to all persons who have, may acquire, or may seek to acquire an interest in land in or adjacent to the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area and the land removed from the relevant protection area, file a legal description of the revised boundaries of the relevant protection area with the county recorder of deeds and the affected planning commission; and(B)may not charge a fee in connection with a petition to remove land from an agriculture protection area, an industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area.(ii)The If a petition to remove land in a protection area is granted, the remaining land in the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area is still an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area.(iii)(A)A critical infrastructure materials operator may abandon some or all of itsthe operator's critical infrastructure materials operations use only as provided in this Subsection (2)(b)(iii).(B)To abandon some or all of a critical infrastructure materials operations, a critical infrastructure materials operator shall record a written declaration of abandonment with the county recorder of the county in which the critical infrastructure materials operations being abandoned is located.(C)The written declaration of abandonment under this Subsection (2)(b)(iii) shall specify the critical infrastructure materials operations or the portion of the critical infrastructure materials operations being abandoned.(3)(a)If a municipality annexes any land that is part of an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area located in the unincorporated part of the county, the county legislative body shall, within 30 days after the land is annexed, review the feasibility of that land remaining in the relevant protection area according to the procedures and requirements of Section 17-41-30717-81-207.(b)The county legislative body shall remove the annexed land from the relevant protection area if:(i)the county legislative body concludes, after the review under Section 17-41-30717-81-207, that removal is appropriate; and(ii)the owners of all the annexed land that is within the relevant protection area consent in writing to the removal.(c)Removal of land from an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area under this Subsection (3) does not affect whether that land may be:(i)included in a proposal under Section 17-41-30117-81-201 to create an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area within the municipality; or(ii)added to an existing agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area within the municipality under Subsection (1).(4)A mine operator that owns or controls land within a mining protection area may remove any or all of the land from the mining protection area by filing a notice of removal with the legislative body of the county in which the land is located.

Section 279:
Section 279. Section 17-81-207, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-307 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-30717-81-207Effective 11/06/25. Review of protection areas.(1)In the 20th calendar year after itsthe creation of a protection area under this part, an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area, as the case may be, shall be reviewed, under the provisions of this section, by:(a)the county legislative body, if the relevant protection area is within the unincorporated part of the county; or(b)the municipal legislative body, if the relevant protection area is within the municipality.(2)(a)In the 20th year, the applicable legislative body may:(i)request the planning commission and advisory board to submit recommendations about whether the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area, as the case may be, should be continued, modified, or terminated;(ii)at least 120 days before the end of the calendar year, hold a public hearing to discuss whether the relevant protection area, should be continued, modified, or terminated;(iii)give notice of the hearing using the same procedures required by Section 17-41-30217-81-202; and(iv)after the public hearing, continue, modify, or terminate the relevant protection area.(b)If the applicable legislative body modifies or terminates the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area, the applicable legislative body shall file an executed document containing the legal description of the relevant protection area, with the county recorder of deeds.(3)If the applicable legislative body fails affirmatively to continue, modify, or terminate the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area, as the case may be, in the 20th calendar year, the relevant protection area is considered to be reauthorized for another 20 years.

Section 280:
Section 280. Section 17-81-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-401 is renumbered and amended to read:3. Protection of Land in a Protection Area17-41-40117-81-301Effective 11/06/25. Farmland Assessment Act benefits not affected.(1)Creation of an agriculture protection area may not impair the ability of land within the area to obtain the benefits of Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 5, Farmland Assessment Act.(2)The eligibility of land for the benefits of Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 5, Farmland Assessment Act, shall be determined exclusively by the provisions of that act, notwithstanding the land's location within an agriculture protection area.

Section 281:
Section 281. Section 17-81-302, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-402 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-40217-81-302Effective 11/06/25. Limitations on local regulations.(1)(a)A Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a political subdivision within which an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area is created or with a mining protection area within itsthe political subdivision's boundary shall encourage the continuity, development, and viability of agriculture use, industrial use, critical infrastructure materials operations, or mining use, within the relevant protection area by not enacting a local law, ordinance, or regulation that, unless the law, ordinance, or regulation bears a direct relationship to public health or safety,  would unreasonably restrict:(a)(i)in the case of an agriculture protection area, a farm structure or farm practice;(b)(ii)in the case of an industrial protection area, an industrial use of the land within the area;(c)(iii)in the case of a critical infrastructure materials protection area, critical infrastructure materials operations; or(d)(iv)in the case of a mining protection area, a mining use within the protection area.(b)Subsection (1)(a) does not restrict the ability of a political subdivision to enact a local law, ordinance, or regulation that bears a direct relationship to public health or safety.(2)A political subdivision may not change the zoning designation of or a zoning regulation affecting land within an agriculture protection area unless the political subdivision receives written approval for the change from all the landowners within the agriculture protection area affected by the change.(3)Except as provided by Section 19-4-113, a political subdivision may not change the zoning designation of or a zoning regulation affecting land within an industrial protection area unless the political subdivision receives written approval for the change from all the landowners within the industrial protection area affected by the change.(4)A political subdivision may not change the zoning designation of or a zoning regulation affecting land within a critical infrastructure materials protection area unless the political subdivision receives written approval for the change from each critical infrastructure materials operator within the relevant area.(5)A political subdivision may not change the zoning designation of or a zoning regulation affecting land within a mining protection area unless the political subdivision receives written approval for the change from each mine operator within the area.(6)A county, city, or town may not:(a)adopt, enact, or amend an existing land use regulation, ordinance, or regulation that would prohibit, restrict, regulate, or otherwise limit critical infrastructure materials operations with a vested critical infrastructure materials use as defined in Section 10-9a-901 or 17-27a-100117-81-101; or(b)initiate proceedings to amend the county's, city's, or town's land use ordinances as described in Subsection 10-9a-509(1)(a)(ii) or 17-27a-508(1)(a)(ii)17-79-803(1)(a)(ii) as itthe land use ordinance regards the rights of a critical infrastructure materials operator with a vested critical infrastructure materials use.

Section 282:
Section 282. Section 17-81-303, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-402.5 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-402.517-81-303Effective 11/06/25. Limits on political subdivisions with respect to a vested mining use -- Exception.(1)A political subdivision may not:(a)terminate a vested mining use, whether by amortization, the exercise of police power, or otherwise;(b)prohibit, restrict, or otherwise limit a mine operator with a vested mining use from exercising the rights permitted under this chapter;(c)require, for a vested mining use:(i)a variance;(ii)a conditional use permit;(iii)a special exception;(iv)the establishment or determination of a nonconforming use right; or(v)any other type of zoning or land use permit; or(d)prohibit, restrict, limit, or otherwise regulate a vested mining use under a variance, conditional use permit, special exception, or other zoning or land use permit issued before May 12, 2009.(2)Subsection (1) does not prohibit a political subdivision from requiring a vested mining use to comply with the generally applicable, reasonable health and safety regulations and building code adopted by the political subdivision including a drinking water protection zone as defined and limited to Subsections 19-4-113(5)(a) and (b).

Section 283:
Section 283. Section 17-81-304, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-403 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-40317-81-304Effective 11/06/25. Nuisances.(1)A political subdivision shall ensure that any of the political subdivision's laws or ordinances that define or prohibit a public nuisance exclude from the definition or prohibition:(a)for an agriculture protection area, any agricultural activity or operation within an agriculture protection area conducted using sound agricultural practices unless that activity or operation bears a direct relationship to public health or safety;(b)for an industrial protection area, any industrial use of the land within the industrial protection area that is consistent with sound practices applicable to the industrial use, unless that use bears a direct relationship to public health or safety; or(c)for a critical infrastructure materials protection area, any critical infrastructure materials operations on the land within the critical infrastructure materials protection area that is consistent with sound practices applicable to the critical infrastructure materials operations, unless that use bears a direct relationship to public health or safety.(2)In a civil action for nuisance or a criminal action for public nuisance under Section 76-9-1301, it is a complete defense if the action involves agricultural activities and:(a)those agricultural activities were:(i)conducted within an agriculture protection area; and(ii)not in violation of any federal, state, or local law or regulation relating to the alleged nuisance or were conducted according to sound agricultural practices; or(b)a defense under Section 4-44-201 applies.(3)(a)A vested mining use undertaken in conformity with applicable federal and state law and regulations is presumed to be operating within sound mining practices.(b)A vested mining use that is consistent with sound mining practices:(i)is presumed to be reasonable; and(ii)may not constitute a private or public nuisance under Section 76-9-1301.(c)A vested mining use in operation for more than three years may not be considered to have become a private or public nuisance because of a subsequent change in the condition of land within the vicinity of the vested mining use.(4)The county recorder shall, from time to time, ensure compliance with Section 17-79-716 in regard to subdivision development near a protection area.(4)(a)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 300 feet of the boundary of an agriculture protection area, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"Agriculture Protection AreaThis property is located in the vicinity of an established agriculture protection area in which normal agricultural uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that such agricultural uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the agriculture protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience which may result from such normal agricultural uses and activities."(b)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of an industrial protection area, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"Industrial Protection AreaThis property is located in the vicinity of an established industrial protection area in which normal industrial uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that such industrial uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the industrial protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience which may result from such normal industrial uses and activities."(c)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of a critical infrastructure materials protection area, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"Critical Infrastructure Materials Protection AreaThis property is located in the vicinity of an established critical infrastructure materials protection area in which critical infrastructure materials operations have been afforded the highest priority use status. It can be anticipated that such operations may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the critical infrastructure materials protection area. The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience which may result from such normal critical infrastructure materials operations."(d)For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of a mining protection area, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:"This property is located within the vicinity of an established mining protection area in which normal mining uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that the mining uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the mining protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience that may result from the normal mining uses and activities."

Section 284:
Section 284. Section 17-81-305, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-405 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-40517-81-305Effective 11/06/25. Eminent domain restrictions -- Notice of hearing.(1)A political subdivision having or exercising eminent domain powers may not condemn for any purpose any land within an agriculture protection area that is being used for agricultural production, land within an industrial protection area that is being put to an industrial use, or land within a critical infrastructure materials protection area, unless the political subdivision obtains approval, according to the procedures and requirements of this section, from the applicable legislative body and the advisory board.(2)Any condemnor wishing to condemn property within an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area shall file a notice of condemnation with the applicable legislative body and the relevant protection area's advisory board at least 30 days before filing an eminent domain complaint.(3)The applicable legislative body and the advisory board shall:(a)hold a joint public hearing on the proposed condemnation at a location within the county in which the relevant protection area is located; and(b)publish notice of the time, date, place, and purpose of the public hearing for the relevant protection area, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least seven days.(4)(a)If the condemnation is for highway purposes or for the disposal of solid or liquid waste materials, the applicable legislative body and the advisory board may approve the condemnation only if there is no reasonable and prudent alternative to the use of the land within the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area for the project.(b)If the condemnation is for any other purpose, the applicable legislative body and the advisory board may approve the condemnation only if:(i)the proposed condemnation would not have an unreasonably adverse effect upon the preservation and enhancement of:(A)agriculture within the agriculture protection area;(B)the industrial use within the industrial protection area; or(C)critical infrastructure materials operations within the critical infrastructure materials protection area; or(ii)there is no reasonable and prudent alternative to the use of the land within the relevant protection area for the project.(5)(a)Within 60 days after receipt of the notice of condemnation, the applicable legislative body and the advisory board shall approve or reject the proposed condemnation.(b)If the applicable legislative body and the advisory board fail to act within the 60 days or such further time as the applicable legislative body establishes, the condemnation shall be considered rejected.(6)The applicable legislative body or the advisory board may request the county or municipal attorney to bring an action to enjoin any condemnor from violating any provisions of this section.

Section 285:
Section 285. Section 17-81-306, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-404 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-40417-81-306Effective 11/06/25. Policy of state agencies.A state agency shall encourage the continuity, development, and viability of agriculture within agriculture protection areas, industrial uses with industrial protection areas, and critical infrastructure materials operations within critical infrastructure protection areas by:(1)not enacting rules that would impose unreasonable restrictions on farm structures or farm practices within the agriculture protection area, on industrial uses and practices within the industrial protection area, or on critical infrastructure materials operations with a critical infrastructure materials protection area, unless those laws, ordinances, or regulations bear a direct relationship to public health or safety or are required by federal law; and(2)modifying existing rules that would impose unreasonable restrictions on farm structures or farm practices within the agriculture protection area, on industrial uses and activities within the industrial protection area, or on critical infrastructure materials operations within a critical infrastructure materials protection area, unless those laws, ordinances, or regulations bear a direct relationship to public health or safety or are required by federal law.

Section 286:
Section 286. Section 17-81-307, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-406 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-40617-81-307Effective 11/06/25. Restrictions on state development projects.(1)A state agency that plans any development project that might affect land within an agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area, shall submit the state agency's development plan to:(a)the advisory board of the relevant protection area; and(b)in the case of an agriculture protection area, the commissioner of agriculture and food.(2)The commissioner of agriculture and food, in the case of an agriculture protection area, and the advisory board shall:(a)review the state agency's proposed development plan; and(b)recommend any modifications to the development project that would protect the integrity of the agriculture protection area, industrial protection area, or critical infrastructure materials protection area, as the case may be, or that would protect the agriculture protection area from nonfarm encroachment, the industrial protection area from nonindustrial encroachment, or the critical infrastructure materials protection area from encroachment of uses unrelated to critical infrastructure materials operations.(3)A state agency and political subdivision of the state that designates or proposes to designate a transportation corridor shall:(a)consider:(i)whether the transportation corridor would:(A)be located on land that is included within an agriculture protection area; or(B)interfere with agriculture production activities on land within an agriculture protection area; and(ii)each other reasonably comparable alternative to the placement of the corridor on land within an agriculture protection area; and(b)make reasonable efforts to minimize or eliminate any detrimental impact on agriculture that may result from the designation of a transportation corridor.

Section 287:
Section 287. Section 17-81-401, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-501 is renumbered and amended to read:4. Vested Mining Use17-41-50117-81-401Effective 11/06/25. Vested mining use -- Conclusive presumption.(1)(a)A mining use is conclusively presumed to be a vested mining use if the mining use existed or was conducted or otherwise engaged in before a political subdivision prohibits, restricts, or otherwise limits the mining use.(b)Anyone claiming that a vested mining use has not been established has the burden of proof to show by clear and convincing evidence that the vested mining use has not been established.(2)A vested mining use:(a)runs with the land; and(b)may be changed to another mining use without losing its status as a vested mining use.(3)The present or future boundary described in the large mine permit of a mine operator with a vested mining use does not limit:(a)the scope of the mine operator's rights under this chapter; or(b)the protection that this chapter provides for a mining protection area.(4)(a)A mine operator with a vested mining use shall file a declaration for recording in the office of the recorder of the county in which the vested mining use is located.(b)A declaration under Subsection (4)(a) shall:(i)contain a legal description of the land included within the vested mining use; and(ii)provide notice of the vested mining use.

Section 288:
Section 288. Section 17-81-402, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-502 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-50217-81-402Effective 11/06/25. Rights of a mine operator with a vested mining use -- Expanding vested mining use.(1)Notwithstanding a political subdivision's prohibition, restriction, or other limitation on a mining use adopted after the establishment of the mining use, the rights of a mine operator with a vested mining use include the rights to:(a)progress, extend, enlarge, grow, or expand the vested mining use to any surface or subsurface land or mineral estate that the mine operator owns or controls;(b)expand the vested mining use to any new land that:(i)is contiguous and related in mineralization to surface or subsurface land or a mineral estate that the mine operator already owns or controls;(ii)contains minerals that are part of the same mineral trend as the minerals that the mine operator already owns or controls; or(iii)is a geologic offshoot to surface or subsurface land or a mineral estate that the mine operator already owns or controls;(c)use, operate, construct, reconstruct, restore, extend, expand, maintain, repair, alter, substitute, modernize, upgrade, and replace equipment, processes, facilities, and buildings on any surface or subsurface land or mineral estate that the mine operator owns or controls;(d)increase production or volume, alter the method of mining or processing, and mine or process a different or additional mineral than previously mined or owned on any surface or subsurface land or mineral estate that the mine operator owns or controls; and(e)discontinue, suspend, terminate, deactivate, or continue and reactivate, temporarily or permanently, all or any part of the mining use.(2)(a)As used in this Subsection (2), "applicable legislative body" means the legislative body of each:(i)county in whose unincorporated area the new land to be included in the vested mining use is located; and(ii)municipality in which the new land to be included in the vested mining use is located.(b)A mine operator with a vested mining use is presumed to have a right to expand the vested mining use to new land.(c)Before expanding a vested mining use to new land, a mine operator shall provide written notice:(i)of the mine operator's intent to expand the vested mining use; and(ii)to each applicable legislative body.(d)(i)An applicable legislative body shall:(A)hold a public meeting or hearing at its next available meeting that is more than 10 days after receiving the notice under Subsection (2)(c); and(B)provide reasonable, advance, written notice:(I)of:(Aa)the intended expansion of the vested mining use; and(Bb)the public meeting or hearing; and(II)to each owner of the surface estate of the new land.(ii)A public meeting or hearing under Subsection (2)(d)(i) serves to provide sufficient public notice of the mine operator's intent to expand the vested mining use to the new land.(e)After the public meeting or hearing under Subsection (2)(d)(ii), a mine operator may expand a vested mining use to new land without any action by an applicable legislative body, unless the applicable legislative body finds that there is clear and convincing evidence in the record that the expansion to new land will imminently endanger the public health, safety, and welfare. If the applicable legislative body makes the finding of endangerment described in this Subsection (2)(e), Subsection (4) applies.(3)If a mine operator expands a vested mining use to new land, as authorized under this section:(a)the mine operator's rights under the vested mining use with respect to land on which the vested mining use occurs apply with equal force after the expansion to the new land; and(b)the mining protection area that includes land on which the vested mining use occurs is expanded to include the new land.(4)(a)If the applicable legislative body makes the finding of endangerment described in Subsection (2)(e):(i)the mining operator shall submit to the applicable legislative body the mining operator's plan for expansion under this section;(ii)by no later than 30 days after receipt of the plan for expansion described in Subsection (4)(a)(i), the applicable legislative body shall notify the operator of:(A)evidence that the expansion to new land will endanger the public health, safety, and welfare; and(B)proposed measures to mitigate the endangerment of the public health, safety, and welfare; and(iii)the applicable legislative body shall hold a public hearing by no later than 30 days after the date the applicable legislative body complies with Subsection (4)(a)(ii) to present mitigation measures proposed under Subsection (4)(a)(ii).(b)The applicable legislative body may impose mitigation measures under this Subsection (4) that are reasonable and do not exceed requirements imposed by permits issued by a state agency such as an air quality permit.(c)A political subdivision may not prohibit the expansion of a vested mining use if the mining operator agrees to comply with the mitigation measures described in Subsection (4)(b).(d)The process under this Subsection (4) is not a land use application or conditional use application under Title 10, Chapter 9a,Chapter 20, Municipal Land Use, Development, and Management Act, or Chapter 27a,Chapter 79, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act.

Section 289:
Section 289. Section 17-81-403, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-503 is renumbered and amended to read:17-41-50317-81-403Effective 11/06/25. Abandonment of a vested mining use.(1)A mine operator may abandon some or all of a vested mining use only as provided in this section.(2)To abandon some or all of a vested mining use, a mine operator shall record a written declaration of abandonment with the recorder of the county in which the vested mining use being abandoned is located.(3)The written declaration of abandonment under Subsection (2) shall specify the vested mining use or the portion of the vested mining use being abandoned.

Section 290:
Section 290. Section 17-81-501, which is renumbered from Section 17-41-602 is renumbered and amended to read:5. Open Land and Working Agricultural Land Use17-41-60217-81-501Effective 11/06/25. Use of money -- Criteria -- Administration.(1)The county treasurer shall deposit 100% of the rollback tax funds into an account or fund of the county set aside for preserving or restoring open land and agricultural land.(2)The rollback funds:(a)may be used to establish a conservation easement under Title 57, Chapter 18, Land Conservation Easement Act, or to fund similar methods to preserve open land or agricultural land; and(b)if the property to be purchased is in a public land county, may not be used to purchase a fee interest in real property to preserve open land or agricultural land, unless, the governmental entity purchasing the property contemporaneously transfers to the private ownership real property, in the same public land county, that is roughly equivalent in size to the property to be purchased.(3)Eminent domain may not be used or threatened in connection with any purchase using the rollback tax funds.(4)The funds collected by the account or fund of the county may roll over from year-to-year, except that if the county does not spend, or obligate, 100% of the rollback tax funds for a purpose described in Subsection (2) within 10 years after the year in which the county collects the rollback tax funds, the county shall pay the balance to the LeRay McAllister Working Farm and Ranch Fund created in Section 4-46-301.

Section 291:
Section 291. Section 17-81-601, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1102 is renumbered and amended to read:6. Large Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations17-27a-110217-81-601Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.(1)"Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility where the following conditions are met:(a)animals have been, are, or will be stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of 45 days or more in any 12-month period; and(b)crops, vegetation, forage growth, or post-harvest residues are not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot or facility.(2)(a)"Commercial enterprise" means a building:(i)used as a part of a business that manufactures goods, delivers services, or sells goods or services;(ii)customarily and regularly used by the general public during the entire calendar year; and(iii)connected to electric or water systems.(b)"Commercial enterprise" does not include an agriculture operation.(3)"County large concentrated animal feeding operation land use ordinance" means an ordinance adopted in accordance with Section 17-27a-110317-81-602.(4)"Education institution" means a building in which any part is used:(a)for more than three hours each weekday during a school year as a public or private:(i)elementary school;(ii)secondary school; or(iii)kindergarten;(b)a state institution of higher education as defined in Section 53B-3-102; or(c)a private institution of higher education in the state accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.(5)"Health care facility" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-2-201.(6)"Large concentrated animal feeding operation" means an animal feeding operation that stables or confines as many as or more than the numbers of animals specified in any of the following categories:(a)700 mature dairy cows, whether milked or dry;(b)1,000 veal calves;(c)1,000 cattle other than mature dairy cows or veal calves, with "cattle" including heifers, steers, bulls, and cow calf pairs;(d)2,500 swine each weighing 55 pounds or more;(e)10,000 swine each weighing less than 55 pounds;(f)500 horses;(g)10,000 sheep or lambs;(h)55,000 turkeys;(i)30,000 laying hens or broilers, if the animal feeding operation uses a liquid manure handling system;(j)125,000 chickens, other than laying hens, if the animal feeding operation uses other than a liquid manure handling system;(k)82,000 laying hens, if the animal feeding operation uses other than a liquid manure handling system;(l)30,000 ducks, if the animal feeding operation uses other than a liquid manure handling system; or(m)5,000 ducks, if the animal feeding operation uses a liquid manure handling system.(7)"Manure" includes manure, bedding, compost, a raw material, or other material commingled with manure or set aside for disposal.(8)"Public area" means land that:(a)is owned by the federal government, the state, or a political subdivision with facilities that attract the public to congregate and remain in the area for significant periods of time;(b)(i)is part of a public park, preserve, or recreation area that is owned or managed by the federal government, the state, a political subdivision, or a nongovernmental entity; and(ii)has a cultural, archaeological, scientific, or historic significance or contains a rare or valuable ecological system, including a site recognized as a National Historic Landmark or Site; or(c)is a cemetery.(9)"Religious institution" means a building and grounds used at least monthly for religious services or ceremonies.

Section 292:
Section 292. Section 17-81-602, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1103 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-110317-81-602Effective 11/06/25. County adoption of a county large concentrated animal feeding operation land use ordinance.(1)(a)The legislative body of a county desiring to restrict siting of large concentrated animal feeding operations shall adopt a county large concentrated animal feeding operation land use ordinance in accordance with this part by no later than February 1, 2022.(b)A county may consider an application to locate large concentrated animal feeding operations in the county before the county adopts the county large concentrated animal feeding operation land use ordinance under this part.(2)A county large concentrated animal feeding operation land use ordinance described in Subsection (1) shall:(a)designate geographic areas of sufficient size to support large concentrated animal feeding operations, including state trust lands described in Subsection 53C-1-103(8) and private property within the county, including adopting a map described in Section 17-27a-110417-81-603;(b)establish requirements and procedures for applying for a land use decision that provides a reasonable opportunity to operate large concentrated animal feeding operations within the geographic area described in Subsection (2)(a);(c)disclose fees imposed to apply for the land use decision described in Subsection (2)(b);(d)disclose any requirements in addition to fees described in Subsection (2)(c) to be imposed by the county; and(e)provide for administrative remedies consistent with this chapter.(3)(a)This part does not authorize a county to regulate the operation of large concentrated animal feeding operations in any way that conflicts with state or federal statutes or regulations.(b)Nothing in this part supersedes or authorizes enactment of an ordinance that infringes on Chapter 41, Agriculture, Industrial, or Critical Infrastructure Materials Protection Areas, or Title 4, Chapter 44, Agricultural Operations Nuisances Act.

Section 293:
Section 293. Section 17-81-603, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1104 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-110417-81-603Effective 11/06/25. Criteria considered in adopting the geographic area of a county large concentrated animal feeding operation land use ordinance -- Maps -- Exception.(1)(a)To determine the geographic areas where large concentrated animal feeding operations may be located under a county large concentrated animal feeding operation land use ordinance, the county shall consider:(i)the distance of the geographic area measured in feet from the following:(A)a residential zone;(B)a health care facility;(C)a public area;(D)an education institution;(E)a religious institution;(F)a commercial enterprise;(G)a municipal boundary; and(H)a state or county highway or road;(ii)prevailing winds;(iii)topography;(iv)economic benefits to the county; and(v)reasonable access to transportation, water, and power infrastructure.(b)A county may consider criteria in addition to those described in Subsection (1)(a).(2)After considering the factors described in Subsection (1), the county shall designate the geographic areas where large concentrated animal feeding operations may locate as required by Subsection 17-27a-1103(2)(a)17-81-602(2)(a) and prepare a map available to the public showing the geographic areas in the county.(3)A county may not designate a geographic area for large concentrated animal feeding operations based solely on a uniform setback distance requirement from the locations described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), but shall determine the geographic area by evaluating all criteria in Subsection (1).(4)A county shall designate at least one geographic area within the county where large concentrated animal feeding operations for all animal species listed in Subsection 17-27a-1102(6)17-81-601(6) may be located unless the county demonstrates that one of the following makes it not feasible for the county to meet the criteria described in this section:(a)the county's population density; or(b)the county's population density relative to the amount of private land within the county.

Section 294:
Section 294. Section 17-81-701, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1002 is renumbered and amended to read:7. Vested Critical Infrastructure Materials Operations17-27a-100217-81-701Effective 11/06/25. Vested critical infrastructure materials use-- Presumption.(1)(a)A critical infrastructure materials use is presumed to be a vested critical infrastructure materials use if the critical infrastructure materials use meets the definition of vested critical infrastructure materials use as defined in Section 17-27a-100117-81-101.(b)A person claiming that a vested critical infrastructure materials use has not been established has the burden of proof to show by the preponderance of the evidence that the vested critical infrastructure materials use has not been established.(2)A vested critical infrastructure materials use:(a)runs with the land; and(b)may be changed to another critical infrastructure materials use without losing its status as a vested critical infrastructure materials use.(3)The present or future boundary of the critical infrastructure materials use of a critical infrastructure materials operator with a vested critical infrastructure materials use does not limit:(a)the scope of rights of a critical infrastructure materials operator with a vested critical infrastructure material use; or(b)the protection for a critical infrastructure materials protection area.(4)(a)A critical infrastructure operator with a vested critical infrastructure materials use shall file a declaration for recording in the office of the recorder of the county in which the vested critical infrastructure materials use is located.(b)A declaration under Subsection (4)(a) shall:(i)contain a legal description of the land included within the vested critical infrastructure materials use; and(ii)provide notice of the vested critical infrastructure materials use.

Section 295:
Section 295. Section 17-81-702, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1003 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-100317-81-702Effective 11/06/25. Rights of a critical infrastructure materials operator with a vested critical infrastructure materials use.(1)As used in this section, "new land" means surface or subsurface land that a critical infrastructure materials operator gains ownership or control of on or before January 1, 2026, regardless of whether that land is included in any applicable permit issued by a political subdivision or a legal nonconforming use.(2)Notwithstanding a political subdivision's prohibition, restriction, or other limitation on a critical infrastructure materials use adopted after the establishment of the critical infrastructure materials use, the rights of a critical infrastructure materials operator with a vested critical infrastructure materials use include with respect to that existing legal use the right to:(a)progress, extend, enlarge, grow, or expand the vested critical infrastructure materials use to any contiguous land that the critical infrastructure materials operator owns or controls before May 7, 2025;(b)expand the vested critical infrastructure materials use to new land that is contiguous land to the surface or subsurface land on which the critical infrastructure materials operator has a vested critical infrastructure materials use, including the surface or subsurface land under Subsection (1)(a);(c)use, operate, construct, reconstruct, restore, extend, expand, maintain, repair, alter, substitute, modernize, upgrade, and replace equipment, processes, facilities, and buildings, on any surface or subsurface land that the critical infrastructure materials operator owns or controls before May 7, 2025;(d)on any surface or subsurface land that the critical infrastructure materials operator owns or controls before May 7, 2025:(i)increase production or volume;(ii)alter the method of extracting or processing, including with respect to the vested use, the right to stockpile or hold in reserve critical infrastructure materials, to recycle, and to batch and mix concrete and asphalt; and(iii)extract or process a different or additional critical infrastructure material than previously extracted or processed on the surface or subsurface land; and(e)discontinue, suspend, terminate, deactivate, or continue and reactivate, temporarily or permanently, all or any part of the critical infrastructure materials use.(2)(3)(a)As used in this Subsection (2)(3), "applicable legislative body" means the legislative body of each:(i)county in whose unincorporated area the new land to be included in the vested critical infrastructure materials use is located; or(ii)municipality in which the new land to be included in the critical infrastructure  use is located.(b)A critical infrastructure materials operator with a vested critical infrastructure materials use is presumed to have a right to expand the vested critical infrastructure materials use to new land.(c)Before expanding a vested critical infrastructure materials use to new land, a critical infrastructure materials operator shall provide written notice:(i)of the critical infrastructure materials operator's intent to expand the vested critical infrastructure materials use; and(ii)to each applicable legislative body.(d)(i)An applicable legislative body shall:(A)hold a public meeting or hearing at the applicable legislative body's next available meeting that is no later than 30 days after receiving the notice under Subsection (2)(c)(3)(c); and(B)provide reasonable, advance, written notice of the intended expansion of the vested critical infrastructure materials use and the public meeting or hearing to each owner of the surface estate of the new land.(ii)A public meeting or hearing under Subsection (2)(d)(i)(3)(d)(i) serves to provide sufficient public notice of the critical infrastructure materials operator's intent to expand the vested critical infrastructure materials use to the new land.(e)(i)After the public meeting or hearing under Subsection (2)(d)(i)(3)(d)(i), a critical infrastructure materials operator may expand a vested critical infrastructure materials use to new land without any action by an applicable legislative body, unless the applicable legislative body finds by the preponderance of the evidence on the record that the expansion to new land will endanger the public health, safety, and welfare.  (ii)If the applicable legislative body makes the finding of endangerment described in this Subsection (2)(e)Subsection (3)(e)(i), Subsection (4)(5) applies.(3)(4)If a critical infrastructure materials operator expands a vested critical infrastructure materials use to new land, as authorized under this section:(a)the critical infrastructure materials operator's rights under the vested critical infrastructure materials use with respect to land on which the vested critical infrastructure materials use occurs apply with equal force after the expansion to the new land; and(b)the critical infrastructure materials protection area that includes land on which the vested critical infrastructure materials use occurs is expanded to include the new land.(4)(5)(a)If the applicable legislative body makes the finding of endangerment described in Subsection (2)(e)(3)(e):(i)the critical infrastructure materials operator shall submit to the applicable legislative body the critical infrastructure materials operator's plan for expansion under this section;(ii)by no later than 90 days after receipt of the plan for expansion described in Subsection (4)(a)(i)(5)(a)(i), the applicable legislative body shall notify the operator of:(A)evidence that the expansion to new land will endanger the public health, safety, and welfare; and(B)proposed measures to mitigate the endangerment of the public health, safety, and welfare; and(iii)the applicable legislative body shall hold a public hearing by no later than 30 days after the date the applicable legislative body complies with Subsection (4)(a)(ii)(5)(a)(ii) to present mitigation measures proposed under Subsection (4)(a)(ii)(5)(a)(ii).(b)The applicable legislative body may impose mitigation measures under this Subsection (4)(5) that are reasonable and do not exceed requirements imposed by permits issued by a state agency such as an air quality permit.(c)A political subdivision may not prohibit the expansion of a vested critical infrastructure materials use if the critical infrastructure materials operator agrees to comply with the mitigation measures described in Subsection (4)(b)(5)(b).(d)The process under this Subsection (4)(5) is not a land use application or conditional use application under this chapterChapter 79, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act.

Section 296:
Section 296. Section 17-81-703, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-1005 is renumbered and amended to read:17-27a-100517-81-703Effective 11/06/25. Abandonment of a vested critical infrastructure materials use.(1)A critical infrastructure materials operator may abandon some or all of a vested critical infrastructure materials use only as provided in this section.(2)To abandon some or all of a vested critical infrastructure materials use, a critical infrastructure materials operator shall record a written declaration of abandonment with the recorder of the county in which the vested critical infrastructure materials use being abandoned is located.(3)The written declaration of abandonment under Subsection (2) shall specify the vested critical infrastructure materials use or the portion of the vested critical infrastructure materials use being abandoned.

Section 297:
Section 297. Section 17E-1-101 is enacted to read:17E. COunties and State Government1. General Provisions1. General Provisions17E-1-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.Reserved.

Section 298:
Section 298. Section 17E-1-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-402 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Information and Assistance to Counties17-27a-40217E-1-201Effective 11/06/25. Information and technical assistance from the state.(1)A county may request that the state, including any agency, department, division, institution, or official of the state, provide the county with information that would assist the county in creating the county's general plan, or any aspect of the county's general plan, under Title 17, Chapter 79, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act.(2)The state or an agency, department, division, institution, or official of the state from which a county has requested information under Subsection (1) shall provide the county with:(a)the information requested by the county, unless providing the information is prohibited by Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and(b)any other technical assistance or advice the county needs with regards to the county's general plan, without any additional cost to the county.

Section 299:
Section 299. Section 17E-1-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-50-106 is renumbered and amended to read:3. Exemptions and Special Circumstances17-50-10617E-1-301Effective 11/06/25. Exemption from state licensure by Division of Real Estate.In accordance with Section 61-2f-202, an employee of a county is exempt from licensure under Title 61, Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act:(1)when engaging in an act on behalf of the county in accordance with:(a)this titleTitle 17, Counties; or(b)Title 11, Cities, Counties, and Local Taxing Units; and(2)if the act described in Subsection (1) is related to one or more of the following:(a)acquiring real estate, including by eminent domain;(b)disposing of real estate;(c)providing services that constitute property management, as defined in Section 61-2f-102; or(d)leasing real estate.

Section 300:
Section 300. Section 17E-1-302 is enacted to read:17E-1-302Effective 11/06/25. State agencies and protection areas.(1)As used in this section, "state agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-81-101.(2)A state agency shall comply with Sections 17-81-306 and 17-81-307 with respect to land in a protection area.

Section 301:
Section 301. Section 17E-2-101, which is renumbered from Section 17-55-101 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Counyties and State Executive Officers1. General Provisions17-55-10117E-2-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this partchapter:(1)"Commission" means the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201.(2)"Criminal justice agency" means an agency or institution directly involved in the apprehension, prosecution, or incarceration of a person involved in criminal activity.(3)"Criminal justice coordinating council" or "council" means a council created by a county or counties in accordance with Section 17-55-20117E-2-201.(4)"Criminal justice system" means the continuum of criminal justice agencies and post-incarceration services that an individual may encounter as a result of the individual's criminal activity.(5)(a)"Post-incarceration services" means services that may assist an individual who is leaving incarceration to reintegrate into the community.(b)"Post-incarceration services" includes:(i)educational services;(ii)housing services;(iii)health care services;(iv)workforce services; and(v)human services programs.

Section 302:
Section 302. Section 17E-2-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-55-201 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Governor and Governor's Programs17-55-20117E-2-201Effective 11/06/25. Criminal justice coordinating councils -- Creation -- Strategic plan -- Reporting requirements.(1)(a)Beginning January 1, 2023, a county shall:(i)create a criminal justice coordinating council; or(ii)jointly with another county or counties, create a criminal justice coordinating council.(b)The purpose of a council is to coordinate and improve components of the criminal justice system in the county or counties.(2)(a)A council shall include:(i)one county commissioner or county council member;(ii)the county sheriff or the sheriff's designee;(iii)one chief of police of a municipality within the county or the chief's designee;(iv)the county attorney or the attorney's designee;(v)one public defender or attorney who provides public defense within the county;(vi)one district court judge;(vii)one justice court judge;(viii)one representative from the Division of Adult Probation and Parole created in Section 64-14-202;(ix)one representative from the local mental health authority within the county; and(x)one individual who is:(A)a crime victim; or(B)a victim advocate, as defined in Section 77-38-403.(b)A council may include:(i)an individual representing:(A)local government;(B)human services programs;(C)higher education;(D)peer support services;(E)workforce services;(F)local housing services;(G)mental health or substance use disorder providers;(H)a health care organization within the county;(I)a local homeless council;(J)family counseling and support groups; or(K)organizations that work with families of incarcerated individuals; or(ii)an individual with lived experiences in the criminal justice system.(3)(a)A member who is an elected county official shall serve as chair of the council.(b)The council shall elect the member to serve as chair under Subsection (3)(a).(4)(a)A council shall develop and implement a strategic plan for the county's or counties' criminal justice system that includes:(i)mapping of all systems, resources, assets, and services within the county's or counties' criminal justice system;(ii)a plan for data sharing across the county's or counties' criminal justice system;(iii)recidivism reduction objectives; and(iv)community reintegration goals, including identifying strategies for connecting county residents who are on probation, parole, or leaving jail or prison, including those under the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice and Youth Services, with county-based housing, employment, mental health services, substance use treatment, and related resources.(b)The commission may assist a council in the development of a strategic plan.(5)As part of the council's duties described in Subsection (4)(a)(i), the council shall prepare a list of private probation providers for a court to provide to defendants as described in Section 77-18-105.(6)Before November 30 of each year, a council shall provide a written report to the commission regarding:(a)the implementation of a strategic plan described in Subsection (4); and(b)any data on the impact of the council on the criminal justice system in the county or counties.

Section 303:
Section 303. Section 17E-2-301 is enacted to read:3. Office of the Lieutenant Governor17E-2-301Effective 11/06/25. County boundaries maintained by lieutenant governor.(1)The office of the lieutenant governor shall maintain the official county boundaries for the counties of the state and update those boundaries upon the lieutenant governor's issuance, under Section 67-1a-6.5, of an applicable certificate, as defined in that section.(2)(a)If a county surveyor determines the true location of a county boundary under Section 17-61-102, the lieutenant governor shall receive the notice and map showing the true location of the county boundary.(b)Nothing in Section 17-61-102 gives a county surveyor or any other individual the authority to modify official records maintained by the office of the lieutenant governor.

Section 304:
Section 304. Section 17E-2-302 is enacted to read:17E-2-302Effective 11/06/25. Lieutenant governor to record new county boundaries.The office of the lieutenant governor shall modify county boundaries in accordance with:(1)Title 17, Chapter 61, Part 2, Consolidation of Counties;(2)Title 17, Chapter 61, Part 3, County Annexation; and(3)Title 17, Chapter 61, Part 4, Creating New Counties.

Section 305:
Section 305. Section 17E-2-401 is enacted to read:4. State Auditor17E-2-401Effective 11/06/25. State auditor and uniform fiscal procedures for counties.(1)The state auditor shall:(a)prescribe a uniform system of fiscal procedures for the several counties;(b)conduct a constant review of the uniform system in order to modify and improve the uniform system;(c)prepare and supply each county finance officer with suitable budget forms; and(d)prepare instructional materials, conduct training programs, and render other services  to assist counties in implementing the uniform system.(2)The uniform system of procedure created under Subsection (1) may include reasonable exceptions and modifications applicable to counties with a population of 25,000 or less, such population to be determined by the Utah Population Committee.

Section 306:
Section 306. Section 17E-2-402, which is renumbered from Section 17-36-41 is renumbered and amended to read:17-36-4117E-2-402Effective 11/06/25. Analysis and evaluation of accounting practices and systems by state auditor -- Regional accounting services.(1)The state auditor shall: (a)analyze and evaluate the accounting practices and systems used by the counties, as described in Title 17, Chapter 63, Fiscal Authority and Processes; and (b)provide advice and consultation to themthe counties in improving and updating theircounty practices and systems.(2)(a)Any county or group or association of counties may, by agreement pursuant toin accordance with the Interlocal Co-operation Act, provide accounting services upon a regional basis for other counties or other local governmental units. (b)The state auditor shall evaluate the county or other organization's ability to provide such service and shall periodically review the internal controls maintained by such a county or organization.

Section 307:
Section 307. Section 17E-2-403 is enacted to read:17E-2-403Effective 11/06/25. State auditor to review annual financial statements from counties.(1)The state auditor:(a)may provide guidance to the finance officer of each county to ensure uniform reporting across counties;(b)may include the information described in Subsection 17-63-603(3) on the public finance website described in Section 67-3-12;(c)shall, on a regular basis determined by the state auditor, evaluate a county's annual financial report in regard to revenues and expenditures described in Subsection 17-63-603(3) and determine whether a county's reporting is sufficient to ensure transparency and accountability; and(d)shall, upon receipt of a county's written report under Section 17-78-704 and in conjunction with evaluating the information described in Subsection 17-63-603(3), determine if a county is compliant with the expenditure authorizations described in Sections 17-78-702, 59-12-602, and 59-12-603.(2)If the state auditor determines under Subsection (1)(c) that a county is not sufficiently reporting or determines under Subsection (1)(d) that a county is not compliant, the state auditor:(a)shall provide the county finance officer with written notice of the determination, including the rationale for the determination; and(b)shall provide the county finance officer with an opportunity to respond to the determination in writing, including an opportunity to correct any deficiencies identified by the state auditor.(3)If the auditor determines, after providing a county with an opportunity to respond and correct any deficiencies as described in Subsection (2)(b), that a county is still not in compliance with this section, the auditor:(a)shall provide notice of the determination to the Division of Outdoor Recreation created in Section 79-7-201;(b)may provide notice to the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee and the Political Subdivisions Interim Committee, or if the Legislature is in session, the Legislative Management Committee; and(c)may take any action authorized in Section 51-2a-401 or other provision of law.

Section 308:
Section 308. Section 17E-2-404 is enacted to read:17E-2-404Effective 11/06/25. State auditor to review county internal control procedures.The state auditor shall:(1)evaluate the internal control procedures a county implements to effectuate Section 17-63-605; (2)recommend and approve improvements and updates to the county procedures established under Section 17-63-605; and(3)provide advice and consultation to a county implementing an internal control structure.

Section 309:
Section 309. Section 17E-2-405 is enacted to read:17E-2-405Effective 11/06/25. Enforcement of registration requirements for local substance abuse authority.The state auditor shall enforce the provisions of Section 17-77-205 in regard to the registration of a local substance abuse authority as a limited purpose entity.

Section 310:
Section 310. Section 17E-2-406 is enacted to read:17E-2-406Effective 11/06/25. State auditor to create form for transient room tax reports.(1)The state auditor, in consultation with the Utah Office of Tourism created in Section 63N-7-102, shall:(a)create a form for a financial report and a form for a written report required under Section 17-78-704;(b)designate at least one employee within the state auditor's office to serve as the point of contact for counties preparing a financial report or written report under Section 17-78-704; and(c)if the state auditor's office determines it is advisable, create written guidance to assist counties in preparing a financial report or written report under Section 17-78-704.(2)The state auditor shall receive annual written reports from the counties as described in Section 17-78-704.

Section 311:
Section 311. Section 17E-3-101 is enacted to read:3. Counties and the Legislature17E-3-101Effective 11/06/25. Counties and the Legislature.Reserved.

Section 312:
Section 312. Section 17E-4-101, which is renumbered from Section 17-56-101 is renumbered and amended to read:4. Counties and the State Tax Commission and Division of Finance1. General Provisions17-56-10117E-4-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Commission" means the State Tax Commission.(2)"Contributing business" means a person who is centrally assessed and owns a qualifying transmission line.(3)"Division" means the Division of Finance created in Section 63A-3-101.(3)(4)"Qualifying transmission line" means an electrical transmission line that first transmits electrical current within the state on or after January 1, 2026, and operates at a nominal voltage of at least 340,000 volts, including structures, equipment, plant, or fixtures associated with the electrical transmission line.

Section 313:
Section 313. Section 17E-4-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-56-201 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Species Protection Funding Act17-56-20117E-4-201Effective 11/06/25. Payments due -- Calculation of payment amount.(1)(a)On or before March 1 of each year, and included with the statement of taxpayer required under Section 59-2-202, the owner of a contributing business shall electronically file with the commission a statement containing the following information, in a manner prescribed by the commission:(i)the name, description, location, and number of miles of qualifying transmission line located within each county, by tax area, in which a qualifying transmission line is located as of January 1 of the year of the statement; and(ii)any other reasonable and necessary information required by the commission.(b)The owner of the contributing business or the owner's designee shall sign and swear to the statement described in Subsection (1)(a).(2)(a)On or before November 30 of each year, the commission shall notify each county that contains a portion of the qualifying transmission line owned by a contributing business of the amount calculated in Subsection (2)(b).(b)The commission shall calculate an amount for each county by multiplying $6,400 by the number of miles of qualifying transmission line owned by a contributing business that is located within the county.(3)On or before December 31 of each year, the county treasurer of a county notified under Subsection (2)(a) shall remit the amount calculated under Subsection (2)(b) to the Division of Financedivision from the revenue derived from the current year's property taxes.

Section 314:
Section 314. Section 17E-4-202, which is renumbered from Section 17-56-202 is renumbered and amended to read:17-56-20217E-4-202Effective 11/06/25. Deposit into Species Protection Account.The Division of Financedivision shall deposit revenue remitted to the Division of Financedivision under this chapterSection 17E-4-201 into the Species Protection Account created in Section 23A-3-214.

Section 315:
Section 315. Section 17E-5-101 is enacted to read:5. Agriculture17E-5-101Effective 11/06/25. Counties and the Department of Agriculture and Food.Reserved.

Section 316:
Section 316. Section 17E-6-101 is enacted to read:6. Counties and the Departments of Corrections and Public Safety1. General Provisions17E-6-101Effective 11/06/25. Definitions.Reserved.

Section 317:
Section 317. Section 17E-6-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-22-34 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Public Safety17-22-3417E-6-201Effective 11/06/25. Suicide Deterrence Grant Program -- Rulemaking.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Department" means the Department of Public Safety.(b)"Grant" means a grant awarded under this section.(c)"Program" means the Suicide Deterrence Grant Program created in this section.(d)"Suicide barrier" means a barrier installed on an upper level of a building to prevent an individual from falling.(2)(a)There is created within the department the Suicide Deterrence Grant Program.(b)The purpose of the program is to award grants to county jails for materials to construct and install suicide barriers.(3)(a)A county jail that submits a proposal for a grant to the department shall include in the proposal:(i)a statement describing the need for suicide barriers in the county jail;(ii)the amount and type of material to be used in constructing the suicide barriers;(iii)a plan for installation of the suicide barriers;(iv)any funding sources in addition to the grant for the proposal;(v)any existing or planned partnerships between the county jail and another entity to implement the proposal; and(vi)other information the department determines necessary to evaluate the proposal.(b)When evaluating a proposal for a grant, the department shall consider:(i)the likelihood the proposal will accomplish the purpose described in Subsection (2);(ii)the cost of the proposal;(iii)the extent to which additional funding sources or existing or planned partnerships may benefit the proposal; and(iv)the viability and sustainability of the proposal.(4)Subject to Subsection (3), the department may, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules to establish:(a)eligibility criteria for a grant;(b)the form and process for submitting a proposal to the department for a grant;(c)the method and formula for determining a grant amount; and(d)reporting requirements for a grant recipient.

Section 318:
Section 318. Section 17E-6-301, which is renumbered from Section 17-18a-506 is renumbered and amended to read:3. Correctional Facilities17-18a-50617E-6-301Effective 11/06/25. Correctional facility telephone service contracts -- Approval by civil counsel -- Required rates.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Civil counsel" means the attorney, as that term is defined in Section 17-18a-102, who is exercising the attorney's civil duties, as described in Chapter 68, Part 6, Counsel for Civil Matters, for the county in which a correctional facility is located.(b)"Correctional facility" means the same as that term is defined in Section 77-16b-102.(c)"Correctional facility administrator" means the same as that term is defined in Section 77-16b-102.(c)(d)"Correctional facility telephone service" means a public telecommunications service provided to a correctional facility for inmate use.(d)(e)"Inmate" means an individual who is committed to the custody of or housed in a correctional facility.(e)(f)"Inmate telephone rate" means any amount a correctional facility or a service provider charges an inmate for use of a correctional facility telephone service, including each per-minute rate or surcharge for:(i)a collect call, a prepaid phone card, or any other method by which a correctional facility allows an inmate to access a correctional facility telephone service; or(ii)a local or a long-distance phone call.(f)(g)"Service provider" means a public entity or a private entity that provides a correctional facility telephone service.(2)(a)A correctional facility administrator shall consider the importance of inmate access to telephones in preserving family connections and reducing recidivism when proposing an inmate telephone rate in a new or renewed contract for correctional facility telephone service.(b)A correctional facility or other state entity may not enter into or renew a contract for a correctional facility telephone service, unless the contract is approved by the civil counsel for the county in which the correctional facility is located.(c)To obtain approval of a contract described in Subsection (2)(b), a correctional facility or other state entity shall submit to the civil counsel:(i)the proposed contract;(ii)documentation that the correctional facility or other state entity has confirmed that:(A)the provisions of the contract, other than the rates described in Subsection (3)(a), are consistent with correctional facility telephone service contracts throughout the state; and(B)the contract provides for adequate services that meet the needs of the correctional facility; and(iii)any additional information the civil counsel requires to analyze the contract.(3)(a)The civil counsel shall review a contract and any additional information described in Subsection (2)(b)(2)(c) to determine whether:(i)each inmate telephone rate for interstate calls provided in the contract exceeds the corresponding inmate telephone service monetary cap per-use rate established and published by the Federal Communications Commission; and(ii)each inmate telephone rate for intrastate calls provided in the contract exceeds the greater of:(A)25% higher than the corresponding inmate telephone service monetary cap per-use rate established and published by the Federal Communications Commission; or(B)the corresponding inmate telephone system rate established and published by the Utah Department of Corrections.(b)(i)After receiving and reviewing the proposed contract and additional information, the civil counsel shall approve the contract if the proposed contract meets the requirements described in Subsection (3)(a).(ii)The civil counsel shall inform the correctional facility or other state entity of the civil counsel's determination.

Section 319:
Section 319. Section 17E-6-401 is enacted to read:4. Constables17E-6-401Effective 11/06/25. Reserved.Reserved.

Section 320:
Section 320. Section 17E-7-101, which is renumbered from Section 17-15-23 is renumbered and amended to read:7. Counties and Other Executive Branch Entities1. Department of Environmental Quality17-15-2317E-7-101Effective 11/06/25. County solid waste management plans submitted to the Waste Management and Radiation Control Board.(1)(a)Each county, or entity created or designated by a county for thisthe purpose of fulfilling the duties of this section, shall submit to the Waste Management and Radiation Control Board, organized increated in Section 19-6-103, a county solid waste management plan providing solid waste management information as reasonably required by the board and according to a timetable established by the board.(b)Each county shall review and modify itsthe county solid waste management plan no less frequently than every five years.(2)Each county solid waste management plan shall: (a)be consistent with Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 5, Solid Waste Management Act,; and (b)shall establish the county's solid waste management plan for the next 20 years.(3)Each county solid waste management plan shall include an estimate of the solid waste capacity needed in the county for the next 20 years and the county's program to ensure that the county will have sufficient solid waste disposal capacity for the next 20 years.(4)(a)The solid waste management plan mandated by this section is contingent upon the adoption and implementation of a funding mechanism.  (b)Nothing contained in this section precludes a political subdivision, local health department, or district from undertaking comprehensive solid waste planning.

Section 321:
Section 321. Section 17E-7-201, which is renumbered from Section 17-27a-519 is renumbered and amended to read:2. Department of Health and Human Services17-27a-51917E-7-201Effective 11/06/25. Licensing of residences for persons with a disability.(1)As used in this section, "residential facility for persons with a disability" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-79-102.(2)The responsibility to license local programs or entities that operate facilitiesa residential facility for persons with a disability, as well as to require and monitor the provision of adequate services to persons residing in those facilities, shall rest with the Department of Health and Human Services as provided in:(1)(a)Title 26B, Chapter 2, Part 2, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection; and(2)(b)Title 26B, Chapter 6, Part 4, Division of Services for People with Disabilities.

Section 322:
Section 322. Section 17E-7-301 is enacted to read:3. Department of Veterans and Military Affairs17E-7-301Effective 11/06/25. Department of Veterans and Military Affairs and land use planning.The Department of Veterans and Military Affairs created in Section 71A-1-201 shall comply with the provisions of Section 17-79-616.

Section 323:
Section 323. Section 17E-7-401, which is renumbered from Section 17-16-22 is renumbered and amended to read:4. Department of Natural Resources17-16-2217E-7-401Effective 11/06/25. Wildland urban interface evaluation and fees.(1)As used in this section:(a)"County officer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-16-2117-66-101.(b)"High risk wildland urban interface property" means the same as that term is defined in Section 65A-8-401.(c)"Wildland urban interface" means the same as that term is defined in Section 65A-8-401.(d)"Wildland urban interface coordinator" means the same as that term is defined in Section 65A-8-401.(2)If evaluation of high risk wildland urban interface property is assigned to a county under Section 65A-8-402:(a)the county shall enter into a cooperative agreement with the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands, in accordance with Subsection 65A-8-203(2)(a), which agreement shall address compliance with this Subsection (2) for evaluation and classification of high risk wildland urban interface property; and(b)a county officer shall require that a wildland urban interface coordinator representing the county annually evaluate high risk wildland urban interface property within the county in accordance with Section 65A-8-402.(3)Beginning January 1, 2026, a county officer shall:(a)annually assess a fee:(i)against the property owner of high risk wildland urban interface property within the incorporated and unincorporated portions of the county; and(ii)in the amount set by the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands under Section 65A-8-402; and(b)(i)after retaining a portion of the fee under Subsection (3)(b)(ii), transmit the fee assessed under Subsection (3)(a) to the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands for deposit into the Utah Wildfire Fund created in Section 65A-8-217; and(ii)retain that portion of the fee assessed under Subsection (3)(a) necessary to pay costs incurred by the county in implementing this section, which the county may include in the county's annual accounting of wildfire prevention, preparedness, mitigation actions, and associated costs for purposes of Subsection 65A-8-203(4)(c).(4)A county may hold a political subdivision lien on high risk wildland urban interface property for a fee that is past due by following the procedures in Sections 17B-1-902 and 17B-1-902.1, as if the county is a special district.

Section 324:
Section 324. Section 63I-1-217 is amended to read:63I-1-217Effective 11/06/25. Repeal dates: Titles 17 through 17D.(1)Section 17-18a-203.517-68-104, District attorney and county attorney data collection for counties of the first, second, and third class -- Report, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Section 17-41-102, Study of critical infrastructure materials operations and related mining, is repealed July 1, 2026.

Section 325:
Section 325. Section 63I-2-217 is amended to read:63I-2-217Effective 11/06/25. Repeal dates: Titles 17 through 17D.(1)Subsection 17-22-2(1)(o), regarding a sheriff's contractual duties under an interlocal agreement for law enforcement services, is repealed July 1, 2025.(2)Subsection 17-22-2(3), regarding the role of a sheriff in a police interlocal entity or police local district, is repealed July 1, 2025.(3)Section 17-27a-604.9, Effective dates of Sections 17-27a-604.1 and 17-27a-604.2, is repealed January 1, 2025.(4)(1)Subsection 17-27a-509(4)(c)17-79-804(4)(c), regarding an inspection fee on a qualified water conservancy district, is repealed July 1, 2026.(5)(2)Subsection 17-52a-103(3)17-62-102(3), regarding the process for changing a form of county government, is repealed January 1, 2028.

Section 326:
Section 327.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect:(a)except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), December 6, 2025; or(b)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house, the later of:(i)November 6, 2025; or(ii)upon approval by the governor;(iii)without the governor's approval, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(iv)with the governor's veto and a vote of the Legislature to override the veto, the date of veto override.(2)The actions affecting Section 17-75-102 (Contingently Effective 11/28/26) take effect on November 28, 2026.